Volum e 167 March 2001 ARTICLES FOURTEENTH WALDEMAR A. SOLF LECTURE IN INTERNATIONAL LAW: A NEGOTIATOR 'S PERSPECTIVE ON THE INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL COURT Ambassador David J. Scheffer
C
OMPARATIVE WITH THE
C
OMPLEMENTARITY:
D
R
OME
STATUTE
OF THE INTERNATIONAL
CONSISTENT CRIMINAL COURT Lieutenant Colonel Michael A. Newton
OMESTIC JURISDICTION
A
UTHORITY TO
VIOLATIONS INTERNAL A
COURT-MARTIAL NON-U.S. MILITARY PERSONNEL FOR SERIOUS OF INTERNATIONAL H UMANITARIAN L AW COMMITTED DURING RMED CONFLICTS Major Jan E. Aldykiewicz and Major Geoffrey S. Corn C RIMINAL
T
HE INTERNATIONAL
C
OURT
: AN E
FFECTIVE
M
EANS OF
D
ETERRENCE?
Major Michael L. Smidt
BOOK REVIEWS
Department of Army Pamphlet 27-100-167
MILITARY LAW REVIEW Volume 167 CONTENTS ARTICLES Fourteenth Waldemar A. Solf Lecture in International Law: A Negotiato r's Perspective on the International Criminal Court Ambassador David J. Scheffer Comparative Complementarity: Domestic Jurisdiction Consistent with the Rome Statute of the International Criminal Court Lieutenant Colonel Michael A. Newton Authority to Court-Martial Non-U.S. Military Personnel for Serious Violations of International Humanitarian Law Committed During Internal Armed Conflicts Major Jan E. Aldykiewicz and Major Geoffrey S. Corn March 2001
1
20
74
The International Criminal Court: An Effective Means of Deterrence Major M ichael L. Smidt 156 BOOK REVIEWS Descent into Darkness: Pearl Harbor, 1941, A Navy Diver 's M emoir
Reviewed by Major Jane-Ellen Bagwell The Greatest Threat: Iraq, Weapons of Mass Destruction, and the Crisis of Global Security Reviewed by Major J.R. Perlak Breaking Out: VMI and the Com ing of Women Reviewed by Major Imogene M. Jamison Virtual War: Kosovo and Beyond Reviewed by Major George R. Smawley
241
248
254
261
Virtual War: Kosovo and Beyond Reviewed by Lieutenant Commander William F. O'Brien 271
i
Headquarters, Department of the Army, Washington, D.C.
Pamphlet No. 27-100-167, March 2001
MILITARY LAW REVIEW--VOLUME 167 Since 1958, the Military Law Review has been published at The Judge Advocate General's School, United States Army, Charlottesville, Virginia.
The Military Law Review provides a forum for those interested in military la w to sha r e the pr oduc ts of the i r e x p er i e n c e a nd r es ea r ch , a nd it is desi gn ed fo r u se by mili tary atto rn eys i n con nectio n wi th t heir official duties.
Writings offered for publication should be of direct concern and import to military legal scholarship.
Preference will be given to those writings having lasting value as reference material for the military lawyer.
The Military Law Review encourages frank discussion of relevant legislative, administrative, and judicial developments.
EDITORIAL STAFF CAPTAIN TODD S. M ILLIARD, Editor M R. CHARLES J. STRONG, Technical Editor The Military Law Review (ISSN 0026-4040) is published quarterly by The Judge Advocate General's School, 600 Massie Road, Charlottesville, Virginia 22903-1781, for use by military attorneys in connection with their official duties for $17 each (domestic) and $21.25 (foreign) per year (see Individual Paid Subscriptions to the Military Law Review on pages vi and vii).
Periodicals postag e paid at Charlottesville, Virginia and addition al mailing offices .POSTMASTER: Send address changes to Military Law Review, The Judge Advocate General's School, United States A rmy, Charlottesville, Virginia 22903-1781.
SU BSCR IPTIONS : Private subs crip ti ons may be pu rchase d fro m the Superintendent of Documents, United States Government Printing Office, Washington, D.C. 20402; you may call (202) 512-1800.
See the subscription form and instructions at the end of this section.
Publication exchange subscriptions are available to law schools and other organizations that publish legal p eriodi cals.
E ditors or pu blishers of these period icals sho uld address inquiries to the Editor of the Military Law Review.
Inquiries and address changes concerning subscriptions for Army legal offices, ARNG and USAR JAGC officers, and other federal agencies should be addressed ii
to the Editor of the M ilitary Law Review.
Judge advocates of other military services should request distribution from their publication channels.
CITATION: This issue of the Military Law Review may be cited as 167 MIL. L. R EV. (page number) (2001).
Each issue is a complete, separately numbered volume.
INDEXING: * The primary Military Law Review indices are volume 81 (summer 1978) and volume 91 (winter 1981).
* Volume 81 included all writings in volumes 1 through 80, and replaced all previous Military Law Review indices.
* Volume 91 included writings in volumes 75 through 90 (excluding Volume 81), and replaces the volume indices in volumes 82 through 90.
* Volume 96 contains a cumulative index for volumes 92-96.
* Volume 101 contains a cumulative index for volumes 97-101.
* Volume 111 contains a cumulative index for volumes 102-111.
* Volume 121 contains a cumulative index for volumes 112-121.
* Volume 131 contains a cumulative index for volumes 122-131.
* Volume 141 contains a cumulative index for volumes 132-141.
* Volume 151 contains a cumulative index for volumes 142-151.
* Volume 161 contains a cumulative index for volumes 152-161.
Military Law Review articles are also indexed in A Bibliography of Contents: Political Science and Government; Legal Contents (C.C.L.P.); Index to Legal Periodicals; Monthly Catalogue of United States Government Publications; Index to United States Government Periodicals; Legal Resources Index; three computerized databases--the Public Affairs Information Service, The Social Science Citation Index, and LEXIS--and other indexing services.
Issues of the Military Law Review are reproduced on iii
microfiche in Cu rrent Un ited States Go vernment P fiche by Infordata International Inc., Suite 4602, 175 Chicago, Illinois 60611.
The Military Law Review www.jagcnet.army.mil beginning with Volumes 163
eriodicals on M icroEast Delaware Place, is available at http:// through 166.
SUBMISSION OF WRITINGS: Articles, comments, recent development notes, and book reviews should be s ubmitted in Microsoft Wo rd, to th e Ed itor, M ilita ry Law Review at Todd .Milli ard @h qda.army.mil.
If electronic mail is not availab le, pleas e forward the submission in d uplicate, double-spaced to the E ditor, Militar y La w Review, Th e Judge A dvocate General's Sch ool, United States Army, Charlottesville, Virginia 2290 31781.
A uthors also should submit electronic copies on 3 1/2 in ch computer diskettes, preferably in Microsoft Word format.
Foo tn ot es s ho ul d b e ty ped do ub le-s paced , and nu mb ered co ns ecutively from the beginning to the end of a writing, not chapter by chapter.
Citations should conform to The Bluebook, A Uniform System of Citation (17th ed. 2000), copyrighted by the Columbia, Harvard, and University of Pennsylvania Law Reviews and the Yale Law Journal, and to Military Citation (TJAGSA 6th ed. 1997).
Masculine pronouns appearing in the text will refer to both genders unless the context indicates another use.
Typescripts should include biographical data concerning the author or authors.
This data should consist of branch of service, duty title, present and prior positions or duty assignments, all degrees (with names of granting schools and years received), and previous publications.
If the article was a speech or was prepared in partial fulfillment of degree requirements, the author should include date and place of delivery of the speech or the source of the degree.
EDITORIAL REVIEW: The Editorial Board of the Military Law Review cons ist s of th e D eput y Com mandan t of Th e J ud ge Ad vo cate G eneral's School; the Director of Legal Research and Communications Department; and the Editor of the Military Law Review.
Professors at the School assist the Editorial Board in the review process.
The Editorial Board submits its reco mmen d ati on s t o th e Co mman d ant , T he Ju dg e A d vo cate G en eral 's School, who has final approval authority for writings published in the Military Law Review.
The Military Law Review does not purport to promulgate Department of the Army policy or to be in any sense directory.
The opinions and conclusions reflected in each writing are those of the author
iv
and do not necessarily reflect the views of The Judge Advocate General or any governmental agency.
The Editorial Board will evaluate all material submitted for publication.
In determining whether to publish an article, note, or book review, the Editorial Board will consider the item's substantive accuracy, comprehensiveness, organization, clarity, timeliness, originality, and value to the military legal community.
No minimum or maximum length requirement exists.
When a writing is ac Law Review will provide prepub lication appro val. stages of the publication cepted for publication, the Editor of the Military a copy of the edited manuscript to the author for Min or alteration s may be made in subsequent process without the approval of the author.
Reprints of published writings are not available.
Authors receive complimentary copies of the issues in which their writings appear.
Additional co pies u sually are availab le in limited q uantities.
Auth ors may request additional copies from the Editor of the M ilitary Law Review.
BACK offices Bou nd arrange ISSUES: Copies of recent back issues are available to Army legal in limited quantities from the Editor of the Military Law Review.
cop ies are no t av ailable and s ubs crib ers s hou ld make th ei r ow n ments for binding if desired.
REPRINT PERMISSION: Contact the Editor, Military Law Review, The Judg e Ad vocate General's Sch ool, United Stat es Army, Charlottesv ille, Virginia 22903-1781.
v
Individual Paid Subscriptions to the Military Law Review The Government Printing Office offers a paid subscription service to the Military Law Review.
To receive an annual individual paid subscription (4 issues), complete and return the order form on the next page.
RENEWALS OF PAID SUBSCRIPTIONS: You can determine when your subscription will expire by looking at your mailing label.
Check the number that follows "ISSDUE" on the top line of the mailing label as shown in this example: When this digit is 3, a renewal notice will be sent.
MILR SMITH212J ISSDUE003 R1 JOHN SMITH 212 MAIN ST FORESTVILLE MD The numbers the sub scrip tion . receive one more received your last following ISSDUE indicate how many issues remain in For ex amp le, ISSDUE 001 indicates a su bscriber w ill issue.
When the number reads ISSDUE000, you have issue unless you renew.
To av oid a lapse in you r subscription, pro mptly return the renewal notice w ith pay ment to the Su perintendent of D ocumen ts.
If your su bscription service is discontinued, simply send your mailing label from any issue to the Superintendent of Documents with the proper remittance and your subscription will be reinstated.
INQUIRIES AND CHANGE OF ADDRESS INFORMATION: The individual paid subscription service is handled solely by the Superintendent of Documents, not the Editor of the Military Law Review in Charlottesville, Virginia.
For inquires and change of address for individual paid subscriptions, fax your mailing label and new address to (202) 512-2250 or send yo ur mailing label and new address to the follo wing address: United States Government Printing Office Superintendent of Documents ATTN: Chief, Mail List Branch Mail Stop: SSOM Washington, D.C. 20402 vi
vii
MILITARY LAW REVIEW Volum e 167 March 2001
FOURTEENTH WALDEMAR A. SOLF LECTURE IN INTERNATIONAL LAW1 A NEGOTIATOR'S PERSPECTIVE ON THE INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL COURT A MBASSADOR
D
AVID
J. S
CHEFFER2
Th ank you, Co lonel Lederer, both fo r the introduction an d for th e opportunity to address such a distinguished audience of military lawyers, faculty, and other guests.
I also want to thank Brigadier General Thomas Romig for his hospitality and encouragement to be here today.
Lieutenant Colonel Tia Johnson, the Chair of your International and Operational Law Department, merits special praise for her hard work to bring me here for the Solf Lecture.
One of the most dynamic fields of international law today is the law of a rm ed conf li ct , or wha t is increa singly r efer red to as intern ational humanitarian law and internatio nal crimin al law in multilateral negotiations and in scholarly treatises.
As JAG officers, you above all others recognize the importance of the U.S. military's role in developing the law of armed conflict and in complying with it.
We are all guided by a remark1.
This article is an edited transcript of a lecture delivered on 28 February 2001 by David J. Scheffer to members of the staff and faculty, distinguished guests, and officers attending the 49th Judge Advocate Officer Graduate Course at The Judge Advocate General's School, U.S. Army, Charlottesville, Virginia.
The Waldemar A. Solf Lecture in International Law was established at The Judge Advocate General's School on 8 October 1982.
The chair was named after Colonel Solf who served in increasingly important positions during his career as a judge advocate.
After his retirement, he lectured at American University for two years, then served as Chief of the International A ffairs Division, Office of The Judge Advocate General.
In that position, he represented the United States at num erous international conferences including those that prepared the 1977 Protocols Additional to the 1949 Geneva Conventions.
After his successful effort in completing the Protocol negotiations, he returned to Washington and was appointed the Special Assistant to The Judge Advocate G eneral for Law of War Matters.
He served in that position until his second retirement in August 1979.
1
2
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
ab ly r i ch tr ad ition of Am e ric an e nga ge me nt in the de ve lopm en t a n d enforcement of the law of armed conflict.
Well-trained forces that understand the law of armed conflict will demonstrate professionalism and compliance that cannot be seriously questioned.
The law yers who train and deploy and fight with our soldiers, sailors, and airmen are a vital line of defense.
Judge advo cates must know, with precision , the law of armed conflict, and they must protect their commanders throughout the cycle of operations and in any operational environment.
That is a very tough job for w hich I believe you deserve our respect and our full support in every possible way.
I have always told your superiors to sign me up for any testimony before Congress to increase your salaries and benefits.
Believe me, it is a humbling experience for this lawyer to stand before so many professional military lawyers who shoulder so much responsibility.
During my tour as Ambassador-at-Large, we drew upon your profession's heritage daily as we supported the work of the International Criminal Tribunals f or the Fo r me r Yugoslavia and Rw a nda, negotiated the establishment of the Extraordinary Chambers in Cambodia and the Indepen dent Special C ourt fo r S ierra L eon e, an d ass is ted w ith estab lis hin g credible mechanisms of justice to respond to atrocities in East Timor, Sri La nk a, th e Great Lakes region of Afri ca, Kosovo, Iraq, and other war zones.
I am proud to have had JA G officers work for me in the Office of War Crimes Issues in the State Department and on the U.S. delegation to 2.
Former Ambassador-at-Large for War Crimes Issues.
David John Scheffer was nominated by President William J. Clinton to serve as the first-ever Ambassador-at-Large for War Crim es Issues on 22 May 1997.
Following Senate confirmation, he was sworn into office on 5 August 1997.
The appointment carried an ambassadorial rank.
This newly created post addresses serious violations of international humanitarian law anywhere in the world.
Ambassador Scheffer coordinated support for the functions of the Yugoslav and Rwandan War Crimes Tribunals, headed the Atrocities Prevention Inter-Agency Working Group, and led U.S. participation in United Nations negotiations for the establishment of a permanent International Criminal Court.
He also coordinated U.S. efforts to establish international records and mechanisms of accountability for past or on-going violations of internationa l hum anitarian law in conflict a reas, and assisted S ecretary of State Madeleine A lbri ght in ad dr ess ing th e n ee ds of vi ctim s of su ch atr oci ties .
Am b ass ado r Sch effer reported directly to Secretary Albright.
During the first term of the Clinton Ad ministration, Ambassador Scheffer was Senior Advisor and Counsel to then-Ambassador Albright.
His duties included war crimes issues and national security and peacekeeping policies.
He also se rv ed a s t he Wa sh in gt on re pr es en tat ive f or th e U ni ted S ta te s M iss ion to th e U nit ed Nations, as a member of the Deputies Committee of the National Security Council, and as the Alternative Representative on the United States delegation to the United Nations talks on the proposal for a permanent International Criminal Court.
2001]
FOURTEENTH WALDEMAR A. SOLF LECTURE
3
the ICC talks.
One of them, Lieutenant Colonel Michael New ton of the U.S. Army, a former instructor here, joins us today.
My subject toda y is the pe rma ne nt I nter na tional Crim in al C ourt, which does not yet exist but will, within probably a few years, and thus will deeply influence much of your work as judge advocates.
In approaching this opportunity, I struggled with a more classic legal analysis of the Rome Treaty regime that will govern the International Criminal Court and some general proposit ions that speak t o t he pu rpo se and consequ ences of th e Court.
While I will emphasize some key legal points today, I also want to elevate your own thinking about this issue to its larger context in international politics and international security.
I spoke publicly often about the ICC as head of the U.S. delegation to th e U n ited N ati on s talk s o n th e Cou rt from 1 99 7 un ti l last mon th , an d before then as deputy head of the delegatio n.You can access most of my remarks that are on the public record and in the State Department's Web site,3 now under "Archives," probably to the satisfaction of some of my critics on the right.
Since I had droves of critics on the left as well through the years, you can appreciate that I sometimes considered myself a lone warrio r on th is s ub ject: so meon e wh o w alk ed a fin e lin e bet ween ou r deeply held concerns about the impact the ICC may have on American service members and our firm resolve to lead in the application of international justice and the enforcement of the laws of war.
Building, achieving, and then advancing an inter-agency consensus on ICC issues w ere tasks that consumed a significant portion of my job.
It became common practice that I devoted far more time debating and achieving consensus within our own gov ernment, even w hile intern ation al negotiations were underw ay, than was required of any of our foreign negotiators.
There was no agency I listened to more carefully, and represented under the most difficult negotiating circumstances, than the Department of Defense, including therein the Joint Chiefs of Staff.
Judge advocates and Defense lawyers populated my delegation; indeed no other delegation included so many military counsels as did the U.S. delegation.
They made critical contributions and protected U.S. military interests every step of the way.
3.
U.S. State Department, Remarks, Testimony, and Briefings, at http:// www.state.gov/www /policy_rem arks/.
4
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
The Rome Statute of the International Criminal Court w as finalized on July 17, 1998.
4 The treaty embodying the Rome Statute will enter into force when sixty states have ratified it, and I will henceforth refer to it as th e Ro me Treaty.
On e h u nd red and t hi rty -n in e s tat es hav e s ig n ed t h e Rome Treaty; of those, twenty-nine have ratified it.
The ratifiers are our allies and friends, including France, Germany, Italy, Spain, Belgium, Norway, Canada, Finland, Ghana, Iceland, Austria, New Zealand, and South Africa.
Many other states are moving towards ratification, including the United Kingdom, Switzerland, the Netherlands, Ireland, Chile, and Australia.
Russia signed the Rome Treaty last September.
The United States signed the Rome Treaty on December 31, 2000, the last possible day the treaty permitted signature, after which any non-signatory state would have to accede to the treaty.
Iran and Israel also signed the treaty on December 31st.
The significant states that did not sign the Rome Treaty are Japan, China, India, Pakistan, Indonesia, E th iopia, and Saudi Arabia, an d such outcast states as Iraq, N orth Korea, Cuba, Libya, Myanmar (or Burma), and Afghanistan.
The U.S. decision to sign the Rome Treaty was and remains controversial.
I strongly believe that President Clinton's decision was the right one.
That may come as a surprise to those who followed my public statements and negotiating positions since 1995, because I often articulated the Clinton Administration's serious concerns about flaws in the Rome Treaty, particularly the flaw that military and civilian personnel of a non-party to the treaty could be ensnared by the Court's jurisdiction w ithout the nonparty's consent.
But we worked that problem very hard during the negotiatio ns o ver the Rul es fo r Pro ced ure and E vid ence and t he Elemen ts o f Crimes, which w ere adopted by consensus at the Preparatory Commission on the ICC last June, and we continued to work it at the N ovember-December 2000 session of the Preparatory Commission.
Anyone w ho analyzes the Rome Treaty w ithout also examining the Rules an d E lement s w ill reach flawed conclusio ns ab out the man ner in which the IC C w i ll be gove rn e d .
Th at is why I spea k of the " t re at y regime," meaning the Rome Statute, the Rules, the Elements, and the other supplemental documents that are now being negotiated in the Preparatory Commission in New York.
Still on deck in New York are the Relationship Agreement between the United Nations and the ICC, privileges and immu4.
Rome Statute of the International Crim inal Court, U.N. Doc. A/CONF.183/9 (1998) (United Nations Diplomatic Conference of Plenipotentiaries on the Establishment of an International Criminal Court, July 17, 1998) [hereinafter Rome Statute].
2001]
FOURTEENTH WALDEMAR A. SOLF LECTURE
5
nities for the Court, financial regulations and rules, the headquarters agreement between the Court and The Netherlands, the all-important rules of procedure of the Assembly of States Parties, and the trigger, definition, and elements for the crime of aggression.
All of these supplemental documents cont ai n critical pro vis ion s of direct rel ev ance an d op po rt uni ty for U.S. interests, and they all offer the chance to enhance the overall effectiveness and universal acceptability of the ICC.
We ignore them at our own risk.
The dilemma we had to wrestle with late last year was whether w e best confronted the treaty's remaining flaws, and I emphasize "remaining" subsequent to our work in the Rules and Elements negotiations, as a signatory working the issues hard from within the ten t, or as a no n-signato ry protesting the Court's legitimacy.
Knowing full well that the U nited States has a signifi can t im pa ct when e ngaged in such negotiati ons, I reco mmended signature and other senior officials joined me in that recommendation.
Other views pointed towards non-signature as the preferred policy decision.
The President deliberated with a full set of views and recommendations, and a lot of tough questions w ere asked.
In fact, the difficulties and ris ks of t he Ro me Treat y w ere emp has ized and d escrib ed in great detail to him.
Well-meaning patriots, including some members of Congress, appear determined to derail the Rome Treaty.
That would be folly.
Declaring war on t he treat y or jus t mon ito ri ng furth er talk s w ith s tud ied in differen ce, whic h appears to be th e Bu sh Admi nistration's chosen course fo r the present, w ould undermine U.S. interests.
As a signatory, the United States now is well armed to improve the treaty regime and advance our commitment to international justice.
In the Clinton Administration we negotiated this controversial treaty, as well as the Rules of Procedure and Evidence and Elements of Crimes that we insisted be added to it, for worthwhile objectives.
America's advocacy of the rule of law abroad as well as at home needs backbone, and a p erm an en t c o u rt t ha t w e le ad i n s h ap i n g w i ll a d v an ce ju s t i ce.
I n t h e twenty-first century, perpetrators of heinous crimes like genocide, crimes against humanity, and war crimes must be prosecuted and punished.
We proudly stand for that proposition as a nation born out of the struggle for freedom, for democracy, and for a rule of law that protects and does not trample the legitimate rights of all humankind.
Cynics overseas, and some at home, argue that this will be victor 's justice alone, just as, they argue, the International Criminal Tribunals for
6
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
the Former Yugoslavia and Rwanda have been conceived.
They overlook, of course, that the Yugoslav Tribunal was established long before the Dayton Accords, which could hardly be described as a traditional victory in war for any side of the Balkans conflict, and that defendants from all sides of that conflict have and will continue to stand trial.
The R wanda Tribunal has nothing to do with victory or defeat--just internal mass slaughter, and the Prosecutor has publicly made it clear that she is investigating Tutsi officials suspected of crimes in 1994.
So me critics, particu larly at home, seek on ly victor 's justice in ou r own image in the pursuit of international justice, and they view the ICC as a threat to that proposition.
But we must be engaged constructively with the Court to ensure that international justice coexists compatibly with the requirements of international peace and security and our own self-defense an d t hat o f ou r al li ance part n ers an d frien d s. Fear o f pro s ecut io n can become a self-fulfilling prophecy if we are shortsighted enough to let that fear intimidate and then conquer us.
In this struggle for the law, we will prevail if we demonstrate the w ill to persevere through all of the detailed negotiations and all of the political maneuvering that is associated with any treaty negotiation.
My advice is blunt: Get over it.
The world is changing.
The Internation al C r im ina l C our t wi ll b e e s ta bli s he d, soon .
We h av e to d ec i d e whether we stand for the rule of law or squirm in the face of it.
If we cannot stand for the proposition that heinous crimes against humankind will be answ ered an d build the institu tions to do th at job in a very complex world, then our leadership in promoting the rule of law abroad will decline rapidly and the value of our own principles will erode.
Others will take the lead.
The United States must have the courage to embrace change if it presumes to retain the mantle of leadership.
The last decade was the beginning o f an age of accountab ility that the United States must continue to lead, both in the interests of humanity and to ensure that justice is rendered fairly and globally in a manner that advances U.S. interests.
Th e alt ern at ives --ad ho cism or no thi ng at all --wi ll bu rd en futu re generations w ith inefficient and costly means to manage accountability for atro ci ti es .
T he exi s ten ce o f t he I nt ern ati on al Co u rt w i ll sp u r na ti on al courts to do the job they should be doing to bring alleged war criminals to justice and th us avoid in tern ational litigation .
Th e Cou rt's p otential fo r
2001]
FOURTEENTH WALDEMAR A. SOLF LECTURE
7
deterrence--problematic ev en in d omestic law enforcement--can not b e disproved.
Let me emphasize that our remaining legal objections to the International Criminal Court were not overcome or cast aside with U.S. signature.
President Clinto n made that clear in h is D ecemb er 3 1st st atement.5 But those objections never dictated non-signature either.
The first objection is the presumption, embodied in Article 12 of the Rome Treaty, that official personnel of a non-party state can be investigated and prosecuted by the Court provided either the state where the crime occurred or the state o f nationality of the perpetrator is already party to the Rome Treaty or, as a non-party, con sents to ICC ju risdiction .
We based our objection on ou r interpretation of customary international law, namely that it does not yet entitle a state, whether as a party or as a non-party to the Rome Treaty, to delegate to an international criminal court its own domestic authority to bring to justice individuals who commit crimes on its sovereign territory, without the consent of that individual's state of nationality either through ratification of the Rome Treaty or by special consent.6 However, we made it crystal clear in the negotiations, and I hope we continue to make it clear, that as a practical matter the United States is prepared to examine circumstances where individuals can be prosecuted before the International Criminal Court without either requ irement--ratification or special consent-- having been first obtained.
We sought to negotiate some of those circumstances and in effect violate our own rule of interpretation so as to create a realistic and effective mechanism for international justice.
We otherwise had a very tough sell, because we would have had to argue for the rights of all manner of nonparty states when most of our negotiating partners were signatory states that either had already ratified the Rome Treaty or were moving towards ratification.
Imag in e yourself in the sh oes of one of our staunch NATO allies an d su pporters of the Rome Treaty, lis tenin g to an argument that, while it would benefit the United States military, also would immunize an aggressor state's military personnel from any action by the International Criminal Court.
The objective of our allies is to promote ratification, not insulate non-party states.
The simple negotiating reality is that it was not plausible to argue that a non-party state whose military forces are respon5.
President William J. Clinton, Statement by the President: Signature of the International Criminal Court Treaty (Dec. 31, 2000), 2000 WL 6008.
6.
See Madeline Morris, High Crimes and Misconceptions: The ICC and Non-Party States, LAW 
P ROBS. 13 (2001).
8
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
sible fo r he inous c rim e s c ould a void the Co u rt a b se nt a C h ap te r VI I enforcement referral by the U.N. Security Council, a body in disfavor with many of the governments in the negotiating room, including some of our closest allies.
The methodologies we examined with other governments were creative, realistic, and relevant for the real culprits.
We proposed provisions that focused only on the status of official personnel before the Court, without seeking any particular protection for other individuals, such as mercenaries, rebels, or other non-official combatants.
We sought to distinguish between the "good guys" and the "bad guys" of non-party states thrashing about in the cauldron of international security challenges that define modern warfare and human right s.Although we had the reality of the international system and sheer logic on our side in these debates, we could not prevail last year with a formula that would achieve consensus among so many disparate governments engaged in the negotiations.
A fter all, each government had to ask itself whether it was one of the good guys, or one of the bad guys.
Despite th e difficulty of su stainin g o ur interp retatio n o f cu stomary international law, ev en with pragmatically drawn exceptions, we helped negotiate Rule 44(2) of the Rules of Procedure and Evidence, the importance of which is often overlooked.
One of our primary concerns about the jurisdiction of the Court has been its preconditions to jurisdiction set forth in Article 12, that conceivably could permit Iraq, as a non-party, to trigger the Court's jurisdiction over U.S. pilots engaged in defensive actions in the skies over Iraq without requiring the Court to scrutinize Iraq's conduct as well.
Rule 44(2) addresses that problem and requires that any declaration by a non-party state triggering the Court's jurisdiction under Article 12 has the consequence of accepting the jurisdiction of the Court with respect to all of the crimes covered by the Rome Treaty that are relevant to the situatio n, a term used elsew here in th e treat y to mean th e o verall con flict.
Thus, Iraq would have to invite the Court's scrutiny of its own illegal conduct, which is massive, in order to trigger investigation of the U.S. pilots.
In its own self-interest, Iraq w ould avoid that opportunity.
On the larger issue of overall protection for the U.S. military, however, we finally had to face the fact that we were barking up the wrong tree, and o ur mili tary services w ere no t bein g w ell-served w ith los ing arg uments.
I spent many years seeking full immunity for our military forces and their civilian leadership in negotiations that quite frankly sometimes seemed the theater of the absurd.
I was given nothing to offer--certainly
2001]
FOURTEENTH WALDEMAR A. SOLF LECTURE
9
not signature or ratification--in return for an absolutist carve-out that other governments, particularly our closest allies, found arrogant and hypocritical.
I finally successfully lobbied my colleagues in Washington to permit me to offer a "good neighbor" pledge towards the Court in return for full protection.
Si nce th e next ad m i nistration could re vers e th a t politic al pledge, how ever, it proved unconvincing.
We constantly focused on the extreme circumstance where the International Court could theoretically pursue an American soldier even if the United States has not yet become a party to the treaty.
In the eight years of my d elib eratio ns i n Was hin gt on o n t he Int ern atio nal C ri min al Cou rt-- beginning with the work of the International Law Commission in 1993 and 1994--I do not recall hearing any senior Defense D epartment official refer to the core purpose of the Court, namely to advance international justice and enforce the law of armed conflict.
Every single discussion was dominated by how th e Cou rt wo uld impact th e U nited St ates military.
Fai r enoug h; it was ou r du ty as public servants to put that concern front and center, and we did year after year.
I am also exceptionally aware of the sacri fi c es our se rv ic e m e mb e rs have m ade , par tic ular ly with the ir lives , throughout our history.
I wondered sometimes, though, what the mutilated children of Sierra Leone would think of such discussions if they could only fathom them.
I imagined parading them and the thousands of other victims and carcasses I witnessed in atrocity zones around the world through the wood paneled rooms of Washington, just as a reality check.
But sho rt of one hun dred percen t p ro tectio n, for wh ich t here is no plausible multilateral formula, we successfully negotiated into the treaty regime an impressive body of safeguards that critics continue to overlook in their zeal to trash the treaty.
W hen w e pursued our objectives with a degree of humility, we succeeded.
There is a tendency in negotiations of this character that involve our military services and international security, to arrive at hard and fast positions within the Washington bureaucracy that are either too self-protective or too tardy, or both, to be successful in multilateral negotiations, and to stick with those positions long after their futility is obvious to all.
Let me be frank: Military lawyers advising their superio rs ab out such negotiations, and I have in mind both the Land Mines Treaty and the Rome Treaty on the International Criminal Court, need to be careful not to succumb to what will sound gutsy and All-American within the JCS Tank but will fail miserably when presented to other governments.
A negotiating room is not a conventional battlefield, but it is a theater of diplomatic conflict and
10
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
co op erat io n. Wi th in t he n eg o ti ati ng aren a, a s i n t h e co urt ro om , o verwhelming force is defined by the logic and persuasiveness of one's argument and yo ur ab ilit y to u nd ers tand an d then cap italize up on t he oth er government's perspective.
Our superpower status and the magnitude of our military forces mean very little in these settings.
That is the hard reality today.
We need to adjust and turn that reality to our own advantage with winning strategies and not self-righteous tactics that impress no one but ourselves.
During the N ovember-December 20 00 negotiatio ns of the Preparatory Commission, our friends recommended that we should focus on our greatest strength--the principle of complementarity--as our first line of defense.
The U.S. delegation worked hard in the ICC talks to ensure that there are safegu ard s in t he treaty regim e s o th at t he Cou rt does n ot h it American service members with unwarranted actions.
We built into the treaty procedures by which countries with strong legal systems can investigate an d, if merited, prosecute their ow n citizen s and t hus req uire th e court to back off.
The principle of complementarity, or primary deferral to na ti on al cou rt s, i s an e xt raord i nary an d so mew h at com pl ex pro t ecti v e mechanism that manifests itself in the treaty and in the supplemental documents.
Much of the complementarity regime originated with us an d we prevailed in its adoption.
Indeed, in some circumstances the Rome Treaty regime offers military personnel greater protection from foreign prosecution than do current law and practice.
If the Court disregards or abuses the complementarity regime, it will quickly lose its legitimacy in the eyes even of the treaty parties.
We know from the negotiations and the ratification p roceedings und ertaken so far that a vib rant co mplementarity p ractice by th e Co urt is essent ial to the Court's survival and to its acceptance by its strongest supporters, w ho have no intention of being hauled before the Court themselves! The expectation of complementarity reaches back far in the evolution of the Court.
I commend to you Lieutenant Colonel Mik e Newton's forthco ming article on c o m p le m e nt a r it y i n Vo lu m e 1 6 7 of t h e Mi li ta ry L a w R e v i e w 7 fo r a re fr e s her c our se a nd fo r ins i ghtfu l a n al y s is o f how co mp lem e ntar ity 7.
Lieutenant Colonel Michael A. N ewton, Comparative Complementarity: Domestic Jurisdiction Consistent with the Rome Statute of the International Criminal Court, 167 MIL. L. REV. 20 (2001).
2001]
FOURTEENTH WALDEMAR A. SOLF LECTURE
11
indeed w ould work, an d how, as w ith all matters of law, there are some gray areas that will have to be worked out in the practice of the Court.
In D ecember, th e U .S. delegation int rod uced a treaty-friend ly proposal for the Relationship Agreement between the United Nations and the Court now being debated in New York.8 There are numerous provisions in t h e Rel a t i o n s h i p A g reemen t t h at d e s c ri b e t h e n eed fo r co o p erat i o n between the United Nations and the Court.
This proposal joins that list of provisions.
States that are contributing to U.N. peacekeeping operations or other necessary international missions outside their own borders will be encouraged to co ntin ue maki ng such con trib utio ns if t hey kno w that an y cas e brought against their personnel in the ICC is indeed an admissible case.
Acting strictly in accordance with the provisions of the Rome Statute, the Court has the authority to ensure that admissibility indeed is examined.
The Statute's preamble emphasizes the imp ortance of complementarity, and Articles 17, 18, and 19 reinforce that objective, as do the Rules of Proced ure and E vi d enc e.9 A st ate 's kn o w led g e th at adm is si b il it y w i ll b e examined in certain cases will encourage that state and others to properly and faithfully investigate and prosecute genocide, crimes against humanity, and war crimes in domesti c courts as en visaged by th e p rin cip le o f complementarity.
The U.S. proposal focuses the Court's attention on admissibility at a critical moment, namely when the request for surrender is made.
For contributors to international peace and security to know that the Court is using its authority at that time to ensure fairness in the process will add greatly to the confidence of all states to contribute to U.N. peacekeeping and other international efforts to maintain or restore peace and security.
We crafted the provision in consultation with several of our allies.
It would require the Court, on its own motion as provided pursuant to Article 19(1) of the treaty, to review the admissibility of a case in accordance with Article 17 wh en there is a request for the surren der o f a suspect who is charged in such case with a crime that occurred outside the territory of the suspect's state of nationality.
W hy the latter requirement? Because the pri8.
See U.N. Doc. PCNICC/2000/WG ICC-UN/DP.17 (2000).
9.
See Report of the Preparatory Commission for the International Criminal Court, Finalized Draft Text of the Rules of Procedure and Evidence, U.N. Doc. PCNICC/2000/ INF/3/Add.1 (2000) [hereinafter Draft Rules].
12
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
mary concern of the United Nations, and indeed of the United States, is to ensure that their deployments abroad to maintain or restore international peace and s ecurity are p rop erl y bal an ced w ith the Co urt's ju risd ictio n, whereas military forces that commit internal atrocities cannot be considered as pursuing any viable objective of international peace and security.
Internal atrocities are such an important focus of the Court's mission that it would be futile, particularly with our European friends, and contrary to our own interests to introduce additional procedures into the investigation and prosecution of indigenous perpetrators of internal atrocities.
Our proposal would ensure that the Court would examine the admissibility of any case involving an American service member.
United States fede ral and m ilitar y cour ts have sever al opportuniti e s to seize a ca se against an American service member and thus avoid ICC jurisdiction.
If, by the time the International Criminal Court has investigated an American service member and indicted him or her and then requested his or her surrender, our own a uthorities ha ve not ex erci sed thei r co m p le me nt ar it y rights to investigate and adjudicate that individual's alleged crime and thus void any ICC scrutiny, then we have only ourselves to blame.
The new proposal erects a final firewall, meaning that whether or not the admissibility of a case has been reviewed in the past, the Court must, on its ow n motion, review admissibility at the critical moment when the request for surrender is being framed.
T he state of n ationality thus will have one more opportunity to demonstrate its performance of the complementarity criteria in an effort to prevent such surrender.
Since the Court can review admissibility on its own motion at any time, the U.S. proposal simply articulates a procedural agreement between the United Nations and the Court, binding on the Court, to ensure that a final admissibility review occurs before the suspect arrives in The Hague.
The proposal is reasonable and compatible with and in accordance with the treaty itself.
We would be foolish not to pursue it vigorously in the on-going talks, although I fear the march of folly has already begun.
Multilateral negotiations are as much about missed opportunities and bad timing as they are about anything else.
Critics have charged that there are inadequate due process protections in the Rome Treaty.
Guided by career lawyers from the Justice, Defense, and State Departments, the U.S. delegation negotiated procedures and definitions of crimes consistent with our constitutional and military law practice.
Monroe Leigh, Secretary of State Henry Kissinge r's Legal Adviser, believes the treaty regime, including its rules, "contains the most detailed list of due process protections which has so far been promulgated; not bet-
2001]
FOURTEENTH WALDEMAR A. SOLF LECTURE
13
te r th a n t h e B ill of R i gh ts , bu t s o m e w h a t m o r e c o m p r e h en s ive a n d detailed."10 A mon g thos e protectio ns are rig hts to a speedy and p ubli c trial and to co nfron t witn es ses.
Neither d oub le jeop ardy n or t he u se o f anonymous witnesses are permitted.
The fact that the treaty requires trial by judges and not by jury is not surprising in an international criminal court that merges common and civil law practice.
It is well settled extradition practice to accept trial without jury outside the United States.
The difficulty that the treaty's procedures arguably present under the U.S. Constitution, n amely the Six th Amendment, is if the United States were to become a party to the treaty and an A meri can ci t izen commit s on U.S. te rritory g e n oc i de , cri m es ag a in s t humanity, or w ar crimes that meet the court's rigorous test of admissibility--a highly unlikely event.
The reality is that our own prosecutors would pounce on that individual so fast the International Criminal Court would never have a right under the Rome Treaty to investigate him.
We successfully negotiated the procedures that grant our own justice system maximum discretion to seize a case against any U .S. citizen, even if the crime is committed overseas, and if merited indict and prosecute him before an American jury.
We have it within our power not to permit extradition of an American citizen to the Court in violation of the Constituti on.Nor would the United States tolerate the International Court's misuse of its powers against American service members.
Imagine the long-term consequences for the Court if it were to leap over the safegu ard s already lo ck ed i nto th e treaty reg ime and ab use its authority against our service members.
Anyone can paint a worst-case scenario that defies the entire construct of the treaty regime and the internatio nal p oli tical sy stem; b ut n o on e can dis co un t th e s ign ificance of th e probable consequences of an extreme course of action on those who must make the decisions and then live with them.
Where do we go from here? There are some who believe we should bl un tl y o pp os e or at l east be b elli geren t t ow ards th e Rom e Treat y an d effectively nullify the U.S. signature.
I have heard it said that my signature of the treaty on behalf of the United States should be scratched out.
It is 10.
Letter from Monroe Leigh, Former Legal Advisor to Secretary of State Henry Kissinger, to Editor, The Washington Times (D ec. 30, 2000), in Proposed International Court Will Protect Civil Liberties, WASH.
TIMES, Dec. 30, 2000, at A12.
14
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
certainly possible that Washington could emphasize the treaty's flaws, discourage others from signing or ratifying it, and punish those that are or will be parties to the treaty.
But we would look foolish and intimidated, discredit our proud allegiance to the laws of war, and invite a firestorm of fore i gn c ounte r a tta c k s tha t would ne e d le ssly u nde r m ine the B u sh Admin istration 's evolv ing fo reign policy.
O ur friends and allies wo uld stare down any American effort to k ill the treaty.
Given other overseas challenges, particularly with Europe and Russia, the Administration would be was ting valu ab le po liti cal capi tal.
It s ow n hu man righ ts in itiat ives, wherever they may be targeted, w ould suffer from an initial credibility gap.
The current Administratio n strategy is to sustain a s mall, technical presence in the New York talks solely for the purpose of engaging in discussio ns on th e crime o f aggressio n as th ey affect ou r ow n int erests.
I respectfully submit that the rest of the world will not be impressed and will soldier on drafting documents of central importance to the operation of the Court.
The effectiveness of our voice in the aggression discussions may be deg rad ed by o u r lack o f co mm it men t t o th e m yri ad of o t her is su es before the Preparatory Commission, so many of which in fact are critical to U.S. interests.
Pursuing our ow n interests in multilateral negotiations mean s p ayi ng att ent io n to an d facil it ati ng th e in terest s o f ot hers wh en those interests do not undermine ours.
I sometimes found my colleagues from other agencies proposing strategies that would be suitable for bilateral negotiations, where the United States might have considerable leverage, but would be of limited relevance in multilateral settings.
I believe w e should engage constructively in th e Preparatory Commission neg otiation s to protect our interests, build a credible court, and overcome flaws by pressing reasonable proposals that other governments can embrace without having to reverse their long-standing support for the treaty.
A major aim of U.S. signature of the treaty was to strengthen our negotiating hand, not immobilize it.
In coming months talks will continue on the crime of aggression and how parties to the treaty will oversee the operation of the Court.
On the crime of aggression, we must prevail.
We have repeatedly stated our position, which we are not alone in expressing, and we must continue to press for the proper definition and trigger for the crime of aggression.
I thought last December we were making progress, but it was tough going.
E very effort to specify some other delegation's pref erre d laundry list of a cts of a ggression evoked e qually im portant efforts to list th e exceptions to the crime.
Months and perhaps years of talks confront governments on this issue.
We will far better protect our sol-
2001]
FOURTEENTH WALDEMAR A. SOLF LECTURE
15
diers and citizens by engaging on all fronts in this often-tedious struggle for law than we will if we sit on the sidelines or futilely hector our allies.
The United States should leverage its new status as a signatory nation to prevail with the treaty-friendly proposals, one of which I have already discussed, that the United States already introduced last year and can be debated in the Preparatory Commission this year, if not for the Relationship Agreement then perhaps for another supplemental agreemen t.Other governments have not rejected them and they hold considerable promise.
If the United States exhibits an anemic presence at the U.N. talks, we will forfeit perhaps the last opportunity we have in the Preparatory Commission to better protect our interests.
There are other steps that the United States should take unilaterally.
First, both critics and supporters of the Court should find common cause in amending the federal criminal code (Title 18) and the Uniform Code of Military J ustice (Ti tle 10 ) to en sure that crimes under th e treaty can b e fully prosecuted in U.S. courts.
Current codes are simply out-dated and may deprive us of our first line of defense.
An inter-agency task force was reviewing U.S. law to draw up recommendations when I left office.
I sincere ly hope that its work c ontinues a n d result s in le gi sla tion cre ati ng greater symmetry between U.S. law and the crimes and punishments specified in the Rome Treaty.
We do not want to invite a situation where the ICC concludes that the United States is unable to investigate and prosecute a particular individual because our legal codes do not include that individual's alleged offense as a crime punishable under U.S. law.
The U.S. delegation negotiated and accepted only what we, as a government, believe are actionable crimes under international criminal law.
We insisted on the Elements of Crimes, and led the negotiations of th at document for two years to a successful conclusion last June, because w e had to be certain the crimes are legitimate, actionable crimes.
But now w e must be certain we can easily turn either to Title 18 or to the UCMJ and identify therein an identical or near-identical crime.
We must be able to represent credibly that we have the ability to exercise our complementarity right and, if the evidence so requires, prosecute our own in our own courts.
In this vein, serious academic work has already begun, including important scholarship by Northwestern University Law Professor Douglass Cassel, who has set the stage for serious work on Title 18 and the UCMJ in his publications.11
16
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
The Uniform Code of Military Justice does not specifically address crimes against humanity or genocide as crimes, but it does allow for prosecution of the underlying criminal conduct.
12 Nor does all positive internati onal hu m anitari an law reside in the UCM J as war c rim es .
I have serious concerns whether that will be sufficiently persuasive to the judges or the prosecutor of the International Criminal Court, each of whom will be looking for more explicitly stated crimes analogous to those set forth in Articles 5, 6, 7, and 8 of the Rome Treaty.
Regarding federal law, the crime of genocide covers only U.S. nationals (committing genocide anywhere) or genocide within the United States (by anyone).13 Crimes against humanity are the least effectively implemen t ed b y d o me st ic law.
T h ere i s n o s u bs ta nt i ve crim in al s ta tu te fo r crimes against humanity per se, though various federal and state criminal statutes would allow punishment of criminal conduct constituting crimes ag a i nst hum an ity ( for e x a m ple, tort ur e, ra pe, kidna pping, o r var i ous assaults).
With respect to war crimes, the rule generally has been that only when Congress declares war are civilians accompanying the U.S. Armed Forces subject to the UCMJ. 14 The Military and Extraterritorial Jurisdiction Act of 20 00 now p rov ides ju risd icti on over felo nies committed by civilians accompanyin g the A rmed Fo rces o utside the U nited States at all t imes, even when Congress has not declared war.15 There are also statutes of limitations under Titles 10 and 18 that are far too limited and could compel the International Criminal Court to con11.
See, e.g., Douglas Cassel, Empowering United States Courts to Hear Crimes Within the Jurisd ictio n of the Internation al Crim inal C ourt, 35 NEW E NG. L .
REV. 393 (2001 ); Dou glass Ca ssel, The ICC's New Leg al Lan dscape : T he Ne ed to E xpand U.S. Domestic Jurisdiction to Prosecute Genocide, War Crimes, and Crimes Against Humanity, 23 FORDHAM INT'L L.J. 378 (1999); Douglass Cassel, The Rome Treaty for an International Criminal Court: A Flawed but Essential First Step, 6 BROWN J. WORLD AFF. 41 (1999).
12.
See Major Jan E. Aldykiewicz 
13.
18 U.S.C.  1091 (2000).
14.
See Captain Mark E. Eichelman, International Criminal Jurisdiction Issues for the United States Military, ARMY LAW., Aug. 2000, at 24-26.
15.
Military and Extraterritorial Jurisdiction A ct of 2000, 18 U.S.C.  3261-3267 (2000).
See generally Captain Glenn R. Schmitt, The Military Extraterritorial Jurisdiction Act: The Continuing Problem of Criminal Jurisdiction over Civilians Accompanying the Armed Forces Abroad--Problem Solved?, ARMY L AW. Dec. 2000, at 1.
2001]
FOURTEENTH WALDEMAR A. SOLF LECTURE
17
clude that investigation is warranted simply because our domestic statute of limitations has run its course.16 These sections of the federal codes must be revised to reflect the crimes that need to be more explicitly stated in the codes and the reality of Article 29 of the Rome Treaty, which states: "The crimes within the jurisdiction of the Court shall not be subject to any statute of limitations."
17 In a related initiative, when the Court begins to operate, the President should ap point a commission of experts to monitor fed eral and military courts exercising our rights under the treaty to investigate and prosecute our own.
This may shock those of you who would balk at any so-called oversight of our military court system.
What I have in mind is fairly modest.
There w ould be no pow er to intervene in or question the actions of military courts.
But the commission should have the authority to advise federal and military prosecutors, and perhaps through a transparent process the judges, about the experts' own views on whether the United States is pro perly ex erci sin g it s comp lemen tarity ri gh ts u nder th e Rome Treaty, even as a non-party.
Demonstrating our competence and willingness to exercise nation al ob ligatio ns wou ld dis co urag e scrutiny b y the Int ernational Court, and the commission of experts w ould heighten that sense of confidence in our system by the ICC prosecutor and judges.
Further unilateral steps we should take include exploring the protections our Status of Forces Agreements (SOFA) already provide consistent with the treaty.
I am not speaking here of re-opening SOFAs to accomplish this objective.
Nor do I underestimate the argument that treaty proponents may make that ICC jurisdiction is a freestanding, independent right that the Receiving State could exercise in its own discretion by transferring persons to the ICC, even in the face of a SOFA provision.
But when the U.S. delegat ion s uccessful ly n eg oti at ed the in clus ion o f A rticle 98 (2 ) i n th e Rome Treaty, we had in mind our own SOFAs and their applicability.
Article 98(2) states: "The Court may not proceed with a request for surrender which would require the requested State to act inconsistently w ith its obligations under international agreements pursuant to which the consent of a sending State is required to surrender a person of that State to the Court, unless the Court can first obtain the cooperation of the sending State for the giving of consent for the surrender."18 There are arguments waiting to 16.
See, e.g., 10 U.S.C.  843(b) (2000) (five years); 18 U.S.C.  3282 (five years for non-capital offenses).
17.
Rome Statute, supra note 4, art.
29.
18.
Id. art.
98(2).
18
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
be plucked in our SOFAs and in Article 98(2) that would ensure American service members are not surrendered to the Court.
Perhaps more importantly, even as a non-party, under Artic we can negotiate agreements with other governments that would any American being surrendered to the ICC from their respective tion s w itho ut our con sen t.
As a sign ato ry state, w e are now in stronger position to negotiate such freestanding agreements.
le 98(2) prevent jurisdica m uc h
I would further suggest that a time may well arrive w hen the United States could negotiate with the Court directly an Article 98(2) agreement that would protect American service members from surrender provided, most likely, the U nited States made certain commitments to the Court in terms of the proper and complete exercise of complementarity by American authorities and in terms of support for and cooperation with the Court, including, perhaps, ratification of the Rome Treaty that would lock in the all-important U.S. financial support.
Rule 195(2) of the Rules of Procedure and Evidence, 19 which we proposed and which was adopted by consensus last June, in my opinion offers the possibility of such an agreement.
We s ho u ld no t l o se s ig ht o f th e furt her pro tect io ns t hat th e treat y grants governments that ratify it.
These include avoidin g any exp osure whatsoever to war crimes charges for an initial seven years, which if chosen by the United States would afford us more time to evaluate the competency and fairness of the Court as its most powerful State Party.20 As a State Party, the United States would be entitled to opt out of any exposure by the Court to the crime of aggression forever.21 Given the reality of the use of U.S. military force, a reality that typically evokes groundless but nonetheless troublesome charges of aggression from our detractors, this right to opt out is significant.
Ratification also w ould permit the United Stat es to part ici pat e in th e o vers ig h t, s taffi ng , an d man agem ent of t h e International Criminal Court, as well as enable a U.S. citizen to serve as a judge.
Given our experience with the ad hoc International Criminal Tribunals, these are not insubstantial privileges.
In conclusion, there are many who understandably fear misuse of the International Criminal Court against the U nited States despite our strong judicial system, our compliance with the laws of w ar, and the leverage w e 19.
Draft Rules, supra note 7, R. 195(2).
20.
Rome Statute, supra note 4, art.
124.
21.
Id. art.
121(5).
2001]
FOURTEENTH WALDEMAR A. SOLF LECTURE
19
have when we lead.
Whether this fear is real or illusory, the United States has renewed credibility as a signatory to play a major role in preventing misuse and in achieving the international justice we so firmly uphold.
We forfeit that opportunity at our peril.
Thank you.
20
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY: DOMESTIC JURISDICTION CONSISTENT WITH THE ROME STATUTE OF THE INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL COURT L IEUTENANT
C
OLONEL
M
ICHAEL
A. N
EWTON1
The crimes you committed, General Blaskic, are extremely serious.
The acts of war carried out with disregard for international hu m an it ar ia n la w a nd in ha tred of ot her peo pl e, th e vill ag es re duc e d t o r ubble , t h e hous e s an d s t able s se t on fi r e and destroyed, the people forced to abandon their homes, the lost and brok en li ve s are unacc eptable .
Th e in ternational co mmunity must not tolerate such crimes, no matter where they may be perpetrated, no matter who the perpetrators are and no matter what the reasons for them may be.
If armed conflict is unavoidable, those who have the power to take decisions and those who carry them out must ensure that the most basic rules governing the law of nations are respected.
International courts, today this Tribu1.
Judge A dvocate General's Corps, United States Arm y. Presently participating in the Advanced Civil Schooling program as a student at the University of Virginia School of La w. B. S.,1 984 , U nit ed Sta tes Militar y A ca dem y ; J.D ., 199 0, Un ive rsity o f Virg inia School of Law; LL.M. 1996, The Judge Advocate General's School, United States Army, Charlottesville, Virginia.
Served as Special Advisor to the United States Ambassador-atLarge for War C rim es Issues, U nited States Departm ent of State .
A s a m ember of the United States delegation to the Preparatory Commission on the Establishment of an International Criminal Court after adoption of the Rome Statute, Lieutenant Colonel Newton assisted with drafting and negotiating the Elements of Cri mes for each offense required by Article 9 of th e R ome Statute .
Cu rrently ass igned to the United States Arm y S tudent Detachment, Fort Jackson, South Carolina.
Formerly assigned as Professor, International and Opeational Law Department, The Judge Advocate General's School, Charlottesville, Virginia, 1996-1999; Brigade Judge Advocate, 194th Armored B rigade (Separate), Fort Knox, Kentucky, 1993-1995; Chief, Operations and International Law, Administrative Law Attorney, United States Army Special Fo rces C omm and (Airborne), Fort Bragg, No rth Carolina, 1990-1993; Group Judge Advocate, 7th Special Forces Group (Airborne), Fort Bragg, N orth C arolin a, 1992; Fu nded L egal Edu catio n Program , 1987-1 990; Battalion Support Platoon Leader, Com pany Executive Officer, Platoon Leader, 4th Battalion, 68th Armor, Fort Carson, Colorado, 1984-1987.
This article is based on a work sub mitted by the author to satisfy, in part, the Master of Laws requirements for the University of Virginia School of Law.
The author is particularly grateful for the comments of Paul Stephan and Kimberly Shaw on the draft of this article.
Lieutenant Colonel Newton may be reached by e-mail at newtonm j@msn.com.
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
21
nal, tomorrow the International Criminal Court, must appropriately punish all those, and especially those holding the highest positions, who transgress these principles.
--Judge Claude Jorda's statement announcing the findings and sentencing of General Tihomir Blaskic2
I. Introduction Th e o ng oin g di plo matic and p olit ical effo rt s to create the International Criminal Court (ICC) are forever altering the landscape of the international community and the face of international law.
The Chairman of the Drafting Committee working on the negotiations towards the Rome Statute of the Internation al Criminal Court 3 (Rome Statute) proclaimed that 2.
Prosecutor v. Blaskic, No.
IT-95-14, para. 103 (Mar. 3, 2000) (Summary of Judgement), at http://www.un.org/icty/judgement.htm .
General Blaskic was sentenced to fortyfive years for his crimes, which is the longest sentence adjudged by the International Criminal Tribunal for the Former Yugoslavia at the time of this writing.
Id. 3.
Rome Statute of the International Criminal Court, U.N. Doc. A/CONF.183/9 (1998) (United Nations Diplomatic Conference of Plenipotentiaries on the Establishment of an International Crim inal Court, July 17, 1998), reprinted in 37 I.L.M. 998 (1998) [hereinafter Rom e Statute].
The Chairman of the Drafting Committee was the distinguished professor of law at DePaul University and renowned commentator on international criminal law, M. Cherif Bassiouni.
The concept of a "statute," termed as such in international law, is in itself a recent and noteworthy development.
During recent testim ony to Congress, Ambassador David J. Scheffer, head of the United States delegation to the ICC negotiations and the subsequent Preparatory Com mission negotiations on the Rules of Evidence and Procedure and Elements of Crimes, explained the term as follows: When one speaks of creating a court on an international level, it has to have to som e governing document for the functioning of that court.
And as w ith th e Yugo slav tribun al an d th e R wa nda tribu nal, the S ecu rity Council adopted statutes or a statute for each tribunal, which is its constitution, basically, the court's own constitution, the basic principles by which the court must function.
It is simply a term of art that has arisen in the international sphere, and during th e talks for the IC C, it is that basic constitutional document of the court itself which is described as the statute.
The treaty itself, when ratified, em bodies that statute.
And I guess that the best I can say is that it's simply, in U.N. practice, once you have ratified the treaty per se, you are also, of course, adopting as part of that ratification practice or package the statute of the court itself.
Ambassador David J. Scheffer, Statement Before the House International Relations Committee (July 26, 2000), available at LEXIS, Federal News Service.
22
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
"[t]he w orld will never be the same after the establishment of an international criminal court."4 Indeed, as th e Ro me Conference began , formal adoption of a foundational document was widely considered to be impossible.5 After five w eeks of intense debate, the final text emerged as a takeit -o r-lea ve- it "p ack age " th at h ad be en cob b le d t o get h er b eh in d clo s ed doors during the middle of the night.
The leaders of the Rome Conference completed the final text at two o'clock in the morning of the last day of the conference, Friday, 17 July 1998.6 Far from achieving consensus, the final text postulated solutions to some drafting questions that delegates had been unable to resolve, and went so far as to include a number of provisions that the conference Bureau 7 selected and presented to the floor without open debate on either the text itself or its substantive merits.
8 Seeking to prevent a collapse of the conference without a completed document, the delegates voted dow n amendments that the United States and India proposed to the Bureau's textual "package," whereupon the del4.
Professor M. Cherif Bassiouni, Address to the Ceremony for the Opening of Signature of the Treaty on the Establishment of an International Criminal Court, at Il Campidoglio, Rome (July 18, 1988).
5.
The starting point for the negotiations was a com plex text of 116 articles, 173 pages containing about 1300 bracketed and often-competing texts interspersed throughout, which included num erous options within each article.
See Report of the Preparatory Committee on the Establishment of an International C riminal Court, A/CO NF.183/2/ A dd.1 (1998) (Draft Statute and Draft Final Act).
6.
M. Cherif Bassiouni, Historical Survey: 1919-1998, in STATUTE OF THE INTERNATIONAL CRIM INAL COURT: A D OCUMENTARY HISTORY 1, 31 (1998) [hereinafter Historical Survey].
7.
The officers formally responsible for running the Rome Conference were collectively know n as the B ureau.
The Bureau included the President of the Conference, the Chairman of the Committee of the Whole, the Chairman of the Drafting Com mittee, and the various vice-presidents responsible for discrete com ponents of the negotiations.
The late evening discussions that produced the Bureau text did not include all of the members of the B ureau (as they excluded the U nited States), but included som e participants who w e re not m e m b ers of th e Bureau.
The Bureau proposal em erged as U .N .
D o c.
A / CONF.183/C.1/L.76 (1998), and was presented to the Committee of the Whole without furthe r m e etin gs o f th e Dr afti ng C om m itte e. T he C om m itt ee of the Wh ol e a do pte d the Bureau-sponsored "package" without modification.
For a discussion of some of the inconsistencies and contradictions that this highly unusual process produced in the Rome Statute, see Shabtai Rosenne, Poor Drafting and Imperfect Organization: Flaws to Overcome in the Rome Statute, 41 VA.
J.
I NT'L L. 164 (2000), and Michael A .
Newton, The International Criminal Court Preparatory Commission: The Way It Is 
J. INT'L L. 204 (2000).
8.
William K. Lietzau, Comments to the Panel on the International Criminal Court: Contem porary Perspectives and Prospects for Ratification, 16 N.Y.L. SCH. J. H UM. RTS 512, 514 (2000).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
23
egates burst into spontaneous applause, which transitioned into rhythmic app lause that continued for some time.9 By th e late evening of 17 July 1998, the delegates in Rome were caught up in a wave of jubilation and euphoria as they adopted the Rome Statute by a vote of 120 to seven, with twenty-one abstentions.10 For the proponents of the Rome Statute, the reality that it was adopted only by abandoning the historic diplomatic practice of consensus is immaterial.
Many ardent treaty supporters and the non-governmental organizations (NGOs) that pushed for the Rome Statute ignore its structural flaws and view it as a triumph of international aspiration over the political and pragmatic realities of the international system that have prevented the evolution of an effective and permanent international criminal court since the end of World War I.11 Seen in the best possible light, the Rome Statute represents the hope of governments from all around the world that the force of international law can restrain the evil impulses that have stained history with the blood of millions of innocent victims.12 Thus, from this perspective, its hasty adoption in the last hours of the Rome Conference was warrant ed d esp it e the fact th at th e co mpl ex s ub st ant iv e in terface of t reaty provisions was never wholly debated or analyzed in depth until after the adoption of the Rome Statute.
9.
Historical Survey, supra note 6, at 31.
10.
Leila Nadya Sadat 
381 (2000).
For an excellent summary of the negotiating dynamic in Rome that resulted in the current Statute, see Ruth Wedgewood, Fiddling in R om e: A m erica and the Inte rnatio nal Crim ina l C ourt , FOREI GN A FF. 2 0 ( Nov.-D ec. 1998).
11.
See generally M. Cherif Bassiouni, From Versailles to Rwanda in Seventy-Five Years: The Need to Establish a Permanent International Criminal Court , 10 HARV.
HUM. RTS. J. 11 (1997); Historical Survey, supra note 6; Leila Sadat Wexler, The Proposed International Criminal Court: An Appraisal, 29 CORNE LL INT 'L L.J. 665 (1996); B ENJAMIN B. FERENCZ, AN INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL COURT: A STEP TOWARD WORLD PEACE--A DOCUMENTARY H ISTORY AND ANALYSIS (1980).
12.
Some observers estimate 170 million dead in 250 conflicts since the end of World War II.
Sadat 
See, e.g. , RUDOLPH J. RUMMELL, D EATH BY GOVERNMENT (1994); RUDOLPH J. RUMMELL, POWER KILLS: DEMOCRACY AS A METHOD OF N ONVIOLENCE (1997); JOHN N ORTON M OORE, L AW AND C IVIL WAR IN THE M ODERN WORLD (1974).
24
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
In a very real sense, the proscriptions against genocide, crimes against humanity, and violations of the laws and customs of war contained in Article 5 of the Rome Statute13 embody the highest ideal of all legal systems that law can replace raw power as the defining norm of international relations.
Nevertheless, the Rome Statute elevates principle above practicality because its adoption was not accompanied by any resolution of the details for establishing an effective supranational judicial forum.
For example, in adopting the Rome Statute without the support of the United States, treaty proponents failed to consider a viable formula for funding the ICC.
Thus, without an active policy of support to the ICC and funding from both the Un it ed St ates an d J apan , on e NG O es ti mates that th e E u ro pean U nio n could be resp on sible fo r funding up to 78.
17% of the total co st of the ICC.14 Fu rthermore, th e last-min ute ad option o f the Rome Statute glossed over the inherent tension between an international forum with compulsory criminal jurisdiction over individuals who commit crimes at the express command of natio nal au tho rit ies, o r at the very leas t whi le fun ct ioni ng under the official authority of a sovereign state, and the political necessity fo r sov ereign states to supp ort s uch a co urt. Th ough th e concept of an international criminal court can be traced back to the Middle A ges, and evo l ved th ro ug h th e th in k in g o f th e cl ass ical in te rn at io nal w rit ers an d jurists of the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries,15 the stone walls of soverei gn ri gh ts and st at e co ns ent s erv ed as "co nst rai nin g facto rs ," wh ich r e s t r i c t e d the " p r e sc r i bi ng, i nvo ki ng , a n d a p p l y i n g of i n t e r n a t io na l norms."16 Although the delegates to the Rome Conference unanimously agreed that national jurisdictions have primary responsibility for investigatin g and pro secuting the crimes enumerated in Article 5 of th e Ro me Stat ute, th ey s tro ve to est ab lish an international jud icial in stitut ion that 13.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
5.
14.
Project on International Courts and Tribunals, Financing of the International Criminal Court, annex III (undated discussion paper distributed at the meeting of the Preparatory Com mission in June 2000) (on file with author) (Hypothetical Scale of Assessment for the ICC).
It is difficult to envision the day when the governments of the European Union will meet this huge financial obligation, despite their stated fidelity to the goals of the ICC. 15.
Quincy Wright, Proposal for an International Criminal Court, 46 AM.
J. INT'L L. 60 (1952).
16.
JUSTICE ROSALYN HIGGINS, PROBLEMS AND PROCESS: INTERNATIONAL LAW AND HOW WE USE IT 1 (1994).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
25
would allow supranational justice and accountability to pierce the shield of unconstrained sovereignty.17 Indeed, the very impetus for a permanent ICC arose from the numerous instances in which powerful perpetrators18 ignored established intern a ti on a l no r m s wi th im pu ni ty.
The p e nu lt im a t e v o t e s a t th e R o m e Conference came about only as a reaction against the historic practice of tyrants who warped domestic legal mechanisms into tools for imp osing their will.
Adolf Hitler, for example, imposed the Fuehrerprinzip (leadership principle) in order to exercise his will as supreme through the police, the courts, and all other institutions of civilized society.19 Through the lens of absolute state sovereign ty, efforts by one state to establish individu al accountability over nationals of another state for violations of international crimes were frequently derided for using the figleaf of justice to legitimize the expressions of raw political power over the perpetrator.
Thus, when given a copy of his indictment before the International Military Tribunal at Nuremberg, Herman Gring stroked the phrase "[t]he victor will always be the judge and the vanquished the accused" across its cover.20 Logically, an effective supranational court should function as a fallback forum to prosecute individuals who commit crimes while in the service of authoritarian regimes that ignore the binding norms of international law.
Those regimes are the most prone to commit the crimes within the jurisdiction of the ICC, and yet those same states could previously invoke prin cipl es of so verei gn ty to prot ect their n at ion als from p ro secut ion in their domestic judicial forums.
At the conclusion of the Rome Conference, treaty supporters concluded that an effective ICC cou ld not rest the full 17.
Bruce Broomhall, The International Crim inal Court: A Checklist for National Im plementation, in IC C RATIFICATION AND NATIONAL IMPL EME NTING LEG ISLA TION 113, 115 (M. Cherif Bassiouni ed., 1999) [hereinafter Broom hall, Checklist].
18.
A fter extensive debate over the relative merits of the term s "perpetrator" or "accused," the delegates to the Preparatory Com mission (PrepComm) ultimately agreed to use the former in the finalized draft text of the Elements of Crimes, U.N. Doc. PCNICC/ 2000/INF/3/Add.2 (2000).
19.
DREXEL A. SPRECHER, INSIDE THE NUREMBERG TRIAL: A PROSECUTOR 'S COMPREHENSIVE A CCOUNT 1037-38.
According to this principle, power resided in Hitler, from whom subordinates derived absolute authority in hierarchical order.
This principle required absolute and unconditional obedience to the superior and extended to all areas of public and private life.
The oath of the Nazi Party stated: "I owe inviolable fidelity to Adolf Hitler; I vow absolute obedience to him and to the leaders he designates for me."
Id. at 157.
20.
JOSEPH E. P ERSICO, INFAMY ON TRIAL 83 (1994).
For another articulation of this highly debatable proposition, see RICHARD H. MINEAR, VICTORS' JUSTICE: THE TOKYO WAR CRIMES TRIAL (1971).
26
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
extent of its judicial power on the consent of a state because regimes that ignore the rule of law would be virtually certain not to submit their nationals to the jurisdiction of the court.
Hence, the final "package" that became the Rome Statute bypassed the traditional rule of international law that a treaty "does not create obligations or rights for a third [s]tate w ithout its consent."21 To attain the goal of international justice, Article 1 of the Rome Statute promulgates in simple lan guag e that th e co urt will "be a permanent institution and shall have the power to exercise its jurisdiction over persons for the most serious crimes of international concern . . . and shall be comple m en tar y to n at i on al c r im ina l ju ri sdic ti ons ."
22 T h e Ro me St at u t e nowhere defines the term "complementarity," but the plain text of Article 1 compels the conclusion that the International Criminal Court is intended to supplement the foundation of domestic punishment of international violations, rather than supplant domestic enforcement of international norms.
Indeed , the principle that states are obligated to use domestic forums to punish violations of international law has roots that run back to the ideas of Hugo Grotius.23 As early as 1842, Secretary of State D aniel Webster articulated the idea that a nation's sovereignty also entails "the strict and faith ful observance of all those prin ciples, laws, and usages which hav e obtained currency among civilized states, and which have for their object the mitigation of the miseries of war."24 The co m plem entarity princi ple is th e fu lcr um that prior itizes the authority of domestic forums to prosecute the crimes defined in Article 5 of the Rome Statute.
Phrased another way, the complementarity principle is intended to preserve the power of the ICC over irresponsible states that refuse to prosecute nationals who commit heinous international crimes, but balances that supranational power against the sovereign right of states to 21.
See Vienna Convention on the Law of Treaties, May 23, 1969, U.N. Doc. A/ CONF. 39/27, art.
34, reprinted in 8 I.L.M. 679 (1969).
The logical corollary to this rule (which the Rome Statute disregards) is that a multilateral instrum ent binds a state that does not ratify the treaty only when the third party "expressly accepts that obligation in writing."
Id. art.
35.
22.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
1 (emphasis added).
Article 1 echoes the pream bular language of the Rome Statute in which the signatories affirm that effective prosecution of international crimes "must be ensured by taking measures at the national level and by enhancing international cooperation."
23.
RICHARD TUCK, THE RIGHTS OF WAR AND PEACE: POLITICAL THOUGHT AND THE INTERNATIONAL ORDER F ROM GROTIUS TO KANT 108, 228 (1999).
See infra notes 47-49 and accom panying text.
24.
JOHN BASSETT MOORE, 1 A DIGEST OF INTE RNATIONAL L AW 5-6 (1906).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
27
prosecute their own nationals without external interference.
The complementarity principle is therefore the critical node in ascertaining w hether the ICC will trample on the sovereign prerogatives of states, or will coexist in a constructive and beneficial relationship with all nations.
The monumental and controversial development in the Rome Statute is that the proponents of international justice established a framework for a supranational court that enshrines the principle that state sovereignty can on occasion be subordinated t o th e goal of achievin g acco untability fo r violations of international humanitarian law.25 Indeed, one commentator in Rome declared that "outmoded n otions o f state so vereign ty must not derail the forward movement" which seeks to achieve international peace and order.26 Th e co mp lex b lend of civ il law, com mon law, cu st omary international law, and sui generis that combine in the Rome Statute is held together by the notion that the sovereign nations of the world are joined, not as competitors in the pursuit of sovereign self interest, but as interde25.
See Rom e Statute, supra note 3, arts.
12-19.
The extension of unchecked international prosecutorial and judicial power over sovereign concerns is one of the primary reason s the Un ited S tates rem ains unw illing to g o fo rward w ith th e R om e S ta tute " in its present form ."
David J. Scheffer, The United States and the International Criminal Court, 93 AM.
J. INT'L L. 14, 21 (1999).
The United States has rejected a policy of benign neglect, and at the time of this writing is engaged in a good faith effort to address its fundamental underlying jurisdictional concerns with the Rome Statute.
The United States participated fully in the Preparatory Commissions subsequent to the Rom e Conference, and it joined international consensus on the Final Draft Rules of Evidence and Procedure and the Final Draft Elem ents of Crimes on 30 June 2000.
Draft Rules of Evidence, U.N. Doc. PCNICC/ 20001/Add.1; Draft Elements of Crimes, U.N. Doc.
PCNICC /2001/A dd.2, available at http://www.un.org/law/icc/index.html.
On 31 December 2000, which was the last day permitted by the treaty, Ambassador Scheffer signed the Rome Statute at the direction of President Clinton.
See Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
125(1) (stipulating that states may accede to the Statute at a later time, but that signatures to the treaty are permitted only until 31 Decem ber 2000).
The White House statem ent clarified that President Clinton ordered the signature because the United States seeks to "remain engaged in m aking the ICC an instrum ent of impartial and effective justice in the years to come."
President William J. Clinton, Statement by the President: Signature of the International Crim inal Court Treaty (Dec. 31, 2000), 2001 WL 6008.
The President's statem ent makes clear that the United States signature should not be interpreted as an abandonment of concerns "about significant flaw s in the Treaty."
Id. Rather, the signature reflects a strategic decision that the United States "will be in a position to influence the evolution" of the rem aining documents in the treaty regime, while "[w]ithout signature, we will not."
Id. 26.
Benjam in Ferencz, Address to the United Nations Diplomatic Conference of Plenipotentiaries on the Establishment of the International Criminal Court (June 16, 1998), at http:www.un.org/icc/speeches/616ppc.htm.
28
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
pen dent comp on ents of a larger gl ob al civi l so ciety.27 In ot her wo rds, treaty proponents see the creation of a supranational court empowered to ove r rid e th e un fe tte re d di sc re tion o f som e sta t e s as a n ov er due ste p towards a uniform system of responsibility designed to "promote values fundamental to all democratic and peace-loving states."
28 As noted a bove , the Ro m e Confe ren ce c onc lude d with a r u sh of momentum towards an international court empowered to impose international law on individual citizens of sovereign nations, even when that state does not consent to the exercise of supranational power over its nationals.
The term "complementarity" is a newly minted phrase that builds on the well-established practice of nations enforcing international law.
Part II of this article assesses these jurisprudential roots.
Part II also examines the practi ce of th e tw o ad ho c trib un als es tab lis hed by the U n ited Nat io ns Security Council in recent years.
These currently functioning international tribunals are built on the foundations laid by domestic legal systems, and their experience helps clarify the implementation of complementarity in a functioning, effective International Criminal Court.
The Intern ati onal Crimin al Co urt is in tended to be an aut onomo us supranatio nal ins titution that possesses in ternational legal perso nality.29 As such, it will be required to work alongside sovereign states in a wide array of investigative, prosecutorial, and administrative activities.30 Part III of this article highlights the process and dynamic in Rome that undergirds the formulation of Article 1, and will examine the provisions of the Rom e Statu te d esi gn ed to mak e co mp lemen tarit y a v iabl e app roach to international justice.
Part III concludes with an analysis of the recently completed Final D raft Rules of Evidence and Procedure that impact on the complementarity principle.
Having examined the textual formulations revolving around the concept of complementarity, Part IV d iscuss es the potential g aps and u nre27.
Sadat 
28.
Bartram S. Brown, Primacy or Complementarity: Reconciling the Jurisdiction of National Courts and International Tribunals, 23 YALE J. INT'L L. 383, 436 (1998) [hereinafter Brown, Primacy or Complementarity].
29.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
4(1).
For mal recognition of international legal personality will allow the ICC as an organization created by states to enter into negotiations on its own behalf, conclude binding international agreements, claim im munity for its officials in the sam e m anner as accredited diplomats, and appear as a plaintiff or defendant before the International Court of Justice.
GERHARD VON GLAHN, LAW A MONG N AT IONS 86 (4th ed. 1981).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
29
solved procedural issues that could thwart the actual practice of the ICC prosecutor.
One of the most important benchmarks in any future prosecution before the International Criminal Court will be the actual decision to transfer responsibility for prosecuting a particular perpetrator to the standing supranational institution from a domestic system that could otherwise exercise jurisdiction over the crime.
Despite its simple formulation, the concept of complementarity represents the focal point of tension between the proponents of the Rome Statute and those who regard its provisions as an unjustified and illegal subversion of sovereign rights.
Th e p r in c i p l e o f c o m p le m e nt a r ity is th e li nc h p i n f o r a s s e ss in g whether t he "last majo r internat ional institu tion established in this century"31 will become a functioning reality or an international absurdity.
It is plain that the Rome Statute stands for the proposition that accountability for war crimes "cannot be achieved without impinging upon the traditional crimin al j uris di ct io n o f s tates ."32 Th e pri ncip le o f co mpl ement arity is therefore the bridge that carries the weight of the Rome Statute.
The next ten to twenty years will demo nstrate w hether the International Criminal Court can ero de t he principl es o f st at e so vereig nty w ith out it self b ei ng swept away by a b ackl ash o f ind ifference and o utright opp ositi on from sovereign states.
This article concludes that implementation of the complemen tarity principle w ill be the decisive factor in either preventing or enhan cing t he concept o f p erm an ent su pranati onal ju sti ce th at coexis ts with state sovereignty in the interests of international peace and security.
30.
See generally Rome Statute, supra note 3, arts.
86-102 (term ed Part 9 International Cooperation and Judicial Assistance, this section of the Rome Statute sets out complex procedural and substantive standards for the relations between states and the ICC in such matters as arrests, transfer of suspects, evidentiary matters, and the interface between state obligations pursuant to binding international agreements and the ICC).
Complementarity in the ICC Statute is intended to apply beyond the mere allocation of jurisdictional au thori ty by givi ng effect to t hi s w h ol e ra nge of sove re ign choi ce s as a l im it t o t he unchecked power of the ICC and prosecutor.
Brown, Primacy or Complementarity, supra note 28, at 417 (citing a United Kingdom position paper for the proposition that the "intention is that all proper decisions by national authorities in connection with matters of interest to the ICC should be respected by the ICC and that no action should be taken in such cases."
Id. at 417 n.177).
See also Broom hall, Checklist, supra note 17.
31.
See Barbara Crossette, World Criminal Court Having a Painful Birth, N.Y.
TIME S, Aug. 13, 1997, at A5 (quoting William Pace, Head of the NGO C oalition for an International Criminal Court).
32.
Brow n, Primacy or Complementarity, supra note 28, at 434.
30
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
II.
Jurisprudential Roots of Complementarity The discipline of international criminal law33 springs from the intersection of two legal traditions that are separate yet interrelated.
The criminal aspects of international law are historically and juridically intertwined with the inter n a t io nal as pe c t s of na tiona l c rim ina l la w. Th e cr imin al aspects of international law can be traced to a variety of sources in which the nations of the world united to criminalize certain conduct under established international norms.34 Prohibitions against piracy 35 and slavery36 are tw o o f th e earl i es t su b s ta nt i v e i n ter na ti o n al cri me s th at o v er ti m e became subject to the universal jurisdiction of all states.37 Crimes typically evolved as a matter of customary international law, which in turn was codified in binding international conventions.
Si nce di scussions concerning a perma nen t In tern at ional C rim in al Court began,38 the challenge to the international community has been to distill a practical formula for reconciling or prioritizing the jurisdictional clai ms between an emergin g sup ranatio nal instit utio n an d the domesti c 33.
Though com monly used by scholars and practitioners in this field, the concept of a distinct discipline termed "international criminal law" is not universally accepted across the world.
See, e.g., Leslie C. Green, Is There an International Criminal Law?, 21 ALBERTA L. REV. 251 (1983).
In the context of negotiating the Elem ents of Crim es required by Article 9 of the Ro me Statute, some delegations vehemently argued that the concept of "interna t io na l c ri m in al l aw " it se lf w a s t oo il l-d e fi ne d t o w a rr an t i nc lu s io n in a d o cu m e nt designed to "assist the Court in the interpretation and application" of the norms defined in the Rome Statute.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
9(1).
Despite these concerns, the Final Draft Elements of Crimes, which were adopted by international consensus, includes the reminder in the chapeau language to the Article 7 crimes that the crimes against humanity provisions relate to "international criminal law" and accordingly "should be strictly construed."
U.N. Doc. PCNICC/2000/INF/3/Add.2.
34.
M. Cherif Bassiouni, The Penal Characteristics of Conventional International Criminal Law, in INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL L AW AND P ROCEDURE 27 (John Dugard 
35.
See ALFRED P. R UBIN, THE L AW OF PIRACY (1988); M. CHERIF BASSIOUNI, CRIMES A GA I N S T H UMA N ITY IN IN TER NAT IONAL C R I MI NAL L AW 515 (2 d ed. 1999) [herei nafter BASSIOUNI, C RIME S AGAINST HUMANITY].
36.
Though piracy had been established as an international crime by the middle of the sixteenth century, the pecuniary advantages that the slave trade provided hindered the development of slavery from a moral prohibition to the status of a binding international crime.
M.Cherif Bassiouni, Enslavement as an International Crim e, 23 N.Y.U. J. INT'L L. 445 (1991).
The 1890 Convention Relative to the Slave-Trade and Importation into Africa of Firearms, Ammunition, and Spiritous Liquors was the major watershed in formalizing the criminal prohibition of slavery.
27 Stat. 886, 1 BEVANS 134.
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
31
forums that would otherwise have jurisdiction.
Paradoxically, the substantive norms of internatio nal crimin al law did n ot develop as a coex is tent component of the early efforts to develop the framework for an international criminal court.39 The articulation of a defined set of international offenses proceeded in separate negotiations for different reasons than the discussions over the development of an international criminal institution.
This lack of synchronization helps explain why the crimes proscribed in the Rome Statute do not replicate every act that is prohibited as a matter of international law.
Nevertheless, the judicial authority of domestic forums to impose criminal responsibility for serious violations of international law is an essential underpinning of the jurisprudential framework of the complementarity principle.
Similarly, the practice of the two currently functi on ing ad hoc tribunal s em po wered to prosecu te serious violat io ns of international humanitarian law40 helps foreshadow the reality of the difficulty th at t he ICC prosecuto r wi ll face in trans fo rmi ng the princip le o f complementarity into a pragmatic reality.
37.
Universal jurisdiction entails that class of activities that are the result of "universal condemnation" and "general interest in cooperating to suppress them."
RESTATEMENT (THIRD) OF THE FOREIGN RELATIONS LAW OF THE UNITED STATES  404 cmt. a (1986).
For a useful discussion of the debates (and ultimate rejection in Rome) over universal jurisdiction as a grounds for ICC authority to adjudicate certain cases, see Sada t 
Speaking of piracy, but clearly articulating the ideas underlying the basis for universal jurisdiction, the Permanent Court of International Justice wrote in the S.S. Lotus case: Piracy, by the law of nations, in its jurisdictional aspects, is sui generis.
Though statutes may provide for its punishment, it is an offense against the law of nations; and as the scene of the pirate's operations is the high seas, which is not the right or duty of any nation to police, he is denied the protection of the flag which he may carry, and is treated as an outlaw, as the enemy of all mankind--hostis humani generis--whom any nation may in the interest of all capture and punish . . . ."
1927 P.C.I.J. (series A) No. 10, at 70 (1927).
38.
See, e.g., Convention for the Creation of an International Criminal Court, opened for signature at G eneva, Nov. 16, 1937, League of Nations O.J. Spec. in Supp.
No. 156 (1 93 8) , L e ag ue o f N atio n s Do c. N o .
C .5 4 7(I ).M. 38 4( I) (1 93 7) ( thi s ea rly d isc us si on focused on an international court limited to enforcing the crime of terrorism, but this convention was only ratified by Italy and never entered into force).
See also Finch, Draft Statute for an International Court, 46 AM.
J. INT'L L. 60 (1952).
39.
Historical Survey, supra note 6, at 15.
32
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
A. Domestic Enforcement of International Crimes 1.
Legal foundations The ICC is intended to reinforce rather than overturn the well-established right of sovereign states to enforce international humanitarian law; the principle of complementarity embodies this linkage.
The legal authority of domestic states to proscribe and adjudicate cases invo lving violatio ns of h uman itarian law is s o firml y ro oted in t he in tern atio nal l egal regime that the Ro me Statute makes no distinction between states party and n on -st ates part y w it h res pect to co mpl emen tari ty. Pu t s imp ly, fo r every single act by every single accused that could theoretically be subject to the jurisdiction of the ICC, there would be one or more sovereign states that have legal authority to investigate and prosecute the case.
On its face, the Rome Statute makes no distinction between states that have ratified the treaty and those that have not with respect to the complemen tarity p rin ci ple o r the proced ures for ass ess ing the proper forum to adjudicate a particular case or perpetrator.
In this light, the Preamble categorically states that "it is the duty of every State to exercise its jurisdiction over those responsible for international crimes."41 Prosecution of every serious violation of humanitarian law in domestic forums could, in theory, be viewed as having attained the goal of ICC supporters who hope that the movement tow ards a permanent sup ranational court will help guarantee respect for and enforcement of international justice.
Complementarity is therefore a fundamental underpinning of the ICC regime that could also be an important incidental means for achieving the worthy goals of treaty proponents.
At the same time, the complementarity principle preserves the 40.
The author prefers to use the ter m "international humanitarian law" merely as a linking phrase to associate the laws of ar med conflict with the other substantive bodies of norms that may also apply to a particular conflict.
The phrase is quite commonly used as a shorthand reference to the entire corpus of law that governs the conduct of hostilities, in addition to offenses such as genocide and crimes against humanity which carry the weight of international authority by virtue of their clear status as substantive prohibitions recognized under customary international law.
The phrase should not imply that the law of armed conflict is indistinct or merged with the field of human rights law.
Among many other differences, the laws of armed conflict are lex specialis and apply in limited circumstances to reverse the normal patterns of peacetime.
In other words, under the laws of arm ed conflict, conduct that would normally be unlawful by definition is presumed to be lawful unless it contravenes the established norms regulating conflicts.
See, e.g., Steven R. Ratner, Why Only War Crimes? Delinking Human Rights Offenses from Armed Conflict , 3 H OFSTRA L. 
41.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, pmbl., para. 6.
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
33
pro secut ori al prerog ati ve o f res po ns ibl e stat es th at are prep ared to us e domestic forums to enforce international law.
The comprehensive scope of jurisdiction enjoyed by sovereign states in enforcing international humanitarian law arose in part because domestic military codes presaged the body of rules that later ripened into international humanitarian law.
Military commanders promulgated the earliest art iculati ons of recog nizabl e formal cod es reg ulati ng con flict bas ed on pragmatic hop es fo r reci procal treatment b y the adv ersary and b ecaus e th ey re ali zed t h at pr op erl y d is ci p li ne d so l di ers w ere mo re foc us ed o n achieving the military objectives of the conflict.
In the midst of the Thirty Years' War, for example, G ustavu s Ad olphus of Swed en pro mu lgated a punitive military code that contained a general warning that "no Colonel or Captain shall command his soldiers to do any unlawful thing; which so does, shall be punished according to the discretion of the Judge."
42 Similarly, in May 1863, the Union Army issued a disciplinary code governing the conduct of hostilities (known worldwide as the Lieber Code) as "General Orders 10 0: Ins tru cti ons for th e Go vern men t o f the Armies of th e U ni ted Stat es i n t he Fi eld ."43 M il it ary co des of d is cip li ne es tab li sh ed guidelines for gauging the scope of permissible conduct during conflicts that later evolved into the detailed codifications of international humanitarian law that underlie the proscriptions found in the Rome Statute.
Over time, these military codes and the more thorough military manuals that followed served to communicate the "gravity and importance" of behavioral norms to commanders and soldiers.44 Because the substantive prohibitions on conduct during conflict became the benchmark for measuring military prof ession al is m , military ope rations ex ecu ted outsid e the establ ish ed framew ork bro ugh t di sgrace t o the p ro fes sio n of arm s, and 42.
GUSTAVUS ADOLPHUS, A RTICLES OF MILITARY LAWS TO BE OBSERVED IN THE WARS (1621), cited in BASSIOUNI, C RIMES A GAINST HUMANITY, supra note 35, at 59.
For a succinct yet sweeping description of the role that military practice and doctrine played in the development of the law of armed conflict, see Leslie C. Green, W hat Is--Why Is There--The Law of War, in 71 UNITED STATES NAVAL WAR C OLLEGE INTERNATIONAL LAW STUDIES, THE LAW OF ARMED CONFLICT INTO THE NEXT MILLENNIUM 141 (1998).
43.
INSTRUCTIONS FOR THE GOVERNMENT OF ARMIES OF THE UNITED S TAT ES IN THE FIELD (Government Printing Office 1898) (1863), reprinted in THE LAWS OF ARMED CONFLICT: A COLLECTION OF CONVENTIONS, RESOLUTIONS, AND OTHER D OCUMENTS 3-23 (Dietrich Schindler 
For descriptions of the process leading to General Orders 100 and the legal effect it had on subsequent efforts, see Grant R. Doty, The United States and the Development of the Laws of Land Warfare, 156 MIL. L. REV. 224 (1998), and George B. Davis, Doctor Francis Lieber 's Instructions for the G overnment of Armies in the Field, 1 AM.
J. INT'L L. 13 (1907).
34
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
st ai ned nati ona l honor.
45 The wide sp rea d in te rn ational r ecognition of these norms, in turn, led to frequent international efforts to codify the precise parameters of the law.
Since 1854, there have been over sixty internati on al co nv ent io ns regu lat in g v ario us asp ects o f armed con fli cts an d a recogn izab le bo dy of i ntern ati onal humanitarian law has emerged from this complex mesh of conventions and custom.46 Not coincidentally, the international conventions describing the legal norms for regulating conflict emb ody the un questioned recognition o f a legal right of a sovereign to prosecute enemy citizens w ho violate those norms, as well as its own nationals.47 With respect to cases of genocide 48 or grave breaches of the 1949 Geneva Conventions,49 the black letter rules of international law go so far as to require that the perpetrator be prosecuted or extradited to another "concerned" nation.50 44.
W. Michael Reism an 
In the wake of the Lieber Code, other states issued sim ilar manuals: Prussia, 1870; The Netherlands, 1871; France, 1877; Russia, 1877 and 1904; Serbia, 1878; Argentina, 1881; Great Britain, 1883 and 1904; and Spain, 1893.
Doty, supra note 43, at 230.
45.
See Scott R. Morris, The Laws of War: Rules by Warriors for Warriors, ARMY LAW., Dec. 1997, at 4.
46.
BASSIOUNI, C RIMES AGAINST HUMANITY, supra note 35, at 56.
47.
See, e.g., G eneva Convention Relative to the Treatment of Prisoners of War, opened for signature A ug. 12, 1949, 6 U.S.T. 3316, 75 U .N.T.S. 135, arts.
85, 99, 102 (replacing the Geneva Convention Relative to the Protection of Prisoners of War of 27 July 1929).
In Ex Parte Quirin, 317 U.S. 1 (1942), the Supreme Court stated this principle as follows: From the very beginning of its history, this Court has applied the law of war as including that part of the law of nations which prescribes for the conduct of war, the status, rights, and duties of enemy nations as well as enemy individuals.
Id. at 27-28 
For a discussion of the customary international law regarding the right of military forces occupying foreign soil to prosecute civilians and the subsequent recognition of this right in binding conventions, see Michael A. Newton, Continuum Crimes: Military Jurisdiction Over Foreign Nationals Who Commit International Crimes, 153 MIL. L. REV. 1 (1996).
48.
Convention on the Prevention and Punishment of the Crime of Genocide, Dec. 9, 1948, 78 U.N.T.S. 277, art.
VI, reprinted in DOCUMENTS ON THE LAWS OF WAR 179, 18182 (Roberts 
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
35
Furthermore, as a mirror image of the fact that the complementarity principle applies to all states in the international community and all crimes within the jurisdiction of the ICC, international law today justifies universal jurisdiction for any state to adjudicate the crimes of genocide, crimes against humanity, and serious war crimes.51 This facet of international law developed despite the practice of some states that used the pretext of war crimes prosecutions for the purpose of political repression or psychological man ipulation.52 Tod ay, every state po sses ses the juridical ability to proscribe and prosecute the crimes detailed in the Rome Statute.
Accordingly, since the end of World War II, there have been a substantial number 49.
Geneva Convention for the Amelioration of the Condition of the Wounded and Sick in Armed Forces in the Field, opened for signature Aug. 12, 1949, 6 U.S.T. 3114, 75 U.N.T.S. 31, art.
49, para. 2, reprinted in DOCUMENTS ON THE LAWS OF WAR 195 (Roberts 
50, para. 2, reprinted in DOCUMENTS ON THE L AWS OF WAR 221 (Roberts 
129, para. 2, reprinted in DOCUMENTS ON THE LAWS OF WAR 243 (Roberts 
146, para. 2, reprinted in DOCUMENTS ON THE LAWS OF WAR 299 (Roberts 
50.
Writing in 1625, Hugo Grotius articulated the classic formulation of this concept as aut dedere aut punire, which has been modernized and frequently cited as aut dedere aut judicare (based on the general principle of law that the presumption of innocence applies in a criminal trial and subsequent punishment is contingent upon successful prosecution).
BASSIOUNI, C RIME S AGAINST HUMANITY, supra note 35, at 218.
51.
See Dem janjuk v. Petrovsky, 776 F.2d 571 (6th Cir. 1985) (allowing extradition of an accused to Israel on the basis of universal jurisdiction); Regina v. Finta, [1994] 1 S.C.R. 701; Cr. C. (Jm.) 40/61, Attorney General of Israel v. Eichmann, 45P.M.
3 (1961), aff 'd, 16 P.D. 2033 (1962); SENATE COMM.
ON F OREIGN RE LATIONS, REPORT ON THE INTERNATIONAL CONVE NTION ON THE PREVENTION AND PUNISHM ENT OF THE CRIME OF GENOCIDE, S. EXEC.
REP. NO. 98-50, at 12 (1984); Final Report of the Commission of Experts Established Pursuant to Security Council Resolution 935, U.N. SCOR, 49th Sess., Annex, U.N. Doc. S/ 1994/1405 (1994) (Rwanda Commission of Experts); BASSIOUNI, C RIMES AGAINST HUMANITY, supra note 35, at 227-41.
52.
For exam ple, the Soviet Union enacted Decree Number 270 in 1942 that classified any soldier captured by the enemy ipso facto a traitor.
The Allies repatriated more than 332,000 Russian prisoners to the Soviet Union, many of who m were su mmarily executed as soon as they were in Soviet custody.
Russians who had been repatriated were held in camps and this period saw the first use of the term "filtration camps" (now used in connection with camps in Chechnya).
STEPHANE C OURTOIS ET AL., THE BLACK BOOK OF C OMMUNISM: CRIMES, TERROR, R EPRESSION 319-22 (1999).
Similarly, the Indochinese Comm unist Party considered all French prisoners of war to be war criminals unless they "repented" and took on the values of their captors so that they could be a useful part of propaganda campaigns.
Id. at 568.
36
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
of prosecutions involving the core ICC crimes in nations as diverse as Canad a, Fr an ce , D enm a rk , S w itz er lan d , A u stra lia , C ro atia , R w a nda , th e United Kingdom, Israel, and Belgium.53 As a lo gica l c o ro llar y, dom e s tic prose cutions fo r m the ba sis fo r deducing that international law permits individual criminal responsibility for those who commit heinous crimes under the color of state authority.
The field of international humanitarian law developed around the notion that the legal norms were not just theoretical matters between states, but actu al res trai n ts to gu id e th e co nd u ct o f in di v id ual s. T h ere can be n o remaining doubt that the R om e St atute do es no t stretch th e bounds of es tablish ed legal principle w ith th e sweeping declaration that a "person who commits a crime within the jurisdiction of the Court shall be individua ll y r e spo n s i bl e a n d lia b l e f o r pu nis h m e n t .
" 54 A s J u s t i ce J ack s o n observed in his oft-quoted opening statement to the International Military Tribunal (IMT) seated in the ruins of Nuremberg, Germany: "[T]he idea that a State, any more than a corporation, commits crimes, is a fiction."
55 Based on the finding that "international law imposes duties and liabilities on individuals as well as upon States has long been recognized," the IMT rejected defense arguments that international law governs only states, as well as the contention that the doctrine of state sovereignty shields perpetrators from personal responsibility for their actions.56 In addi tio n, wi th regard to g enoci de an d crimes again st h umani ty, customary international law p ermits individual responsibility for crimes 53.
The United States position rem ains that the "crimes within the court's jurisdiction . . . go beyond those argu ably covered by universal jurisdiction, and court decisions or future amendm ents could effectively create `new' and unacceptable crimes."
Scheffer, supra note 25, at 18.
For analysis of the proper scope, substance, and rationale behind universal jurisdiction, see Historical Survey, supra note 6, at 4-14; Douglas Cassel, The ICC's New L egal Lan dscap e: T he Need to Expa nd U.S. D om estic Jurisd iction to Pros ecute Genocide, War Crimes, and Crimes Against Humanity, 23 FORDHAM INT'L L.J. 378, 380-81 (1999); Th eo dor Meron, International C rim in alization of Internal Atrocities, 89 AM.
J. INT'L L. 554, 577 n.121 (1995); BASSIOUNI, C RIME S AGAINST H UMANITY, supra note 35, at 543-6.
54.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
25(2).
This principle is reinforced by the declaration that the Rom e Statute applies "equally to all persons without any distinction based on official capacity."
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
27(1).
55.
Opening Statement of Justice Robert Jackson to the International Military Tribunal (Nov. 21, 1945), in 1-3 INTERNAT IONAL MILITARY TRIBUN AL, TRIAL OF G ERMAN MAJO R WAR CRIMIN ALS 83 (1946).
He further adm onished the IMT to recognize that any court adjudicating individual criminal cases, rather than imposing collective accountability, must respect the principle that "it is quite intolerable to let such legalism become the basis for personal im munity."
Id.
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
37
committed in times of peace as well as during armed conflict.
57 Article 8 of the Rome Statute accordingly comports with established international law impos ing crimin al liabil ity fo r war crimes committ ed du rin g ei ther international war or internal armed conflict (technically termed armed conflict not of an international character).58 Therefore, the mesh of customary and conventional international law against which the ICC will operate provides a comprehensive b asis for domestic enforcement of the same acts th at cou ld ot herw ise b e su bj ect to th e j uri sdi cti on o f th e su pranat io nal institution.
2.
Crimes Beneath the ICC Threshold Ag ai nst th is backdrop of i nternation al l aw an d pract ice, th e Rom e Statute implicitly concedes that states will remain responsible for prosecuting the vast majority of offenses even in a mature ICC regime.
History sh ow s that t he ov erw hel ming nu mber of pros ecu tio ns fo r v iol atio ns o f 56.
1 TRIAL OF THE MAJOR WAR CRIMINALS BEFORE THE I NTERNATIONAL M ILITARY TRI223 (1947) (Judgement).
The practice of states imposing individual criminal liability fo r w ar crim es dates back at least to third cen tury B.C. Greek practice.
ROBERT K. WOETZEL, THE NUREMBERG TRIALS IN INTERNATIONAL LAW, WITH A POSTLUDE ON THE EICHMANN CASE 17-18 (1962).
In one of the national proceedings following the Nuremberg Trials, the court expressed this principle as follows: "International law operates as a restriction and limitation on the sovereignty of states.
It may also limit the obligations which are binding upon them to the extent that they must be carried out even if to do so violates a positive law or directive of the state."
U nited States v. von Leeb, XI TRIALS OF WAR CRIMINALS 462 (1950) (The High Com mand Case).
See also W. Michael Reisman, Sovereignty and Human Rights in Contemporary International Law, 84 AM.
J. INT'L L .
866 (1990).
57.
Hermann von Hebel 
For a detailed discussion of the evolu tio n of th is p rop o siti on u nd er th e p rac tic e of st ate s se e B AS SI OUNI , C RI ME S A GAINST HUMANITY, supra note 35, at 510-56.
58.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
8(1).
Article 8 uses the simple phrase "war crimes" to cover the "whole field of norms applicable to armed conflict."
Hebel 
The substantive war crimes prohibitions are detailed in Article 8(2)(a) (Grave breaches of the Geneva Conventions of 1949), Article 8(2)(b) (Other Serious Violations of the laws and customs applicable in armed conflict, w ithin the established framew ork of international law), Article 8(2)(c) (Violations of Comm on Article 3 to the four Geneva Conventions of 1949), and 8(2)(e) (Other serious violations of the laws and customs applicable in armed conflicts not of an international character, within the established framework of international law).
See also Prosecutor v. Tadic, No.
IT-94-AR72,  134 (Oct. 2, 1995) (Appeals Chamber D ecision on the Defense Motion for Interlocutory Appeal on Jurisdiction) (discussing the range of conduct punishable in both international and non-international armed conflict) [hereinafter Tadic Appeal on Jurisdiction].
BUNAL
38
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
international humanitarian law have come in domestic forums as opposed to in ternation al tribunals.
In contrast to the original tw enty-fo ur defen dants charged before the International Military Tribunal at Nuremberg,59 thousands of war criminals were prosecuted in the Allied zones of occupation b y courts exercising sovereign p ower on G erman soil.60 Similarly, from 1946 to 1948, Australian, American, Filipino, Dutch, British, French, Chinese, and Australian courts convicted several thousand war criminals in the Pacific theater.61 The drafters in Rome recognized the reality that the ICC will have limited resources and political capital.
Accordingly, the Ro m e S tat ute includes a number of subjective threshol ds designed to ensure that domestic forums will continue to adjudicate the vast majority of cases, while the ICC itself focuses on a smaller number of more severe or difficult prosecutions.
As a fundamental check on its power, the substantive jurisdiction of the ICC is restricted to only "the mos t serious crimes o f co ncern to th e international community as a whole."62 Article 5(1) requires that the jurisdiction of the ICC "shall be limited" by the "most serious crimes of concern" threshold.63 This textual limit on the scope of ICC jurisdiction has both a de scr i ptive and subjec tive co m pone nt.
I nde ed , the m y r ia d of offenses detailed in Articles 6, 7, and 8 are tragic and inherently serious from a humanitarian perspective.
In order to fall within the jurisdiction of the ICC, however, the offense must be on the high end of a scale of relative severity, and must have some quality that warrants the subjective assessment th at the cri me i s of "co ncern to th e in ternatio nal commu nity as a whole."
This limitation applies to every crime detailed in the substantive provisions of Articles 6, 7, and 8.
The bedrock "most serious crimes of 59.
Of the original twenty-four accused, one com mitted suicide before trial, one was tried in absentia, and one had charges dismissed by the court due to m ental incapacity to stand trial.
The Tribunal handed down twelve death sentences, seven prison terms, and three acquittals (all of whom were later convicted in German domestic courts).
BASSIOUNI, CRIMES AGAINST HUMANITY, supra note 35, at 528-29.
60.
Bassiouni, supra note 11, at 20.
The United States convicted 1814 (with 450 executions); the French convicted 2107 (109 executed); the British convicted 1085 (240 executed); there are no reliable numbers for the thousands tried and executed by the Russians.
BASSIOUNI, C RIME S AGAINST HUMANITY, supra note 35, at 532.
61.
Bassiouni, supra note 11, at 36 n.14 (citing R. John Pritchard, The Quality of Mercy: Appellant Procedures, the Confirmation and Reduction of Sentences and the Exercise of the Royal Prerogative of Clemency towards Convicted War Criminals, in 8 BRITISH WAR CRIMES TRIALS IN THE FAR EAST, 1946-48 (R. John Pritchard ed., 21 vols.) (doc umenting 2248 trials, involving 5596 accused, which resulted in 4654 convictions)).
62.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, pmbl., para. 9.
63.
Id. art.
5(1).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
39
concern" threshold is an up-front textual device that restricts the reach of the ICC, which in turn preserves the de facto latitude of sovereign criminal forums.
The "most serious crimes of concern" threshold is intellectually distinct from the complementarity regime.
As discussed below,64 the compleme ntarity pr inci ple ( and it s acc ompa nying m ec h an ism gover n ing the admissibility of a given case) serv es to allocate power between the ICC and domestic forums over cases that could properly be prosecuted either in the ICC or in one or more domestic forums.
If a case is sufficiently minor, which is an admittedly subjective inquiry, the "most serious crimes of concern" threshold means that the ICC does not have substantive jurisdiction over the conduct, even if the activity could possibly meet the criteria as one of the det ailed offenses p ros cribed b y A rticles 6 (Genocide), 7 (Crimes Against Humanity), or 8 (War Crimes).
65 Phrased another way, there will be criminal offenses that could theoretically meet the complementarity test for admissibility, yet remain beyond the scope of permissible ICC jurisdiction because of their minor or isolated nature and scope.
Article 15(1) reinf o r ce s t h is l i m ita ti on, a s th e p r ose c u t o r i s e m po we r ed to in itia te a n investigatio n p rop rio motu on ly on the b asis of information o n "crimes within the jurisdiction of the court."66 Moreover, because Article 19 distinguishes between jurisdiction and admissibility by requiring the court to "satisfy itself that it has jurisdiction in any case brought before it," a judicial assessment of the prosecutor 's determination of admissibility remains discretionary.67 While representing a substantive check on the court's jurisdiction, the "most serious crimes" threshold also establishes the ICC as a supranational institution working within a system of sovereign states.
This precludes the misconception that the Rome Statute enacts some new regime of international federalism where sovereign states are deemed to be subordinate to 64.
See infra notes 91-106 and accompanying text.
65.
In the case of war crimes, Article 8 contains the additional injunction that the court has jurisdiction of war crimes "in particular when committed as part of a plan or policy or as part of a large-scale commission of such crimes."
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
8(1).
Unlike the mandatory restriction on jurisdiction found in Article 5, this clarification is characterized as an illustrative, advisory caveat.
66.
Id. art.
15(1).
The United States position regarding the power of the prosecutor is bes t sum mariz ed by the o fficial w ho noted that the proprio motu prose cutor c annot becom e "the independent counsel for the universe."
Sadat 
67.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
19(1).
40
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
the au tho ri ty o f t he ICC. Th e Ro me Statu te en vi sio ns an en forcement regime based on overlapping power between territorial sovereigns (states) an d non-territorial so vereigns (the in ternational co mmunity as a who le, represented by the ICC prosecutor).68 As an initial hurdle to restrict jurisdiction, the "most serious crimes of concern" threshold of Article 5 is a subtle, yet distinct and powerful, limit on the reach of the ICC vis  vis sovereign forums.
B.
The Practice of the Ad Hoc Tribunals The jurisdictional framework for the two currently operating ad hoc international tribunals offers a striking and important contrast to the complementarity regime of the ICC.
Building on the moral legacy of Nuremberg,69 the United Nations Security Council decided to take action in 1993 and 1994 to create the first truly international tribunals since World War II, designed to prosecute individuals responsible for the horrendous acts of genocide, crimes against humanity, and massive war crimes that took place in the territory of the former Yugoslavia 70 and Rwanda.71 Bec ause th e S ecu rity Council has "p ri mary r esponsibil it y fo r the maintenance of international peace and security,"72 the International Criminal Tribunal for the Former Yugoslavia (ICTY) and International Criminal Tribunal for Rwanda (ICTR) are both grounded on a finding that judicial 68.
Sadat 
See infra notes 154-60 and accom panying text (discussing the ne bis in idem principle of Article 20 as it relates to complementarity).
69.
The first prosecutor for the International Criminal Tribunal for the Former Yugoslavia, Judge Richard Goldstone of South Africa, visited the aging Telford Taylor (former Nuremberg prosecutor and U.S. Army brigadier general w ho served as the chief prosecutor for the subsequent proceedings in Nuremberg) in New York as a sign of respect and admiration.
B enjam in Ferencz, Telford Taylor: Pioneer of International Law, 37 COLU M. J. TRANSNT'L L. 661, 663 (1999).
70.
See S.C.
Res. 808, U.N. SCOR, 48th Sess., 3175th mtg. at 1, U.N. Doc. S/RES/ 808 (1993).
The Secretary-General prepared a detailed report on the scope of the crimes, including a draft statute pursuant to Resolution 808.
Report of the Secretary General Pursuant to Paragraph 2 of Security Council Resolution 808, U.N. SCOR, 48th Sess., U.N. D oc .
S/ 25 07 ( 19 9 3) [h e rei na fte r Se cr et ary Ge n era l's R e po rt ].
T h e Se cu ri ty C ou n cil adopted the draft statute in Resolution 827.
S.C.
Res. 827, U.N. SCOR, 48th Sess., 3217th mtg., U.N. Doc. S/RES/827 (1993), reprinted in 32 I.L.M. 1203 (1993) [hereinafter ICTY Statute].
71.
S.C.
Res. 955, U.N. SCOR, 49th Sess., 3453d mtg., U.N. Doc. S/RES/955 (1994), reprinted in 33 I.L.M. 1598 (1994) [hereinafter ICTR Statute].
72.
U.N. CHARTER art.
24(1).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
41
acco unt ab ili ty for crim es facili tates the resto rati on and mai nten an ce o f in tern atio nal p eace and securit y.73 T he Security Cou ncil h as aut ho ri ty under Chapter VII of the United Nations Charter to decide upon enforcement measures that all members "agree to accept and carry out."74 Th e Security Council has additional specific authority to create "such subsidiary organs as it deems necessary for the performance of its functions."75 From the perspective of Charter legal authority, the ICTY and ICTR are best understood as enforcement measures of a judicial nature; both the ICTY a nd ICTR draw the ir li feblood from th e po liti cal process of the Security Council, yet each must perform judicial functions in a non-political manner that is "not subject to the authority and control of the Security Council with respect to those judicial functions."76 The use of Chapter VII authority in this manner was both unprecedented and ingenious.
By virtue of the absolute authority of the Security Council with respect to maintaining international peace and security, 77 the ad hoc tribunals enjoyed legitima cy and a u thority vis  vis sover eign st at es im me di at el y upon thei r inception.
Furthermore, all members of the United Nations, through a binding treaty obligation in the form of the Charter, agree that the Security Council "acts on th eir b ehalf" i n carryin g ou t its resp ons ibil ity t o maint ai n and restore international peace and security.78 The Charter regime is the dominant feature of the normative international legal landscape, and its legal force imbues the ICTY and ICTR with binding authority over established state actors.
As a consequence of this relationship with Security Council authority, both the ICTY and ICTR Statutes specify that the national courts and the international tribunals "shall have concurrent jurisdiction."79 Each 73.
Secretary General's Report, supra note 70,  26.
74.
U.N. CHARTER art.
25.
75.
Id. art.
29.
76.
Secretary General's Report, supra note 70,  28.
77.
See, e.g., Certain Expenses of the United Nations (Article 17, Paragraph 2, of the Charter), Advisory Opinion, International Court of Justice , 1962, I.C.J. R EPORTS 151 (1962) (holding in part that the Security Council has plenary authority under the Charter to take decisions and order enforcement measures under the Charter regime), reprinted in 56 AM.
J. INT'L L. 1053 (1962).
78.
U.N. CHARTER art.
24(1).
79.
ICTY Statute, supra note 70, art.
9(1); ICTR Statute, supra note 71, art.
8(1).
42
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
in tern at io na l t rib un al nev ert hel ess h as e xp li cit ju ri sd ict io n al "p rim acy over national courts."80 The jurisdictional primacy of the ICTY and ICTR springs logically from the preeminent authority granted to the Security Council in pursuit of its plenary role in restoring international peace and security.
The legal and common sense of the term "primacy" necessarily conveys a jurisdictional hierarchy in which domes tic jurisdictions retain the ability to prosecut e perpetrators, but which preserves an "inherent supremacy" for the international tribunal.81 As a result, if a domestic court is proceeding with a case that is oth erw ise with in the jurisd iction al comp et en ce of the ICT Y and ICTR, th e international tribunal has unbounded legal discretion to order the national courts to defer to the international tribunal "at any stage of the proceeding."82 Applying this right of primacy, the first case brought to trial before the ICTY involved an accused named Dusko Tadic who had been facing trial in Germany on charges of murder, aiding and abetting genocide and causing grievous bodily harm.83 Though the ICTY only had one court room at the time, its trial court ordered the pending German case transferred to The Hague despite the fact that the Office of the Prosecutor had not yet indicted Tadi c (th at ind ictment w as con fi rm ed and is su ed fo ur mon ths after th e transfer).84 Tadic appealed this transfer o n ju risdictional grou nds. Th e ICTY Appeals Chamber upheld the implementation of ICTY primacy that denied Tadic a German trial on the rationale that the Security Council had acted "on beh alf o f the co mmun ity of nat ion s" by end ow ing a j ud icial organ with au thority to address "t ransboundary ma tt ers" which affect international peace and security.85 This legal reasoning also justifies the pr inci p l e tha t -- b e ca u se the I CT Y an d I C TR en jo y d er i va tive po we r 80.
ICTY Statute, supra note 70, art.
9(2) (the ICTY "shall have primacy over national courts'); ICTR Statute, supra note 71, art.
8(2) (containing the slightly stronger text "shall have primacy over the national courts of all states").
For an explanation of contemporary statements mad e to the Security C ouncil regard ing prim acy, and a plausible explanation for the textual addition to the ICTR Statute see Brown, Primacy or Complementarity, supra note 28, at 398-402.
81.
1 VIRGINIA MORRIS 
82.
ICTY Statute, supra note 70, art.
9(2); ICTR Statute, supra note 71, art.
8(2).
83.
MICHAEL P. SCHARF, BALKAN JUSTICE: THE STORY BEHIND THE FIRST INTERNATIONAL WAR CRIMES TRIAL SINCE NUREMBERG 97 (1997).
84.
Id. at 100.
While investigating other cases, Tadic's name repeatedly surfaced and the ICTY Deputy Prosecutor reported that "our investigators and the Germ an authorities were starting to trip all over each other."
Id. at 98.
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
43
springing from the Article 25 Charter obligation of states to obey Security Cou nci l man dates --t he trib u nal ru les req uire d omes tic j uris di ctio ns to "comply without undue delay with any request for assistance or an order issued by a Trial Chamber, including, but not limited to . . . the arrest or detention of persons."86 As opposed to the Security Council mandates that created the ICTY and ICTR, the Rome Statute, upon its entry into force,87 will establish a multilateral treaty regime that purports to allow ICC jurisdictional authority even over individuals acting pursuant to the sovereign authority of nonstate parties.
The complementarity principle is an essential cornerstone of the Rome Statute, which on its face represents a radical retreat from the theoretical primacy of the ICTY and ICTR.
A system based on following th e co m pl em en t ari t y p rin c ip l e i n el u ct ab l y le ad s to a s y s tem i n w h i ch domestic courts have primary authority to adjudicate violations of international humanitarian law.
In theory, pure primacy for the international trib una l i s t h e dia m e t r i c o ppos it e o f c o m p le m e n t a r it y whe r e pr i m a r y authority resides with domestic courts.
In reality, the gap between primacy and complementarity as organizing jurisdictional principles may not be so expansive; there is to date no clear evidence that either primacy or complementarity claim inherent functional superiority as a core organizing principle.88 In point, both ad hoc international tribunals often face "total defiance" from states regarding orders to transfer indictees and to provide evidence, 85.
Tadic Appeal on Jurisdiction, supra note 58,  58, 62.
The court opined in dicta that: it would be a travesty of law and a betrayal of the universal need for justice, should the concept of State sovereignty be allowed to be raised successfully against human rights.
Borders should not be considered as a shield against the reach of law and as a protection for those who trample underfoot the most elementary rights of humanity.
Id. 86.
ICTY Statute, supra note 70, art.
29 (including an obligation by states to respond to requests for identification and location of persons, take testimony and produce evidence, serve documents, and surrender or transfer the accused to the International Tribunal).
87.
The Rome Statute will enter into force on the first day of the month after the sixtieth day following the sixtieth instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval, or accession with the Secretary-General of the United Nations.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
126(1).
88.
Brown, Primacy or Complementarity, supra note 28, at 430.
44
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
th ereb y un dercut tin g th e legal fo rce o f t he pri macy prin cip le.89 W hen states have trampled upon the international tribunals' authority by ignoring such orders, the Security Council has not aggressively reinforced the primacy principle by compelling state compliance.
Moreover, domestic jurisdictions ha ve m aintaine d thei r c entra l ro le in en fo rcing intern a tional humanitarian law in spite of the jurisdictional primacy of the ad hoc interna ti on a l tr ib un al s. R w an da , f o r e x am ple , is c u r r e ntl y ho ld ing ov e r 100,000 citizens pending trial in connection with the 1994 genocidal rampages th at d es tro yed approx imately eigh ty percen t o f th e Tut si pop ulation.90 In practice, the gap between the primacy approach of the ICTY and ICTR and the diametrically opposed complementarity principle of the ICC will likely be minimal.
Nevertheless, the primacy principle has reinforced the procedural and legal impact of Security Council action regarding the rel ativ e au tho ri ty o f i nternat ion al and d omest ic jud icial s yst ems.
As a result, the ICC prosecutor will confront a conceptual dilemma generated by the interf ac e betwee n the co m p lem e nta rity pr inci ple and S ec u rity Council actions under its Chapter VII authority.
91 This issue will be analyzed in Part III, in the context of examining the textual formulations that the Rome Statute employs to implement the complementarity principle.
III.
Textual Implementation of Complementarity in the Rome Statute A. Complementarity at the Rome Conference The balance of pena l prerogati ve between sovereign sta tes in the international community and a permanent supranational criminal court has been a p rominent issue of concern since the beginning of serious diplomatic efforts towards creating such an institution.92 The detailed progres89.
Remarks to the Security Council by Madame Carla Del Ponte, Chief Prosecutor of the International Criminal Tribunal for the Former Yugoslavia (Nov. 10, 1999) (copy on file with author) (pleading for the "active support" of the Security Council, noting the fact that the Federal Republic of Serbia has become a safe haven for indicted war criminals, and noting the fact that Croatia's unilateral decision to withdraw its support to ongoing investigations erodes the "fundam ental power" of the Prosecutor that "must be preserved.").
90.
Robert F. Van Lierop, Report on the International Criminal Tribunal for Rwanda, 3 HOFSTRA L. 
P OL. SYMP. 203 (1999); see also Madeline H. Morris, The Trials of Concurrent Jurisdiction: The Case of Rwanda , 7 DUKE J. COMP.
&
91.
See infra notes 109-15 and accompanying text.
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
45
sion of diplomatic negotiations towards the text that eventually became the Rome Statute documents a complex, contentious, and incremental process, which ultimately produ ced a treaty adopted by an emotional vote rather than b y in tern atio nal cons ensu s.
The pro gress w as p ains takin g and , at times, meandering .
T he negotiating tex ts are riddled with brackets and often-contradictory proposals for further negotiations.93 Nevertheless, the principle of complementarity represents one golden thread of consensus that runs through every documentary step along the road towards the supranational criminal court.
This axiom, that the ICC is "nei th er des ig ned no r in ten ded " to s up pl ant in dep end en t and effect iv e domestic judicial systems, served as a guiding principle found throughout the long series of diplomatic interchanges culminating in the Rome Statute.94 Complementarity is an intellectually simple principle that cannot be distilled into one snippet of isolated treaty text.
Despite widespread agreement over the complementarity principle during the Preparatory Committee meetings prior to the Rome Conference, its textual manifestation was deeply interconnected with the many other highly contentious fundamental issues.
Debates in Rome raged over vital issues related to complementarity such as the definitions of crimes, the precise scope o f substantiv e ju risd ict io n, t he co ncep tu al b asis for ICC j uri sd icti on ov er in di vi du als (whether territorial, national, universal, or some combination thereof), the trigger mechanism for beginning investigation or initiating prosecution of an individual or group of offenses, and the mechanism for preventing prosecutorial abuse of discretion for political purposes.
92.
See Report of the Committee on International Criminal Jurisdiction, U.N. GAOR, 7th Sess., Supp.
N o. 12, at 21, U.N. Doc. A/26645 (1954).
This docum ent w as redrafted from the earlier 1951 Draft Statute in order to soften the prospect of compulsory jurisdiction of the international court by allowing more flexibility and voluntary participation in an international crim inal court, to include the right to w ithdraw from the court's jurisdiction following one ye a r's notice.
Historical Survey, supra note 6, at 13 n.72.
See generally Fanny Benedetti 
93.
See generally STATUTE OF THE INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL COURT: A DOCUMENTARY HISTORY (1998).
94.
Is a U.N. International Criminal Court in the U.S. National Interest? Hearing Before the Subcomm.
on International Operations of the S. Comm . on Foreign Relations, 105th Cong. 76 (1998) (statement for the record submitted by the Lawye r's Committee for Hum an R ights) [hereinafter International C riminal Court Hearing ], available at http:// www.access.gpo.gov/congress/senate/senate11sh105.html.
46
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167 di rectl y Security of jurisdi fficult
Th e o ve rarchi ng d ebat e th at to uch ed po li ti cal nerv es a nd affect ed st ate sov ereign ty cent ered on the degree to wh ich the Council would direct or control the preconditions for the exercise di ct io n by t h e ICC .95 One trea ty propone nt sum marized this dynamic by observing:
R o m e re pr es e n te d a tens ion b etw ee n th e Unite d St a t e s tha t w an ted a Secu ri ty -C ou n ci l c on t ro ll ed co ur t, an d m o st o f t he other countries of the world which felt no country's citizens who are accused of war crimes, crimes against humanity, or genocide should be exempt from the jurisdiction of the international criminal court.96 According to this view, Security Council control over ICC investigative and judicial authority would endanger the court's independence and gi v e d e fact o im mu ni ty t o cit ize ns o f th e p erm ane nt me mb ers (wh o s e nations could exercise the veto to thwart ICC judicial authority).97 As noted above,98 the most controversial issues associated with jurisdiction -- stat e c onsen t a s a r equir em e nt f o r IC C ju ri sdic tion ov er its nationals99 and the allocation of power betw een the Security Council and the ICC--were not res olved until the last day of the Rome Conference.
Th ese i ss ues w ere so in tertw in ed th at co mpro mi ses in on e area wo u ld impact other ongoing debates.
Hence, states were reluctant to compromise on each critical point in succession without "having a clear sense of how the total picture would appear."100 Complementarity, on the other hand, 95.
Elizabeth Wilm shurst, Jurisdiction of the Court, in THE INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL COURT: THE MAKING OF THE ROME STATUTE ISSUES, NEGOTIATIONS, RESULTS 127 (Roy S. Lee ed., 1999).
96.
International Criminal Court Hearing, supra note 94, at 73 (prepared statement of Professor Michael P. Scharf, New England School of Law).
See also John F. Murphy, The Quiverin g Gulliver: U.S. View s on a Permanent International Criminal C ourt, 34 INT'L LAW. 45 (2000) (claiming that U.S. objections are grounded in U.S. provincialism, trium p ha lis m , an d ex ce pti on al ism ).
Fo r a m or e de tai led dis cu ss ion of th e re lat ion sh ip between U.S. objections and current treaty provisions, see Sadat 
97.
Michael N. Schmitt 
98.
See supra notes 4-10 and accompanying text.
99.
The penultim ate vote rejected a United States proposal that the IC C would not have personal jurisdiction over an individual absent the consent of the state in which the crim es were co mm itted an d the state o f n ationality of the accused.
T his proposal was tabled by the United States delegation on 14 July 1998.
U.N. Doc. A/CONF.183/C.1/L.70 (1998).
2001] en joye d a because de fecting the sus.101 All organizing parameters
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
47
unique ro le in the ne gotiating history of the R o m e St a t ute bate centered not on its merits or appropriateness, but on permost agreeable textual approach that would gain state consendelegations understood the meaning of complementarity as an principle, but the articulation of its substantive and descriptive required sustained negotiations.
Rather than serving as the point of initial consensus in one isolated text, the complementarity principle became the cornerstone for many other debates , mu ch lik e th e first d omi no in a series, to b egin t he process o f negotiation and agreement.
As a result, the Rome Statute emerged with a complex, layered procedural structure, but one in which the complementarity principle was preserved.
To illustrate, once a particular offense rises ab ove t he "most seriou s crimes o f co ncern" th resho ld,102 th e case must meet the preconditions for jurisdiction outlined in Articles 12 through 16 (which were not finalized until the last day of the Rome Conference).103 The complementarity principle is further embedded as an additional procedural requirement found in Article 17, which requires the ICC to "determi n e t h at a cas e i s i n ad m i s s i b l e" w h ere cert a i n cri t eri a are m e t .
104 Logically, cases failing to meet these admissibility criteria are reserved to the judicial authority of one or more sovereign states.
In order to implement the complementarity principle implemented by the Rome Statute, the ICC prosecutor and judicial chambers must respect and adhere to the statute's admissibility criteria.
Article 17 represents the most direct mechanism for allocating responsibility for a certain prosecution between the ICC and one or more domestic sovereigns that may have jurisdictional authority.
Where the textual criteria of Article 17 are satisfied such that a case is "in admiss ible," th e Rome Stat ute constrain s th e authority of the ICC prosecutor and judicial chambers.
These admissibility criteria, therefore, establish the critical bulwark protecting the power of 100.
John T. Holmes, The Principle of Com plementarity, in THE INTERNATIONAL CRIMCOURT: THE MAKING OF THE ROME STATUTE ISSUES, N EGOTIATIONS, RESULTS 41, 43 (Roy S. Lee ed., 1999) [hereinafter Holmes, The Principle of Complementarity].
101.
Id. 102.
See supra notes 59-68 and accompanying text.
103.
Article 16 requires that an investigation or prosecution cannot com mence or pro ceed for a p eriod of twelv e m on ths follow ing a r eque st fro m the Sec urity Co uncil adopted under its Chapter VII authority.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
16.
The United States objects to this approach because it turns the Charter role of the Security Council upside down, and nullifies the effect of a veto since the Security Council only has negative authority to stop a case.
104.
Id. art.
17(1).
INAL
48
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
sovereign states to prosecute cases in their national courts as opposed to relying on the ICC.
Pursuant to this statutory constraint, the complementarity principle is further preserved through a detailed procedure for states to challenge admissibility.
105 Finally, the entire structure is limited by the ne bis in idem princip le of A rticle 20 , wh ich protects perp etrato rs from repetitive trials, with some caveats based on the complementarity principle.
Analysis of the potential pitfalls for the ICC prosecutor in implementing the complementarity principle is therefore dependent on a holistic view of the provisions of the Rome Statute that bear its fingerprints.
B. Relevant Treaty Provisions 1.
Articles 12-16, Jurisdictional Competence The jurisdictional patchwork of the ICC represents its most central an d cont roversial component.
T his series o f pro vision s did n ot emerg e until the final day of the Rome Conference.106 The concept of ICC jurisdiction involves much more than a simple assessment of whether a particular act fits the definition of a substantive crime within the meaning of the Statute (as defined by Articles 6, 7, and 8 using the interpretive filter of the Elements of Crimes).107 The Rome Statute is unique in the field of international law because it commingles the jurisdiction to prescribe, the jurisdiction to adjudicate, and the jurisdiction to enforce international norms into one quasi-legislative treaty.108 This necessarily produces a complex web of provisions, each affecting the complementarity principle.
The Trial Chamber is accordingly required to "satisfy itself that it has jurisdiction in any case brought before it."109 105.
Id. art.
19(2).
The additional right to make preliminary challenges to admissibility and jurisdiction originated in a United States proposal made to the March Preparatory Com mittee, which was subsequently renegotiated and expanded during later deliberations, and became Article 18 of the Rome Statute.
See U .N. Doc. A/AC.249/1998/WG.3/DP.2 (introduced by the United States on 25 March 1998 to the Working Group on Complementarity and Trigger Mechanism).
106.
Wilmshurst, supra note 95, at 138.
107.
See Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
9(1) (requiring elem ents of crim es that "shall assist the Court in the interpretation and application of Articles 6, 7, and 8").
108.
Sadat 
109.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
19(1).
This mandatory language contrasts with the looser provision that the "Court may, on its own motion, determine the admissibility of a case in accordance with Article 17."
Id.
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
49
The final package that became the Rome Statute is structured around a dual track system of jurisdiction.110 Article 13 implicitly rejects a simple assertion of universal ICC jurisdiction by limiting the court's jurisdictional authority to cases referred either by the United Nations Security Council or to those referred using carefully described jurisdictional comp etence.
This delegated grant of jurisdictional authority to the ICC and its prosecutor necessarily reserves to states the discretion to prosecute any cases that fall outside the established Article 13 parameters.
As a check on the power of states, and hence a limit to complementarity, Article 13(b) is particularly relevant.
Article 13(b) allows the Security Council to refer a case to the ICC prosecutor acting under its Chapter VII authority.
This path was embodied in the 1994 Draft Statute prepared by the International Law Commission111 and represents the simplest and least cont ro versial track tow ard s ICC adj udicatio n of a p art icular case.
Th e Security Council has absolute authority to define the territorial, temporal, or normative scope of the prosecutor 's license to proceed based on its plenary po wer with regard to actions designed to maintain or restore international peace and security.112 With regard to the complementarity principle, a Chapter VII referral would override a state's inherent national authority to insist on using its ow n jud icial p roces ses.
E ven th oug h jurisd iction und er Article 13 is a legal in quiry distinct from admissibility u nder A rticle 17 (which implements complementarity via the admissibility regime), a Security Council referral would supersede the state's right to use its own courts as the forum of first resort.
While the text of the Rome Statute ostensibly preserves a stat e 's au tho rity to imple m en t co m p lem e ntar ity fo llow ing a S ec u rity Co uncil referral, th e o bligation of all states to "accept and carry out th e decisions of the Security Council"113 effectively nullifies this right of complementarity.
Furthermore, all members of the U nited N ations are obligated to comply w ith orders of th e Secu ri ty Coun cil , even if t he Rom e 110.
International Criminal Court Hearing, supra note 94, at 73 (prepared statement of Professor Michael P. Scharf, New England School of Law).
111.
Report of the International Law Commission on the Work of its Forty-Sixth Session, U.N. GAOR, 49th Sess., Supp.
No. 10, U.N. Doc A/49/10, art.
23 (1994) [hereinafter ILC Draft Statute].
112.
See supra notes 69-91 and accompanying text.
In the context of a case referred to the prosecutor under the Chapter VII authority of the Security Council, the ICC should also benefit from specific enforcement measures designed to enhance state cooperation with the ICC prosecutor and judicial chambers.
113.
U.N. C HARTER art.
25.
50
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
Stat ute o r any oth er in ternat io nal ag reement wo ul d i mpo se co nfli ctin g obl igation s.114 A Security Co uncil referral, therefo re, has the practi cal effect of creating jurisdictional primacy for the ICC similar to that enjoyed by the ICTY and ICTR.
In contrast, the second jurisdictional track under Article 13 invokes the very principles of state consent and territorial jurisdiction that the complementarity principle was intended to protect.
Article 13 allows either a state party115 or the prosecutor proceeding proprio motu116 to refer a case to the ICC.
The proprio motu power of the prosecutor was adopted over the opposition of the United States 117 and has significant implications for the complementarity principle that will be discussed in Part IV.
For cases referred by either a state party or the prosecutor (that is, cases not dependent on Security Council referral under Chapter VII authority), Article 12 implements a consent regime based on the territory on which the crime was committed118 or the nationality of the perpetrator.119 Thus, a case is subjec t to I C C jur i sdictio n if th e cr im e wa s co m m itte d o n te rr itor y th at belongs to a state party or another state that consents to the jurisdiction of the court.
Similarly, a case may be referred to the ICC if the accused is the 114.
Id. art.
103 115.
Rom e Statute, supra note 3, art.
13(a).
A state becoming a party to the Rome Statute thereby accepts jurisdiction over the crimes contained therein.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
12(1).
A state party may only refer a case purporting to be within the jurisdiction of the ICC to the prosecutor specifying the relevant circumstances and providing available supporting documentation for the crimes.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
14.
116.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
15.
The prosecutor 's propio motu power to selfinitiate investigations is subject only to the approval of two judges in a Pre-Trial Chamber.
Id. art.
15(4).
This propio motu power was a departure from the earlier draft by the International Law Commission.
ILC Draft Statute, supra note 111, art.
25.
See also Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
53 (specifying factors for the prosecutor to consider in opening or deferring an investigation).
117.
Ambassador David J. Scheffer, the head of the United States delegation, summarized the concern over the prosecutor 's proprio motu power by testifying that it "w ill encourage overwhelming the Court with complaints and risk diversion of its resources, as well as embroil the Court in controversy, political decisionmaking, and confusion."
International Criminal Court Hearing, supra note 94, at 14 (prepared statement of Ambassador David J. Scheffer, United States A mbassador-at-Large for War Crim es).
118.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
12(2)(a) (the territoriality principle includes a vessel or aircraft registered to that state).
119.
Id. art.
12(2)(b).
A state exercising its right to opt out of ICC jurisdiction over war crimes committed by its nationals or on its territory for a period of seven years, Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
124, would probably also prevent a referral by a state party on whose territory that national committed a war crime.
Wilmshurst, supra note 95, at 140.
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
51
national of a state party or of a state that consents to the jurisdiction of the court.
The conse n t re gim e e m bodied in Artic le 12 m ar k s the fa ult lin e between the rights of states under the Rome Statute and the residual right of sovereign states to use domestic forums to prosecute violations of interna ti on al hu ma ni tari an law co m mit t ed b y th ei r na ti on al s. Th e co n sen t reg i me m ak es n o refer en ce w h at so ev er to t h e s o ver eig n p ro s ecu to ri al rights of non-state parties.
The consent regime is also silent regarding the case of the so-called "traveling tyrant," 120 and would not grant ICC jurisdiction based only on the consent of a state that happens to have custody of the perpetrator.
121 Article 12 on its face permits the anomaly in which a non-state party commits heinous crimes on its own territory, but consents to the exercise of ICC jurisdiction only over the members of other nations, such as a United Nations coalition, that enter its territory to prevent further violations.
Despite the righ t of the non-state party to consent to crimes co mmi tt ed by s om e bu t no t all pers o ns o n i ts s oi l, th e n on -st at e part y retains the primary presumption of jurisdiction under the complementarity principle.122 In light of the complementarity principle, the provisions for nationality and territoriality jurisdiction can be considered as a set of "conflicts of jurisdiction rules."123 For example, in the case of a crime committed by the national of a non-state party on the territory of another non-state party that consents to the jurisdiction of the court, both states would have jurisdictio n under the est ab lished no rms o f int ernatio nal l aw.
A lthou gh th e case could meet the Article 12 preconditions for jurisdiction by the ICC, the c o m p le m enta rity pr inc i ple ope r ate s to de la y a n as s er tion of IC C jurisdiction.
Furthermore, many states have domestic legislation allowing extraterritorial jurisdiction over violation s of in ternational humanitarian law committed against natio nals belongin g to that s tate,124 wh ich could 120.
Sadat 
121.
Note, The International Criminal Court: Assessing the Jurisdictional Loopholes in the Rome Statute, 49 DUKE L.J .
825, 836-40 (1999).
This limitation actually represents a retreat from the earlier text of the ILC draft that would have allowed the custodial state to consent to ICC jurisdiction.
ILC Draft Statute, supra note 111, art.
21.
122.
This statement is true, subject to the caveat that the non-state party can always consent to the exercise of ICC jurisdiction.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
12(3).
123.
Sadat 
124.
See, e.g. , 18 U.S.C.  2441(b) (1999) (War Crimes Act of 1996 as amended).
52
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
give a third state (the state of the victim's nationality) a valid legal basis for instigating a prosecution of the perpetrator.
To hel p rem edy th e clas h o f ju ris di cti on al co mp eten cy, t he R om e St atu te i mp l emen ts t he co m pl emen ta rit y p ri nci p le t hro u gh a s p ecifi ed regime of admissibility.
Apply ing the complementarity princip le to th e above hypothetical, all three states "would normally exercise jurisdiction over the crimes concerned," and the admissibility criteria require the prosecutor to notify those three states when commencing an investigation follow ing ei ther a referral b y a state party (A rti cle 13(a)) o r proprio m otu (Art icles 13 (c) and 15 ).125 T he j uris di cti on al co mpet ence o f th e th ree states would be resolved through normal political and legal mechanisms.
Accordingly, the admissibility criteria work in conjunction with the circu m s cr ib e d juri sdictiona l co m p et e n ce of th e I CC to ma rk the line of authority betw een the ICC and domestic legal systems.
2.
Articles 17-19, Admissibility Criteria The admissibility mechanism provides the most direct implementation of the complementarity principle in the Rome Statute.
Article 17 compel s th e li nk b etw een adm is si b ili ty an d c om pl emen tari ty b y ex p lic itl y referring to the two statutory provisions that articulate the complementarity principle.126 Following this reference to the complementary nature of ICC practice, A rticle 17 mandates that the court "sh all determine that a case is inadmissible" where the admissibility criteria are not met.
127 This is phrased as a mandatory limitation on the reach of the court.
The admissibility criteria implement the complementarity principle by providing the textual basis for evaluating whether domestic authority over a particular case limits ICC authority over that case.
Furthermore, the procedures for obtaining preliminary ruling s regarding admissibility128 and challenging the prosecutor 's assertio n of admissibility129 provide the mech anism for translating complementarity from a theoretical principle to an enforceable check on the power of the ICC and prosecutor.
125.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
18(1).
126.
Id. art.
17(1) ("Having regard to paragraph 10 of the Preamble and article 1 . . . .").
127.
Id. 128.
Id. art.
18.
129.
Id. art.
19.
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
53
The earliest articulation of the admissibility criteria dates to the 1943 D raft Co n ven ti o n fo r th e Creat io n of an In tern ati on al Crim in al C ou rt, which simply stated that, "[as] a rule, no case shall be brought before the Court when a domestic court of any one of the United Nations has jurisdiction to try the accused and it is in a position and w illing to exercise such juri sdi ctio n."130 T he 19 94 In ternati onal L aw Co mmis sio n (ILC) D raft Statute preempted ICC authority in cases that were the subject of investigation by a state that produced an "apparently well-founded" decision not to proceed to prosecution.131 This limited concession to domestic authority was grounded on a statement in the Preamble of the ILC Draft Statute that the ICC was to be complementary to domestic legal systems in cases where trials "may not be available or may be ineffective."
132 Based on concerns that the ILC formulation was both too narrow (in the sense that even a sham prosecution could render a case inadmissible) and too vague,133 Article 17 expanded the scope of the earlier text to specify that the court shall determine that a case is inadmissible in the following circumstances: (1) the case is "being investigated or prosecuted by a State that has jurisdiction over it;" (2) the case was the subject of a prior investigation and the state w ith jurisdiction "decided not to prosecute the person concerned;" (3) the person was already tried for conduct which is the sub130.
Draft Convention for the Creation of an International Criminal Court (London International Assembly), art.
3, LONDO N INTERNA TIONA L ASSEMBLY--REPORTS ON PUN ISHMENT OF WAR CRIME S 225-346 (1943), reprinted in Historical Survey of the Question of International C riminal Jurisdiction, Memorandum Submitted by the Secretary-General, U.N. Doc. A/CN .4/7Rev.1 (1949).
131.
ILC Draft Statute, supra note 111, art.
35.
The ILC Draft also prevented admissibility in cases where "there is no reason for the Court to take further action for the time being" and cases "not of such gravity to justify further action by the Court."
Id. 132.
Id. pmbl., para. 3.
133.
Holmes, The Principle of Complem entarity, supra note 100, at 45 (helping to explain why the Rome Statute broadens ICC jurisdiction to cases that have already been prosecuted in sham trials and why the text attempts to articulate detailed, relatively objective criteria for the subjective assessments underlying a determination of ICC admissibility).
54
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
ject of ICC interest;134 or (4) the case is "not of sufficient gravity to justify further action by the Court."135 The Rome Statute amended the subjective ILC admissibility criteria in two significant ways.
A case is admissible before the ICC only where a dom es tic sov ereign is "unw illi ng or un ab le to genu inely " carry o ut th e investigation or prosecution.136 The delegates in Rome rejected a vague concept of effectiveness and agreed upon "genuinely" as the most objective modifier that preserves a large degree of flexibility for the ICC prosecutor and court.137 The ICC prosecutor and court must make a subjective assessment whether the sovereign state is "genuinely unwilling" or "genuinely unable" to take action on the case.
This new standard also allows the supranational institution to review, and potentially reverse, the disposit ion of the case fo llo win g p ri or jud icial or in vesti gativ e acti on i n th e domestic system.
The potential for direct and deliberate ICC infringement over unchecked state sovereign ty resulted in extensiv e debate about th e best articulation of the criteria for determining whether a state is "unwilling"138 or "unable" 139 to take action on a particular case."
140 T he Ro me Sta tu te als o i ncl u d es d et ai led p ro ced u ral gu i da nce fo r implementing the complementarity principle.
In order to clearly describe the effect of complementarity when matters are first referred to the ICC, the United States introduced a proposal in March 1998 that was later negotiated and included in the Rome Statute as Article 18.141 Prior to taking action on a case referred by a state party or initiating a proprio m otu investigation, the pros ecutor is requ ired to "no tify all States and those States which, taking in to a cco un t th e infor mat ion av ailable , woul d no rm ally exercise jurisdi cti on over the crimes co ncerned."142 The ab ility o f any state party to refer a case to the prosecutor for investigation extends to situations in which "one or more" of the crimes proscribed in the Rome Statute "appears to have been committed."
143 Thus, a state party can ask the 134.
This principle is implem ented procedurally in Article 20, Ne bis in idem.
See infra notes 153-59 and accompanying text.
135.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
17(1).
This final ground for inadmissibility always operates as a restriction on the scope of ICC authority in all cases, and its inclusion in the admissibility criteria just reinforces this intentional limitation.
See supra notes 5968 and accompanying text.
136.
Id.
But see JUSTICE IN THE BALANCE: RECOMMENDATIONS FOR AN INDEPENDENT AND EFFECTIVE INT ERNATIONAL CRIMINAL COURT 70 (1998) (H um an Rights Watch advocated a return to the "ineffective" or "unw illing" standard on the basis that the agreed language set "an unduly high threshold which may prevent ICC jurisdiction even in cases where there is no effective investigation and prosecution at the national level.").
137.
Holmes, The Principle of Complementarity, supra note 100, at 50.
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
55
prosecutor to initiate an investigation over acts committed anywhere in the world, over which several other states could legitimately exercise jurisdiction.
The prosecutor 's duty to notify any state with a potential jurisdictional basis serves as the cue for that state to elect whether to exercise its jurisdictional rights.
The admissibility criteria obligate the ICC prosecutor 138.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
17(2).
Article 17(2) prescribes the criteria for evaluating "unwilling" as follows: (2) In order to determ ine unwillingness in a particular case, the Court shall consider, having regard to the principles of due process recognized b y in terna tiona l law, w hethe r o ne o r m ore of the follo win g e xist, as applicable: (a) The proceedings were or are being undertaken or the national decision was made for the purpose of shielding the person concerned from criminal respon sibility for crimes within the jurisdiction of the Court referred to in article 5; (b) There has been an unjustified delay in the proceedings which in the circu mstan ces is in consisten t with an inte nt to b rin g the person concerned to justice; (c) The proceedings were not or are not being conducted independently or impartially, and they were or are being (d) conducted in a manner which, under the circumstances, is inconsistent with an intent to bring the person concerned to justice.
Id. 139.
Id. art.
17(3).
In order to determine inability in a particular case, the Court shall consid er w heth er, due to partial or to tal co llapse or unav ailab ility of its national judicial system, the State is unable to obtain the accused or the necessary evidence and testim ony or otherw ise unable to carry out its proceedings.
Id. 140.
H olmes, The Principle of Complementarity, supra note 100, at 50.
Some observers believe that this effort was inspired by determined effort to allocate ICC authority based on "neutral and principled" criteria.
Sadat 
141.
U.N. Doc. A/AC.249/1998/WG.3/DP.2 (introduced by the United States on March 25, 1998 to the Working Group on Complementarity and Trigger Mechanism).
See also International Criminal Court Hearing, supra note 94, at 143 (providing Ambassador Scheffer 's description of the U.S. motivation in introducing the proposal).
142.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
18(1).
143.
Id. art.
14(1).
56
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
and court to respect that state's right to exercise complementarity, even in cases where the state only took action following a notification.
No tab ly, the req ui rem en t fo r p ros ecuto rial n ot ificat ion to stat es-- design ed to permit th e exercise of domestic jurisdiction that would preempt ICC authority--does not include cases referred to the ICC prosecutor by the Security Council acting under its Chapter VII authority.
In practice, the process of generating a Chapter VII resolution would almost certainly give notice to the affected states.
In theory, a Security Council referral of a situation to the ICC would not prevent state investigation or prosecution of that case.
Notwithstanding the normal functioning of the complementarity mechanism, the presumption of state jurisdictional precedence vis  vis the ICC would not trump the Security Council's legal authority to override domestic discretion.
Unless the Security Council has referred the case, the complementarity prin ci ple all ow s any s tate, incl ud ing n on -state p arti es, to n oti fy th e court that a domestic investigation is under way or has been concluded; in su ch cases, t he pro secut or "sh all d efer" to a d om esti c i nv esti gati on .144 Despite the obligation to respect a valid invocation of sovereign judicial authority, the ICC prosecutor may still request the state to provide information to the prosecutor on the progress of any investigations or trials.
145 The prosecutor subsequently has the right to review a deferral to domestic investigation of the case after six months, or "at any time when there has been a significant change of circumstances based on the State's unwillingness or inability to genuinely carry out the investigation."146 These provisions implement complementarity as a procedural mandate for the ICC in its dealings with all states, including those that have not ratified the Rome Statute.
Aside from the effect of complementarity at the onset of an tion, any state that has jurisdiction over a particular case may admissibility on the ground that it has completed or is pursuing gation or prosecution of a particular case.
147 Challenges made investigachalleng e an investibefore the
144.
Id. art.
18(2) (the obligation of the prosecutor to defer to the domestic process can be overridden by the Trial Cham ber based on the "application of the Prosecutor" or, in the case of a proprio motu investigation, on the basis of a prosecutorial request pursuant to Article 15(3).
The prosecutor or state concerned may file an expedited appeal against the decision of the Pre-Trial chamber.
Id. art.
18(4).
145.
Id. art.
18(5).
146.
Id. art.
18(3).
147.
Id. art.
19(2).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
57
confirmation148 of a case are to be filed with the Pre-Trial Chamber; challenges following confirmation are heard by the Trial Chamber.149 Complementarity is a rig ht accrui ng to all states; h owev er, a s peci fied class o f individuals may invoke complementarity on behalf of a state with jurisdiction.
Article 19 permits an accused or a person "for whom a warrant of arrest or a summons to appear has been issued" to challenge the admissibility or jurisdiction of a case before the ICC. 150 Decisions made by the 148.
Within a "reasonable time after the person's surrender or voluntary appearance before the Court," the Rome Statute requires that the Pre-Trial Chamber hold a hearing to "confirm the charges on which the Prosecutor intends to seek trial" Id. art.
61(1).
The socalled confirmation hearing is closely akin to an investigation under Article 32 of the Uniform Code of Military Justice in that the prosecutor must produce "sufficient evidence to esta blish sub stan tial g rou nds to b eliev e th at th e p erso n c om m itted each of the crim es charged."
See id. art.
61(7).
After this step, the Pre-Trial Chamber rules on the validity of continuing the case.
Id. art.
61(7).
149.
Id. art.
19(6).
At the tim e of this w riting, the United States has introduced a pr op os al to ad d an a dd iti on al sa feg ua rd in to th e co m ple m en tar ity m e ch an ism .
O n 7 December 2000, the United States submitted a formal proposal that would add a requirement to the Relationship Agreement between the ICC and the U nited Nations.
Despite the permissive language of Article 19(1) of the Rome Statute, see supra note 109, the United States proposal requires the court to determine the admissibility of a case "when there is a request for surrender of a suspect who is charged with a crim e that occurred outside the territory of the suspect's State of nationality."
U.N. Doc. PCNICC/2000/WGIC C -UN/DP.17.
In the words of Am bassador Scheffer, this new proposal "erects a final firewall, meaning that whether or not the admissibility of a case has been reviewed in the past, the Court must, on its own motion, review admissibility at the critical moment when the request for surrender is being framed."
Ambassador David J. Scheffer, Address at the Judge Advocate General's School, Waldem ar A. Solf Lecture in International Law: A Negotiator's Perspective on the International Criminal Court (Feb. 28, 2001).
In his address, Ambassador Scheffer explained the importance of the admissibility proposal in the Relationship Agreement as follows: The state of nationality thus will have one m ore opportunity to dem onstrate its performance of the complementarity criteria in an effort to prevent such surrender.
Since the Court can review admissibility on its own m otion at any tim e, the U.S. proposal simply articulates a procedural agreement between the United Nations and th e C ourt, binding on the Court, to ensure that a final admissibility review occurs before the suspect arrives in The Hague.
The proposal is reasonable and compatible with and in accordance with the treaty itself.
We would be foolish not to pursue it vigorously in the on-going talks, although I fear the March of Folly has already begun.
Multilateral negotiations are as m uch about missed opportunities and bad timing as they are about anything else.
Id. 150.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
19(6).
58
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
Trial Chamber or prosecutor regarding admissibility or jurisdiction may be appealed on an interlocutory basis.151 As a general rule, a state is permitted only one challenge to a determination of admissibility or jurisdiction, which should be made prior to the st art of t h e tri al i n th e ICC Tria l Ch am ber.152 Th e text is vague as to whether this means one appeal as to jurisdiction with an additional appeal regard ing ad missibility, or whether both g rou nds fo r removin g t he cas e from ICC autho rity shou ld b e combined in on e appeal.
Ho wever, even after the beginning of the trial, the Rome Statute permits challenges to the admis sibi lity of a case based on the fact th at the person co ncern ed has already been tried for the conduct that is the subject of the complaint.153 As the sole basis for challenging admissibility after the start of a trial, this provision fu rther pres erves co mp lementarit y by placi ng a premium on domestic procedures that yield speedy dispositions.
This is true because a previously completed trial would logically have prevented admissibility at an earli er s tage.
T he s tate w ith ju risd icti on cou ld t heo ret icall y try th e accused in absentia, even if a domestic trial began after the ICC prosecutor started presentation of the case to the Trial Chamber.
The complementarity principle dictates in these circumstances that a co mpleted domestic trial w ould stop an o ngoing ICC prosecu tion.
Th e right of a state to end an ICC proceeding based on complementarity does not depend on a specified trial verdict or a particular level of punishment.
Nevertheless, Article 20 outlines the substantive requirements for sustaining a claim based on a prior prosecution, consequently removing that case from the judicial power of the ICC Trial Chamber.
3.
Article 20, Ne Bis in Idem The principle of ne bis in idem reflects basic notions of fairness and judicial economy.
The statement that a person "shall not be tried before the [ICC] with respect to co nduct w hich formed the basis o f crimes fo r which the person has been convicted or acquitted by the [ICC]
154 With respect to cases adjudicated by th e ICC , this prohibition stan ds on its own fo rmulation in Article 20.
151.
152.
153.
154.
Id. Id. art.
19(4).
Id. Id. art.
20(1).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
59
Regarding the interface w ith national courts, the delegates in Rome found that agreement on the ne bis in idem principle was much easier than the broader admissibility criteria under Article 17,155 even though they embedded it as an additional ground for inadmissibility under Article 17.156 Article 20 sets ou t the stan dard s for as sessin g wh ether a d omesti c adjudication of a case makes it inadmissible before the ICC.
The discussions ov er ne bis in idem in Rome came in the wake of the hard-fought compromises on the complementarity provisions related to national investigations or ongoing prosecutions.157 In contrast to the parallel "unwilling or un ab le genuinely " standard applicab le to invest ig at ions or ongoing prosecutions by states, the provisions for completed trials only amplify the "unwilling" prong.
The appropriate domestic courts were obviously able to handle a trial that was in fact completed.
The ne bis in idem standards applicable to domestic trials focus on domestic systems that have used the faade of legal proceedings to thwart the ends of justice.
Unless the domestic trial purposefully shielded the accused from ICC authority,158 or the previous trial was conducted in a manner w hich w as inconsistent with an intent to bring the person to justice,159 the ICC prosecutor or court have no authority to impose supranational criminal accountability.
The blanket protection granted by Article 20 extends over a person for "conduct" that was the subject of the earlier domestic trial.
Any state's criminal proceedings shield the accused from further accountability before the ICC for any charges based on the same conduct (which in this context might be better conceived as misconduct).
Even as it preserves the right of do mestic state courts to supersed e ICC pun ishment based o n comp lementarity, Article 20 does not erect a rigid or unreasonable barrier to ICC admissibility of a particular case.
The ne bis in idem provisions of Article 20 are the logical capstone to the entire array of proced ural and subs tantiv e prov isio ns rel at ed t o implementi ng complementarity in the practice of the ICC and prosecutor.
The complementarity principle applies to domestic investigations, prosecutions, and completed trials, and the Rome Statute mandates the procedures for states to claim the right of complementarity.
The standards and procedural rules for recognizing a state's right to use its domestic forums are complex and 155.
156.
157.
158.
159.
Holmes, The Principle of Rome Statute, supra note Holmes, The Principle of Rome Statute, supra note Id. art.
20(3)(b).
Comp 3, art.
Comp 3, art. lementarity, supra note 100, at 59.
17(1)(3). lementarity, supra note 100, at 50.
20(3)(a).
60
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
interrelated.
Taken together, they provide a solid textual basis for nations with competent, functioning legal systems to adjudicate cases within their jurisdiction rather than being shoved aside by the ICC prosecutor or court.
This is the essence of the complementarity principle as it protects the right of sovereign states to resolve criminal cases.
Nevertheless, an ICC prosecutor, functioning under the international scrutiny that will be a normal facet of any supranational investigation or prosecution under the provisions of the Rome Statute, bears the burden of translating the provisions of the statute into actual practice.
Toward that endeavor, the Final Draft Rules o f Procedure an d Ev idence set fo rth req uirements relating to th e realization of complementarity.
C. Complementarity in the Final Draft Rules of Procedure and Evidence In contrast to the Rome Statute itself, the Final Draft Rules of Procedure and Evidence w ere adopted by consensus on 30 June 2000.
Although th e R ul es are "s u bo rd in at e in al l case s" t o th e R om e St atu t e, t he y ar e intended to facilitate the application of the statute in actual practice.160 The negotiations leading to the Draft Rules were in one sense a microcosm of the Rome Conference.
A complex document emerged from the conflicting approaches of lawyers and diplomats arguing from both civil and common law perspectiv es, flavo red w ith heavy lobby ing from non-governmen tal organizations focused on parochial interests, and spiced with a heavy dose of divergent personalities.
The weighty undertones of idealistic aspiration and raw politics that accompanied the Draft Rules discussions added to the intensity of the neg o ti a tions.
Give n the politic al dime nsion of the s e debates, it is unsurprising that the Final Draft Rules include several provisions that may affect the ability of states to invoke the complementarity principle.
One notable clarification in the Final Draft Rules limits the ability of states to selectively misuse the principle of complementarity.161 Although nati onal j urisd ictio n sh ou ld enj oy a "presu mpti on o f regu larity,"162 th e Rome Statute operates on a presumption that states will not politicize the 160.
Report of the Preparatory Commission for the International Criminal Court, Finalized Draft Text of the Rules of Procedure and Evidence, U.N. Doc. PCNICC/2000/ INF/3/Add.1 (2000) (Explanatory Note) [hereinafter Draft Rules].
161.
See supra notes 122-24 and accompanying text.
162.
Brown, Primacy or Complementarity, supra note 28, at 426 n.212 (quoting Jamison Borek, Deputy Legal Advisor, U.S. Department of State).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
61
domestic adjudication of cases within the scope of potential ICC jurisdiction.
The text of Article 12(3) allows a non-state party to consent to ICC authority "with respect to the crime in question."163 In theory, a non-state party cou ld consent to ICC jurisd iction over the conduct o f the internati on al fo rces dep lo y ed to it s terri to ry, w h il e ex emp ti n g i ts o w n arm ed forces fro m ICC au th ority.
E ven tho ug h su ch selecti ve cons ent w ou ld accord with the text of the Rome Statute, the state would thereby pervert the complementarity principle into a deliberate shield to deflect accountability for its citizens while using the ICC process as a political weapon against its adversary.
In order to remedy this anomaly and prevent such disparate justice, the Draft Rules provide specific guidan ce regarding a declaration under Article 12(3).
The delegates agreed to clarify the meaning of a state declaration by making an interpretive statement of principle.
Under the cons e n s u s ru l e, a s t at e d e cl ar at i o n t o accep t j u ri s d i c t i o n i n cl u d es "as a co ns eq u en ce t h e ac cep ta nce o f j uri s di ct io n w i th re sp ect t o th e c rim es referred to in Article 5 of relevance to the situation."
164 In other words, a declaration of consent by a non-state party to crimes committed on its territory means that the ICC prosecutor can investigate any acts of genocide, crimes against humanity, or war crimes that were committed by any individual in connection with the "situation."
165 The ICC prosecutor has that broad investigative authority even if the non-state party intended that consent t o be directed again st a specified s et of i ndi vid uals o r a particu lar criminal violation.
As a result, this rule prevents an abuse of the complementarity that could otherwise have discredited the very notion of domestic trials under the supranational ICC umbrella.
The rules also include some notification provisions that could significantly impact on the exercise of state domestic authority to prosecute perpetrators.
In order to protect the rights of victims, the rules require that known victims or their legal representatives receive information at several critical procedural junctures.
The prosecutor, for instance, "shall inform victims " w hen subm itting a propr io mo tu inv es tigatio n to the Pre-Trial Chamber for authority to proceed.166 The victims in turn "may make rep163.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
12(3).
164.
Draft Rules, supra note 160, R. 44(2).
165.
The consent of the non-state party would confer jurisdiction over all of the criminal acts, which w ould in turn allow the prosecutor to "initiate investigations proprio motu on the basis of information within the jurisdiction of the Court."
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
15(1).
166.
Draft Rules, supra note 160, R. 50(1).
62
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
resentations in writing" to the Pre-Trial Chamber that would presumably assist the court in making its determination w hether the prosecutor has a reasonable basis to proceed with an investigation.167 In addition, when the prosecutor seeks a ruling from the court regarding any question of jurisdiction or admissibility, 168 the rules require notification to both the state that referred the case and "victims who have already communicated with the court in relation to that case."
169 As a logical corollary, either the state or in t eres t ed v i cti m s " may mak e rep res en ta ti o n to t h e c om p et en t C h amber."170 The Rules specify that decisions over the commencement of an investigation by the Pre-Trial Chamber shall include the court's underlying reasons, and the ICC "shall give notice of the decision to victims who have made representations."171 In the abstract, these rules make sense from the perspective that the ICC is intended to promote values that are fundamental to all the w orld's citiz ens.
A gr ea te r f low of info rm ation be tw e en the IC C prosecu tor, affected states, and concerned victims may facilitate the pursuit of justice.
On the other hand, the rules nowhere mention any cross-examination or filtering of the "representations" made to the court.
Furthermore, the court itself has complete autonomy and responsibility for determining the applicable procedures for assessing issues of admissibility.
Alerting every identified victim will almost certainly result in personal, deeply moving pleas to the court.
Such representations are the antithesis of a process that rationally applies the legal norms of the statute to protect the sovereign authority of states to exercise complementarity.
An ICC judicial chamber that failed to app ly the jurisdiction al or admiss ibility criteria because of th e emotional impact of a victim's evidence would subvert the complementarity principle.
However, the D raft Rules provide this potential basis for eroding complementarity based on extrinsic victim testimony that is not relevant to the grounds for determining admissibility under the Rome Statute.
Conversely, victims may generate intense political pressure against the domestic state that would otherwise have authority to adjudicate th e 167.
168.
169.
170.
171.
deferral of for the dec Id. R. 50(3).
See Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
19(3).
Draft Rules, supra note 160, R. 59(1).
Id. R. 59(3).
Id. R. 50(5).
The rules provide a parallel provision that a state requesting a investigation by the ICC prosecutor is also entitled to the "decision and the basis ision of the Pre-Trial Chamber."
Id. R. 55(3).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
63
case, thereby distorting that state's decision whether to defer to the ICC prosecutor or proceed with a domestic investigation or trial.
Finally, the rules contain explicit guidance for the court as it considers whether the state is genuinely unwilling to take action against the perpetrator.
This determination is a central element in the decision regarding whether the case is inadmissible before the ICC.172 In assessing the degree of state unwillingness to prosecute, along with the genuine character of a perceived unwillingness, the court may consider information tendered by the state that is seeking to invoke complementarity.
The rules specifically permit the state invoking complementarity to provide information showing that "its courts meet internationally recognized norms and standards for the indep endent and imp artial p rosecution of similar conduct."173 The ICC authority to override state jurisdiction is a serious matter.
The consensus rule allows the affected state to have the opportunity to present evidence related to its own justice system which may explain procedural or substantive issues that the court could incorrectly assess as manifesting genuine unwillingness or genuine inability sufficient to warrant ICC admissibility.
In addition, information provided by a domestic state with jurisdiction will generate international interest in the case that is quite likely to force the ICC to define and articulate the factors that make the case admissible.
This rule, in conjunction with the other Rules of Procedure related to admissibility determinations, demonstrates that the principle of complementarity is one of the cornerstones of the ICC investigative and judicial process.
Despite the significant guidance in the Rome Statute and the Rules of Procedure that seek a balance between complementarity and the effectiveness of the ICC, there are outstanding issues that will not be resolved until the court begins to function.
Section IV highlights some of the gaps and unresolved questions that could undermine the actual practice of the ICC regarding the principle of complementarity.
If the ICC and its prosecutor do not adhere to provisions for respecting the complementarity principle, the political backlash could eviscerate the ICC as a functioning institution with international credibility and support.
IV.
Obstacles to Implementing Complementarity A.
The Proprio Motu Problem 172.
See supra notes 123-48 and accompanying text.
173.
Draft Rules, supra note 160, R. 51.
64
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
As shown above, the Rome Statute includes a comprehensive set of provisions and procedures that are designed to insulate sovereign authority to prosecute from unreasonable extension of ICC authority over sovereign judicial systems.
Some treaty proponents argue that the web of protections inspired by the complementarity principle giv es "ample assurance" th at th e IC C will m inimally cu rtai l sovereign au thorit y only by disp la cing domestic trials in "exceptional circumstances."174 At the same time, the Rome Statute contains absolutely no institutional constraints on the power and discretion of the ICC and prosecutor.
In fact, a key reason that th e complementarity regime is so thorough and detailed in the Rome Statute lies in th e reco gni tion b y treaty p ropo nents th at t he "in terp retatio n and application" of those provisions and standards is left solely to the ICC.175 Sin ce co mp lemen tarit y is bu ilt on the p remis e that the ICC i s n ot inhe rently super ior to sovere ign sta t es , th e supran a tional court is not supreme in theory.
The very autonomy that proponents sought for the ICC and its prosecutor, however, prevents external review or resolution of disputes over the court's implementation of the Rome Statute.
176 Arguably, the lack of any external checks and balances limiting the discretion of the ICC manifests a structural flaw creating de facto ICC superiority over sovereign states.
From this perspective, the mandatory phrasing of the comp l emen t a ry p r o v i s i o n s 177 a n d t h e i r bi nd in g na t u re fa il to gu a ra n t e e realization of the complementarity principle.
T he prosecutor is account able only to the trial chambers of the ICC itself, and the Rome Statute reinforces this unprecedented reallocation of power by providing that "any dispute concerning the judicial functions of the Court shall be settled by the BALANCE: RECOMMENDATIONS FOR AN I NDEPENDENT AND EFFECTIVE CRIMINAL COURT 71 (1998).
175.
Holmes, The Principle of Complementarity, supra note 100, at 74.
176.
The one slight caveat to this statement that in practice may prove to be very exceptional is the fact that the Security Council can pass a resolution under Chapter VII that requests the ICC to defer an investigation or prosecution for a period of twelve months.
Rom e Statute, supra note 3, art.
16.
This grant of authority to the Security Council in the Rome Statute was arguably unnecessary in view of the plenary authority of the Security Council w ith regard to threats to international peace and security.
A s noted above, the intense debate over the proper role for the Security Council vis  vis the initiation of cases within ICC jurisdiction was a m atter of international contention until the final hours of the Rom e Conference.
177.
See, e.g., id. art.
17(1) ("court shall determine that a case is inadmissible where . . . ."), art.
17(2) ("in order to d etermine unwillingness in a particular case, the court shall consider, having regard to the principles of due process recognized by international law, whether one or more of the following exist . . . .").
USTICE IN THE
174.
J
INTER
NATIONAL
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
65
decision of the Court."
178 The Rules of Procedure further specify that the ICC chamber reviewing issues of admissibility "shall decide on the procedure to be followed and may take appropriate measures for the proper conduct of the proceedings."179 One of the hallmarks of the complementarity regime is that it protects the prosecutorial and investigative prerogatives of all states without distinction based on membership in the ICC club.
While the Rome Statute provides that an unresolved dispu te between t wo or more p arties to th e Rome Statu te w ill b e referred to t he Ass embly o f St at es Parties ,180 th e Rome Statute is strikingly silent regarding any similar right of non-state parties.
This discrepancy could be view ed as an incen tive to become a party to the Rome Statute.
It could also create a strong incentive for the ICC to avoid disputes with states that are represented in the Assembly of States Parties, thus creating the potential for a tiered system of complementarity in which non-state parties are not accorded the same degree of deference.
Nevertheless, the p rosecutor 's unconstrained au thority, coupled with the co ntrol of the ICC judicial ch ambers, h as the potential to erode complementarity to its vanishing point as a mechanism for allocating prosecutorial power between states and the ICC.
The pro v is ions im plem en ting co m p le me ntar ity a re c o mp le x a n d often call for difficult subjective assessments by the court and prosecutor.
For instance, in reviewing a state's unw illingness, the prosecutor bears the burden of showing sufficient circumstantial evidence to warrant a finding that a delayed movement towards domestic prosecution "in the circumstances is inconsistent with an intent to bring the person to justice."181 The Rome Statute is silent on the need for any direct evidence of unwillingness in this case, and there is no provision for review of the court's decisions outside the ICC itself.
Artic le 17(2) (a ) fu r t her r equir es th e pr domestic disposition of the case "was made for person concerned from criminal responsibility diction of the Court."182 In this endeavor, the ose the fo r Ro cutor to show th at th e purpose of shielding the crimes within the jurisme Statute is structured
178.
Id. art.
119(1).
See generally Paul D. Marquardt, Law Without Borders, The Constitutionality of an International Criminal Court, 33 COLUM.
J. TRANSNAT'L L. 73 (1995) (opining that the lack of checks and balances does not fatally undermine ICC authority).
179.
Draft Rules, supra note 160, R. 58(2).
180.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
119(2).
181.
Id. art.
17(2)(b).
182.
Id. art.
17(2)(a).
66
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
to allow the ICC prosecutor a wide margin of error.
If circumstantial evidence fails to establish the improper domestic purpose, a further provision allows admissibility if the ICC prosecutor persuades the ICC chamber to find a lack of independence or impartiality in the domestic court coupled with a manner of conducting the proceedings that was "inconsistent with an intent to bring the person concerned to justice."183 These grounds for asserting ICC authority despite domestic action are all laced with subjective assess ments by the court and p rosecutor that are n ot su bject to any external review outside the ICC.
The very criteria that establish the prosecutorial burden of proof and specify the requisite evidentiary standards designed to implement complementarity may hold the seeds of its unchecked erosion.
The ICC prosecutor and court always bear the burden of showing that the standards have been met, but there is no external check to monitor adherence to the standards.
The ICC prosecutor must assess the admissibility criteria in light of undefined "principles of due process recognized by international law."
184 These standards are themselves defined by the ICC, which allows wide latitude for the ICC prosecutor to meet the "objective" admissibility criteria.
Moreover, if an ICC investigation is originally deferred to national jurisdiction, the ICC prosecutor is not restricted from taking later actions, subje ct to t h e re qu i rem en t t h at "h e o r sh e s h al l no t if y th e S ta te to w h i ch deferral of the proceedings has taken place."185 Finally, the propio motu power of the prosecutor allows abuse of the complementarity princip le b ecause the ad missi bility criteria in vite ICC intrusion into the domestic processes of sovereign states.
Because the ICC and its prosecutor can reasonably be expected to develop some guidelines and standards for evaluating domestic systems, the Rome Statute sets up an essentially circular paradox.
If a state does not meet the standards that the ICC announces through its internal procedures and court decisions, the domestic state may be deemed "genuinely unwilling" to handle the case by th e ICC. Fu rt h erm ore , s ta tes w i th s car ce res o u rces m ay be u na bl e t o resh ap e th eir en tire do mes tic j udicial syst ems in respon se t o subjectiv e ICC standards, thereby w arranting an ICC finding that any trial that th e 183.
becom e the 17, at 145.
184.
185.
Id. art.
17(2)(c).
One treaty supporter argues that this is a loophole that will most frequently used path to admissibility.
Broomhall, Checklist, supra note Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
17(2).
Id. art.
19(11).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
67
ICC prosecutor wants to take over is admissible because the state is unable "genuinely to prosecute."
B. Properly Describing Jurisdiction Aside from the dispositive power of an unconstrained supranational court and prosecutor, the complementarity principle could be corroded by the very jurisdictional mindset of the ICC.
The concept of complementarity does not logically lead to a scheme of national and supranational concurrent jurisdiction.
Properly understood and implemented in accordance with the Rome Statute, the jurisdictional allocation of power between the ICC and states is best thought of as a tiered allocation of authority to adjudicate.
The ICC does not have authority to take a case or initiate an investigation until the issues associated with domestic jurisdictional criteria and admissibility standards are resolved.
Th e comp lemen tarity prin cip le was the mo ti vati ng fo rce b ehi nd a court built around a limited and defined authority to take jurisdiction that operates when needed to supplement domestic court systems.
From th e prosecutor 's point of view, jurisdiction under the provisions of A rticle 13 an d admissib ility u nder Article 17 are both mandatory p rerequisit es fo r ICC authority.186 This scheme is a significant evolution from earlier drafts th at all ow ed an "in heren t" ICC ju ris di ctio n o ver s om e cri mes. 187 T h e United States was on record as supporting such an inherent jurisdictional scheme for the genocide offenses.
188 In fact, the 1994 International Law Commission Draft included a provision that allowed the ICC to have automatic jurisdiction over the crime of genocide, which would have created a truly concurrent jurisdiction, at least over these offenses.189 A system built on a straight assertion of supranational primacy was not a "politically viable alternative for a permanent ICC." 190 A scheme of con current jurisdiction would hav e almost certain ly resulted in jurisdictional clashes between the ICC and one or more states with valid claims based on established principles such as nationality, territoriality, or passive personality.191 Rather than a flawed system of inherent or explicit concurrent jurisdiction, the Rome Statute's jurisdictional scheme requires the progr e ssive f a c t ua l inquir i e s a nd judic i a l f i ndings tha t i m ple m e n t 186.
Sadat 
187.
Brown, Primacy or Complementarity, supra note 28, at 417-28 (describing the advantages and disadvantages of such an inherent supranational scheme).
68
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
complementarity.
Over time, the complementarity provisions may chafe an ICC prosecutor that sees them as an overly restrictive manifestation of arcane sovereignty principles.
The ICC prosecutor may begin to think of ju risd ict io n as co ncu rrent rat her t han tiered , and th ereb y min imi ze th e complementarity requirements.
Because the ICC does not have any external checks and balances, there is no institutional mechanism for controlling a court and prosecutor that seeks to expand supranational power over domestic forums in order to vindicate considerations of international justice.192 If t he ICC pros ecuto r begi ns t o v iew s up ran atio nal j urisd icti on as concurrent with sovereign state jurisdiction, the importance of the complementarity provisions as the trigger mechanism for ICC jurisdiction would obviously begin to erode.
This would produce more than just the technical 188.
International Criminal Court Hearing, supra note 94, at 13 (Ambassador Scheffer referred to a regime of "automatic acceptance" in describing the inherent regime of the ILC Draft.).
See also Genocide Convention, supra note 48, art.
VI (persons "shall be tried by a com petent tribunal of the State in which the act was comm itted, or by such international penal tribunal as may have jurisdiction with respect to those Contracting Parties which shall have accepted its jurisdiction").
In the 1948 debates over the Genocide Convention, the United States actually made a proposal that sounded remarkably close to the modern formulation of complementarity in the ICC context.
The proposal would have added an additional paragraph to Article VII of the Genocide Convention to read as follows: "Assumption of jurisdiction by the international tribunal shall be subject to a finding that the State in which the crim e was committed has failed to take adequate measures to punish the crim e." Report and Draft Convention Prepared by the Ad Hoc Committee on Genocide, U.N. Doc. E/794 (1948), reprinted in Historical Survey of the Q uestion of International Criminal Jurisdiction, Mem ora ndum Submitted by the Secretary-General 142 , U.N. Doc. A/CN.4/7Rev.1 (1949).
The proposal was rejected by a vote of five votes to one with one abstention (the USS R) on the basis that such a paragraph would prejudice the question of the court's jurisdiction.
Id. 189.
ILC Draft Statute, supra note 111, arts.
21(1)(a), 25(1).
190.
Brown, Primacy or Complementarity, supra note 28, at 431.
191.
M. Cherif Bassiouni 
J. TRANSAT'L L .
151, 170 (1992).
192.
For an indication that this temptation on the part of a constrained ICC prosecutor to seek an expansion of power in relation to states may be inevitable, see the comments of the Chief Prosecutor for the International C riminal Tribunal for the Former Yugoslavia, based on her long experience working within the structure of politics and power in seeking international justice.
Justice Louise Arbour, Address to the Preparatory Com mittee on the Establishment of an Interna tional C rim inal Court (8 D ec. 1997) (warning th at the IC C should not become a "weak and powerless institution that would lack legitimacy," and telling delegates that "there is more to fear from an i mpotent than from an overreaching prosecutor"), available at http://www.un.org/icty/p271-e.html (ICTY Press Release, CC/PIO/ 271-E).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
69
undermining of abstract treaty provisions; it would minimize the ability of states to exercise their courts as proper forums for prosecuting violations of international humanitarian law.
Additionally, the ICC prosecutor might begin to assert jurisdiction in cases where one state w ith a jurisdictional claim consented to ICC adjudication of a particular case, but other states with equally valid claims were either not consulted or mooted based upon the p ros ecuto r 's unilateral as sess ment of inadmissib ility.
Tho ugh a fair reading of the Rome Statute indicates that admissibility can be waived by a state,193 no state should be allowed to waive the complementarity right of another state.
Finally, the Rome Statut e is silent o n the p ro per allocation of ICC authority in cases involving national amnesties or executive pardons.
A supranational court based on concurrent jurisdiction would in theory enjoy absolute authority to prosecute a case without regard for domestic legislative or political action.
In the negotiations leading to the Rome Statute, the delegates rejected a proposal that would have allowed ICC authority even in the s itu ation where a state pardoned o r paroled an accused fo llo wing convic tion in do m estic courts.
194 S im ilar ly, th e criteri a f or assessing whether a state is "genuinely un able" to tak e action in a particu lar cas e revolve around the functioning structure and factual ability of the domestic judicial system to "carry out its proceedings."195 In contrast, a domestic amnesty or pardon wo ul d creat e a legal "inabi lit y" to pros ecute in th e domestic foru ms that the ICC s hou ld not use as a spring board over th e 193.
Sadat 
194.
Holmes, The Principle of Complementarity, supra note 100, at 76.
Human Rights Watch argued against the lacunae in the Rome Statute on the basis that "there can be no legitimate amnesty for these crimes; rather, the application of an amnesty law to these offenses would be a clear contravention of established principles of international law."
JUSTICE IN THE B ALANCE: RECOMMENDATIONS FOR AN INDEPENDENT AND EFFECTIVE INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL COURT 72 (1998).
195.
Rome Statute, supra note 3, art.
17(3).
In order to determine inability in a particular case, the Court shall consid er w heth er, due to partial or to tal co llapse or unav ailab ility of its national judicial system, the State is unable to obtain the accused or the necessary evidence and testim ony or otherw ise unable to carry out its proceedings.
Id.
70
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
co mplementarity principle in the ab sen ce of persuasive evid ence th at it was intended solely to shield the accused from criminal responsibility.196 Ho ldi ng t hat th e pot enti al fo r ICC ju risd ictio n ov er cases that fall wi thi n an amn es ty o r a d omest ic statu te of lim itati ons infrin ges o n the "essential conditions for the exercise of national sovereignty," the French Conseil Constitutionnel found that ratification of the Rome Statute would require revision of the French constitution.197 With respect to complementarity, therefore, it is evident that the Rome Statute is not dispositive over the pre cise re solu ti on of ev e ry situa tion that the IC C will e n counte r. Despite this, the ICC prosecutor, operating from the mistaken perspective of concurrent jurisdiction, may seek to exert supranational jurisdiction at will w ithout regard for the defined constraints of complementarity.
C. Character of Crimes The ICC prosecutor 's ultimate position on the concept of "ordinary crimes" may well be the hidden weakness in the complementarity regime as an effective limit to supranational power.
If the ICC prosecutor dictates to states th e "acceptabl e" charges fo r particular co ndu ct , th e v itality o f c o m p le m e nta r ity as a fu nc tion al c o m p one nt of IC C pr a ctic e will b e severely weakened.
Put simply, many states have criminal provisions that penalize the same conduct that would fall under one of the substantive definitions of crimes proscribed by the ICC, but which do so under different legal ch aracterizatio ns .
T he presu mpt ion in favo r o f d omest ic jud icial action does not depend on strict compliance with the crimes articulated in the Rome Statute, or with charging those offenses using the precise terms and conditions outlined therein.
The jurisprudence or practice of the ICC should not evolve to the point that domestic p rosecutors make ch arging deci sions base d on the hope that the IC C will acc ep t the fo rm of the 196.
Id. art.
20(3)(a).
197.
Beate Rufolf, Statute of the International Criminal Court, Decision No. 98-408 DC, 1999 J.O. 1317, 94 AM.
J. INT'L L. 391, 394 (1999).
The French ultimately added a constitutional provision, Article 53-2, which provides that "[t]he Republic may recognize the jurisdiction of the International Crim inal Court under the conditions contained in the treaty sig ned on July 18 , 19 98."
Id . at 394 n.8 .
T he orig inal d ecis ion is av ailab le at www.conseil-constitutionel.fr/decision/1998/9808dc.htm.
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
71
charges.
Such a practice would turn the principle of complementarity on its head.
In a r e gim e ba se d o n co nc ur r e nt jur i s d ic tio n be tw ee n d o m e sti c forums and an international court, the international court would have had preexisting jurisdiction in its own right regardless of the characterization of the crime under domestic law.
Under a regime of concurrent jurisdiction, even if the domestic courts decide a particular case, the principle of ne bis in idem198 would not preclude a subsequent trial before the international tribunal if "the characterization of the act by the national court did not co rrespo nd to its characterization" in the in ternational foru m.199 In fact, the ICTY wrote in dicta that an international criminal tribunal " must be endowed with primacy over national courts" because human nature will create a "perennial danger of international crimes being characterized as ordinary crimes."200 In contrast, the Rome Statute does not make any distinction regarding the nature of the charge in the provisions implementing th e princip le of complementarity.
The form of the charge in domestic states does not affect the latitu de that the supranational court must accord natio nal pro cesses.
The de tailed ad mi ss ibility crit eria apply r egard less of th e for m of the charges in the domestic forum or their precise symmetry with the words of the Rome Statute.
At the same time, if a state does not have a criminal code that exactly replicates the range of offenses under the Rome Statute, the ICC prosecutor could be at liberty to simply consider that the state is unable to prosecute the crimes.
It is conceivable that in egregious cases the ICC itself would informally ask a particular state to fill perceived gaps in its domestic legislation, and then determine that the delay in doing so manifested a "genuine unwillingness" to prosecute or investigate a particular accused.
In this vein, states implementing the Rome Statute through domestic legi slati on face an ad di tio nal di lemma.
Legi slati on p endi ng i n sev eral national legislatures to implement the Rome Statute makes general reference to the "crimes described in Articles 6 and 7 and paragraph 2 of Article 8 of the Rom e Statu te."201 The Rome Statu te all ow s the pros ecu tor to 198.
See supra notes 150-56 (describing ne bis in idem as it relates to complementarity within the ICC structure).
199.
Secretary General's Report, supra note 70,  66 (describing the overlap of domestic prosecutorial authority with the concurrent jurisdiction and presumption of primacy under the International Criminal Tribunal for the For mer Yugoslavia).
200.
Tadic Appeal on Jurisdiction, supra note 58,  58 (emphasis added).
72
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
select from a wide array of criminal charges, and includes some offenses that co uld be charg ed under several overlapp ing provisions.
States th at duplicate the range of offense in the Rome Statute may very well face pressure to charge an accused in the precise manner that the ICC prosecutor will accept in order to "get credit" for using the domestic judicial system.
Again, such a practice would violate the principle of complementarity contained within the Rome Statute.
The d istinction betw een ord inary offenses and ICC crimes is more than simply a terminological exercise.
If the ICC and prosecutor begin to base admis sibi lity d eci sion s on th e p recis e articulati on o f th e d omesti c criminal ch arge, the principle o f respecting n ational processes would b e se ve r e ly unde r m ine d .
I nde e d , the c o m p le m e nta r ity pr i n c i ple w a s designed to preclude such micromanagement by the supranational institution and the accompanying interference with national judicial processes.
In theory, complementarity would require the ICC to recognize the discretion of the domestic authorities regarding the scope and form of the domestic charges.
In reality, complementarity may be an incomplete restraint on a zealous ICC prosecutor, motivated by a strong awareness of moral and leg al obligations to serve the needs of intern ation al accountability, w ho could use the form of domestic charges as a pretext to exert ICC authority.
V. Conclusion "Complementarity" is an intellectually simple concept that masks the deep philosophical and political difficulties that the International Criminal Court must overcome if it is ever to become a functioning institution.
The drafters of the Rome Statute and the delegates who negotiated the Rules of Evidence and Procedure clearly understood that the ICC should not be the court of first resort.
One of the Preparatory Committee Reports prior to the Rome Con feren ce noted that, "[t]aki ng into accou nt that under in ternational law, the exercise of police power and penal law is a prerogative of 201.
See Crimes Against Humanity and War Crim es Act, R.S.C., ch. 24,  4(4) (2000) (Can.).
Legislation pending in several other jurisdictions to implement the Rome Statute domestically is available at files.fco.uk/und/draftbill.pdf (applies the criminal provisions of Article 6, 7, and 8(2) to crimes committed in the England, Wales, or Northern Ireland, as w ell by p ersons subject to Un ited K ingdo m n ationals on an extraterritorial basi s); w w w. eda. adm in .c h / s ub_di pl / g / hom e/ i n fo/ t r di sc. h t m l (G erm a n le g is lat i on); w w w. eda. adm i n. ch/ s ub_ di pl / f / hom e/ i n fo/ t r d i s c. ht m l (French l e gi sl at i on); and www.eda.admin.ch/sub_dipl/i/home/info/trdisc.html (Italian legislation).
2001]
COMPARATIVE COMPLEMENTARITY
73
States, the jurisdiction of the Court should be viewed only as an exception to such State prerogative."202 If it can function effectively as an apolitical supranational institution with autonomous legal personality, the ICC can fulfill an important function in buttressing domestic justice by serving as an additional forum for di sp en si ng j us ti ce w he n d o mes tic foru ms are i nad eq uat e. D es pi te t h e well-intentioned goals of the Rome Statute, the ICC will survive and thrive only if it manag es to balance the reality o f so vereign political an d legal competitio n between states with th e aspiration for international jus tice.
The complementarity provisions are the designated mechanism for balancing enforcement of international norms against protection of state sovereignty.
Complementarity is in theory an impartial, reliable, and de-politicized process for identifying the cases of international concern, and hence interna tion al ju ri s d ic tion .
Ho we ve r, th e th ick et o f su bje ct i ve p ro v isio ns designed to implement complementarity allow s treaty opponents to argue that national justice systems are threatened with displacement at the hands of an unrestrained international prosecutor.
Indeed, one of the fiercest critics of the ICC testified: "Complementarity, like so much else associated with the ICC is simply an assertion, utterly unproven and untested.
Since no one has any actual experience w ith the Court, of course, no one can say with any certainty what will happen."203 Com plem en tarit y w ill be an ess ent ial com po nen t of a fun ctio nin g ICC within a system of sovereign states, but the new institution will face the difficult challenge of eroding the historic reality of unrestrained state discretion w ithout generating a tidal wave of hostility and outright opposition from the community of states.
Complementarity in practice, as distinct from complementarity in principle, will be an essential feature of an ICC that earns a respected role that warrants state support and assistance towards the goal of enhancing the prospects for international accountability and justice.
Time will tell how this important principle is implemented through the decisions and opinions of the ICC and its prosecutor.
202.
1 Report of the Preparatory Committee on the Establishment of the International Criminal Court, U.N. GAOR, 51st Sess., Supp.
No. 22,  155, U.N. Doc. A/51/22 (1996), reprinted in STATUTE OF THE INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL C OURT: A D OCUMENTARY HISTORY 385 (1998).
203.
International Criminal Court Hearing, supra note 94, at 63 (testimony of John Bolton before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee).
74
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
A UTHORITY TO COURT-MARTIAL NON-U.S. MILITARY PERSONNEL FOR SERIOUS VIOLATIONS OF INTERNATIONAL HUMANITARIAN LAW COMMITTED DURING INTERNAL ARMED CONFLI CTS MAJ OR J AN OR
E. AL
DYKIEWICZ1
WITH CONTRIBUTIONS BY
MAJ I. Introduction
G
EOFFREY
S. C
ORN2
Crimes against international law are committed by men, not by abstract entities, and only by punishing individuals who commit such crimes can the provisions of international law be enforced.3 1.
Judge Advocate General's Corps, United States Army.
Presently assigned as Chief, Criminal Law, I Corps and Fort Lewis, Washington.
B.S., 1988, State University of New York at Albany, Albany, New York; J.D., 1991, Fordham University School of Law, New York, New York; LL.M., 2000, The Judge Advocate General's School, United States Army, Charlottesville, Virginia.
Previous assignments include Chief, Military Justice Division, Office of the Staff Judge Advocate, Joint Readiness Training Center and Fort Polk, Fort Polk, Louisiana, 1997-1999; Administrative Law Attorney and Officer in Charge, Task Force Eagle  Rear, Office of the Staff Judge A dvocate, 1st Arm ored Division, Baum holder, Germany, and Slavonski Brod, Croatia, 1996-1997; Trial Defense Counsel, Trial Defense Services Headquarters Attached to 1st Arm ored Division and Task Force Eagle, Baumholder, Germ any, Slavonski Brod, Croatia, and Lukovac, Bosnia-Herzegovina, 19951996; and Chief, Claims Division, and Trial Counsel, Office of the Staff Judge Advocate, United States Army Infantry Center and Fort Benning, Fort Benning, G eorgia, 1992-1994.
2.
Judge Advocate General's Corps, U nited States Army.
Presently assigned as Stude nt, Com m a nd an d G eneral Staff Coll eg e, Fort Le av enw o rth, K ansas.
B.A ., 1983, Hartw ick C ollege, Oneonta, New York; J.D. with Highest H onors, 1992, N ational Law Center of George Washington University, Washington, D.C.; LL.M., Distinguished Graduate, 45th Graduate Course, The Judge Advocate General's School, Charlottesville, Virginia.
Previous assign ments inclu de Professo r, In ternational and Operational Law, The Judge Advocate General's School, Charlottesville, Virginia; Chief of Criminal Law, Senior Trial Counsel, and Legal Assistance Officer, Office of the Staff Judge Advocate, 101st Airborne Division (Air Assault) and Fort Campbell, Fort Campbell, Kentucky, 1993-1996; Funded Leg al Ed ucation Prog ram , 1989 -199 2; Fu ture R eadine ss O fficer, Milita ry Inte llig ence Branch, U .S. Army Personnel Command, Alexandria, Virginia, 1989; S-2, 1st Battalion, 508th Parachute Infantry Regiment, Fort Kobbe, Panama, 1987-1988; Assistant S-2, 193d Infantry Brigade (Task Force Bayonet), Fort Clayton, Panama, 1986-1987; Platoon Leader, 29th Military Intelligence Battalion, Fort Clayton, Panama, 1986; Briefing Officer, G-2, 193d Infantry Brigade (Panama), Fort Clayton, Panama, 1985-1986.
3.
1 TRIAL OF THE MAJOR WAR CRIMINALS BEFORE THE INTERNATIONAL MILITARY TRIBUNAL, N UREMBERG 223 (1947).
2001]
AUTHORITY TO C-M NON-US PERSONNE L
75
The soldier, be he friend or foe, is charged with the protection of the weak and unarmed.
It is the very essence and reason of his being.
When he violates this sacred trust, he not only profanes his entire cult, but threatens the fabric of international society .4 The two preceding quotations reflect what has become a fundamental p recep t o f i n t ern at io n al l aw : t ha t in d i vi d u als c an an d s h ou l d b e h el d accou ntab le for co nd uct w h ich v io lates fu nd amen tal n orms o f in ternational law.
The first quotation, from the Nuremberg War Crimes Tribunal, ref le cts th e basic doctrine of indivi dual re sponsibility-- tha t al though international law generally regulates the conduct of states, it has developed certain proscriptions applicable to individuals.
This doctrine has become well-settled in international law, and is a basic tenet of the law of war.
The second quote, written by General MacArthur when he approved the death sentence for Japanese General Yamashita, reflects the concept that, when a member of the profession of arms transgresses fundamental restrictions on warrior conduct, the misconduct disgraces the entire profession of arms.
This notion, alth ough solidly grounded in the history of the law of war, seems less understood today than at any time in the history of our armed forces.
Yet it is a critical component of the law of war, for throughout history it has served as the motivation for calling upon warriors to sit in judgment of the misconduct of other warriors.
The issue of war crimes, and the appropriate venue for holding those who commit them individually responsible, recently became a major interest for the international community.
The result has been an almost myopic focus on the creation and utilization of international criminal tribunals to sit in judgment of w arrior misconduct.
Unfortunately, the lack of understa nding of th e basic sentimen t e x pr essed by Gene ral M ac A rt hu r has resulted in virtually no consideration of the propriety of using military tribunals to perform this function.
While the conflicts in the former Yugoslavia and Rwanda have been the scene of widespread law of war violations, the primary response by the international community has been the use of international criminal tribunals, with no participation from the profession of arms.
This stands in stark contrast with the post-World War II response to war crimes.
Although the international war crimes tribunals were the most visible venues for conducting war crimes trials, military courts-martial and other 4.
WAR, M ORALITY, AND THE MILI (quoting TELFORD TAYLOR, NUREMBERG TARY AND
P ROFESSION 223 (Malham M. Wakin ed., 1979) VIETNAM: AN AMERICAN TRAGEDY (1970)).
76
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
military tribunals accounted for the vast majority of such trials.
According to Telford Taylor: But [the usual channels of military justice] remained open and, numerically, the Nuremberg and Tokyo trials were a small part of a very large picture.
In Europe, the United States Army judge advo cate was mad e resp on sib le fo r t he pros ecu tio n of crimes commit ted agains t American troo ps, o r in Nazi concent rati on cam p s t h at h a d b een o v erru n an d "l i b erat ed " b y A m eri can fo rces.
Un der th is autho ri ty, some 1,6 00 German war crimes de fend an ts (as co mp ared w it h 20 0 at Nu rem berg) wer e tri ed b efo re A rmy m il it ary co m mi ss i on s an d mi li ta ry go v ern men t co urts , and over 250 death sen tences (as compared wi th 2 1 at Nuremberg) were carried out.
A bout an equal number were tried by British, French, and other military courts established by the countries that had been occupied by Germany.
Precise figures are lacking, but by individuals had been tried on war 2,8 00 in th e Far Eas t, t ak in g n o Soviet Union or China.
It would so me 10,000 pe rsons were tried 1950.5 the spring of 1948 some 3,500 crimes charges in Europe, and acco un t o f trial s h eld by the be a conservative estimate that on su ch ch arges fro m 1945-
These numbers clearly suggest that, had the international community not relied upon the use of military tribunals to sit in judgment of war criminals at the end of World War II, it would have been impossible to bring them all to justice.
During the course of post-conflict peace support operations, U.S. forces might be confronted with the similar issue of how to deal with individuals accused of committing war crimes who come under the co ntrol of U.S. forces.
T his art icle prop os es that t he U nit ed States should once again place war criminals before general courts-martial under the control of a U.S. commander, allowing warriors to sit in judgment of su ch co nd uct.
O f cou rse, cas es tri ed du rin g t he po st -Worl d War II era involved crimes committed during international armed conflicts with the victors sitting in judgment of their vanquished enemies .Although the propo sed u se of U.S. co urts -m arti al wo ul d in vo lve crimes co mmitt ed in a purely internal conflict not involving U.S. forces, this article demonstrates that developments in international law provide the necessary legal predicate for invoking the jurisdiction of a general court-martial to try individ5.
Id. at 370.
2001]
AUTHORITY TO C-M NON-US PERSONNE L
77
ua ls wh o c o m m itt ed c e r tai n wa r c r im e s dur in g the co ur se o f su ch a conflict.
In July 1999, U.S. forces entered the Yugoslav province of Kosovo under the authority of a United Nations resolution authorizing the use of all necessary means to restore order and stability to th at province.
This was the culmination of a NATO-led military campaign designed to compel Yugo slavia to resp ect certain fundamental rig hts o f Kosov ar A lban ians.
Th is campaign , co up led wit h int en se dip lomati c p res sure, resu lted in a Yugoslav grant of authority for the presence of NATO forces in Kosovo.
Thus began another ground force operation that--although conducted in response to a n "i nv itation" to en ter the ter rit ory of a nother sovereign state--took on all the traditional characteristics of a military occupation.
During the course of the U.S. presence in Kosovo, it is likely that U.S. forces might detain individuals who participated in some of the atrocities that characterized the conflict between the Serbian Armed Forces and the Kosovo Liberation Army.
Because the fighting between these two organizations was considered an armed conflict within the purview of the International Criminal Tribunal for Yugoslavia (ICTY), the current wisdom is th at offenders sh ou ld be detain ed pending in di ctm ent by th at trib un al.
Another option is to subject these individuals to the jurisdiction of local criminal tribunals that will be eventually established by the United Nations authority in Kosovo.
But is there a third option? Could these individuals be subjected to a general courts-martial pursuant to the Uniform Code of Military Justice (UCMJ)? This article suggests that such a course might not be as radical as it first appears.
Instead, a close analysis of the UCMJ, recent developments in the customary law of war, and the tradition of providing remedies for violations of the law of war, reveals that the time may be right to pursue this course of action.
Consider the following hypothetical.
An infantry squad, deployed as part of the American contingent of the NATO forces in K osovo (KFOR), conducts a routine patrol in the American sector of Yugoslavia and apprehends a Yugoslav lieutenant accused of numerous atrocities.
The alleged crimes include the murder of twenty innocent Kosovar Albanians during th e Kosovo confli ct , a non- international ar med c onflict 6 to which the United States was not a party.
The KFOR commander orders the suspect detained pending an investigation.
The investigation substantiates the allegations.7
78 Af mander at what lowing
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
ter he is briefed on the in vestigation's findings, the KFOR comasks his legal advisor: "Can I court-martial the lieutenant? If so, level of court and for what offenses?" This article proposes the folanswer by the legal advisor: "Yes sir, you can court-martial th e
6.
"[A] non-international arm ed conflict is distinct from an international arm ed conflict because of the legal status of the entities opposing each other: the parties to the conflict are not sovereign States, but the government of a single State in conflict with one or more armed factions within its territory."
COMMENTARY ON THE ADDITIONAL PROTOCOLS OF 8 JUNE 1977 TO THE GEN EVA CONVE NTIONS OF 12 AUGU ST 1949,  4339 (Yves Sandoz et al. eds., 1987) [hereinafter OFFICIAL COMMENTARY, PROTOCOL II].
The expression "armed conflicts" gives an important indication . . . since i t in tr oduces a m a te ri al cr ite rion: t h e exi st ence of open ho sti lit ie s between armed forces which are organized to a greater or lesser degree.
Internal disturbances and tensions, characterized by isolated or sporadic acts of violence do not therefo re constitute armed co nflicts in a legal sense, even if the government is forced to resort to police forces or even armed units for the purpose of restoring law and order.
Within these limits, non-international armed conflict seems to be a situation in which hostilities break out between armed forces or organized armed groups within a territory of a single State.
Insurgents fighting against the established order wou ld no rm ally seek to overthrow the governm ent in power or alternatively to bring about a secession so as to set up a new state.
Id. at  4341.
Although Serbia was involved in the fighting, alongside the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia, their involvement did not change the character of the conflict from noninternational to international.
Serbia's involvement was at the behest and with the consent of the Yugoslav govern ment, the legitimate govern ment, and was directed at the Kosovar Albanians, not Yugoslavia.
Thus, there was no state on state conflict, which would cause the conflict to be characterized as an international armed conflict.
The s ame rationale was used to justify Operation Just Cause, the United States invasion of Panama, as a non-international, as opposed to international armed conflict.
This "invasion" on 20 Decem ber 1989 was a t th e request and invitatio n of Pan ama's legitima tely -elected president, President Gullerm o Endara.
"The United States government never recognized Noriega as Panama's legitimate, constitutional ruler."
United States v. Noriega, 117 F.3d 1206, 1211 (1997); see also Eytan Gilboa, The Panama Invasion Revisited: Lessons for the Use of Force in the Post Cold War Era, 110 POLITICAL SCIENCE QUARTERLY 539, 539 n.4 (1995).
Thus, the conflict between the United States and Manuel Noriega, the Panamanian Defense Force, and the forces loyal to Noriega was not State on State; rather, it was a non-international armed conflict betw een the legitimate Government of Panama and forces assisting the Panamanian Governm ent against insurgents commanded by Manuel Noriega.
But cf. United States v. Noriega, 808 F. Supp. 791 (1992) (holding Manuel Noriega was entitled to Prisoner of War status based on the court's analysis of the invasion of Panama as an Article 2 conflict-- that is, an international armed conflict--despite evidence to the contrary by the Departments of State and Defense).
"The Court finds that General Noriega is in fact a prisoner of war as defined by Geneva III, and as such must be afforded the protections established by the treaty, regardless of the type of facility in which the Bureau of Prisons chooses to incarcerate him."
Id. at 796.
2001]
AUTHORITY TO C-M NON-US PERSONNE L
79 8
lie u t e n a n t a t a g e ne r a l c o ur t- m a r t i a l f o r v i ol a tin g th e la w of w ar. "
7.
Assume for purposes of this hypothetical that investigation reveals the following: (1) murders did in fact occur; (2) the murders occurred after 1991; (3) w itnesses, as well as physical evidence to include mass graves, have been located; (4) the suspect, at the time of the murders, was a lieutenant in the Yugoslav Army; and (5) faced with overwhelming evidence, the lieutenant confessed.
Additionally: (1) the Kosovo conflict is a non-international armed conflict, also known as an internal armed conflict; (2) the United States was not a party to the conflict; (3) the atrocities were com mitted prior to KFOR's arrival; (4) KFOR's presence in Yugoslavia is not an occupation for purpose of the law of war; and (5) the International Tribunal for the Prosecution of Persons Responsible for Serious Violations of International Humanitarian Law Committed in the Territory of the Former Yugoslavia since 1991 (ICTY) has jurisdiction over the offenses.
The non-occupation determination means that the United States is not acting in the role of occupier enforcing local laws or occupation rules mandated by the occupying force.
Occupation occurs when "territory is actually placed under the authority of a hostile arm y [and] extends only to the territory where such authority has been established and can be exercised."
DEP'T OF ARMY, F IELD MANUAL 27-10, THE LAW OF LAND WARFARE,  351 (18 July 1956) (C1, 15 July 1976) [hereinafter FM 27-10].
The relevance of the date of offense and mention of the ICTY is that it provides the commander with the option of sending the case (that is, the lieutenant and the completed investigation) to the ICTY for prosecution.
The ICT Y w as created pursuant to Un ited Nations Security Council Resolution 827 for the purpose of "prosecuting persons responsible for serious violations of international humanitarian law committed in the territory of the former Yugoslavia."
S.C.
Res. 827, U.N. SCOR, 48 Sess., 3217th mtg., U.N. Doc. S/ RES/827 (1993), reprinted in 32 I.L.M. 1203 (1993) [hereinafter ICTY Statute]; see infra note 20.
Article 2 of the ICTY Statute prohibits "grave breaches of the Geneva Conventions of 1949" and lists at Article 2(a), "willful killing."
ICTY Statute, art.
2.
Article 3 prohibits violations of the law s or customs of war.
Id. art.
3.
Article 9 limits the court's jurisdiction to serious violations of international humanitarian law committed in the territory of the former Yugoslavia since 1 January 1991.
Id. art.
9.
The ICTY would have jurisdiction over the hypothetical lieutenant for violating either A rticle 2 or A rticle 3 of the statute, depending on w hether the conflict was characterized as international or internal.
8.
Rule for Courts-Martial 201 provides: Cases under the law of war. (i) General courts-martial may try any person who by the law of w ar is subject to trial by military tribunal for any crime or offense against: (a) The law of war; or (b) The law of the territory occupied as an incident of war or belligerency . . . . [which] includes the local crim inal law as adopted or m odified by competent authority, and the proclamations, ordinances, regulations, or orders promulgated by competent authority of the occupying p ower.
MANUA L FOR C OURTS-MARTIA L, U NIT ED S TAT ES, R .C .M. 201(f)(1 )(B) (2000) [hereinafter MCM]
But see id. R.C.M. 201(d) (concerning exclusive and nonexclusive jurisdiction for violations of the law of war).
"Ordinarily persons subject to the code should be charged with a specific violation of the code rather than a violation of the law of war."
Id. R.C.M. 307(c)(2) discussion.
80
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
Although many judge advocates, legal scholars, and perhaps even members of Congress might disagree w ith this conclusion,9 analysis of recent developments in the law show s that this conclusion is legally sound.
Thus, although there might be compelling policy objections to exercising jurisdiction in such a situation, the predicate issue of legality would be satisfied.
The resolution of the issue created by this hypothetical turns on determ i ni ng th e a u th or ity o f a ge ne r al c o ur t- m ar tia l c o n v e n in g a u th or ity (GCMCA) to convene a general court-martial to prosecute non-U.S. service members10 for serious violations of international humanitarian law11 committed during an internal armed conflict in which the United States did not participate.
While any GCMCA could convene such a court, the jurisdiction of the court would certainly be challenged by the accused.
Thus, 9.
See H.R. R EP. N O. 104-698, at 5 (1996), reprinted in 1996 U.S.C.C.A.N.
2166, 2170 (discussing, during the War Crimes Act debate, the viability of court-martialing nonU.S. service members for war crimes and determining that this was not a viable option).
10.
United States servic e members are commonly referred to as "persons subject to the code," m eaning the UCMJ.
Such persons are listed in the general provisions of the UCMJ as "persons subject to this chapter."
UCMJ art.
2 (2000).
Those listed are usually referred to as people in a "Title 10 status."
Those in a Title 10 status are subject to general court-martial under the first sentence (clause 1) of UCMJ Article 18, which states: Sub ject to section 817 of this title (article 17), general courts-m artial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this chapter for any offense made punishable by this chapter and may, under such lim itations as the President may prescribe, adjudge any punish ment not forbidden by this chapter, including the penalty of death when specifically authorized by this chapter.
Id. art.
18.
Article 17 states, in part: "Each armed force has court-m artial jurisdiction over all persons subject to this chapter."
Id. art.
17.
Foreign nationals and U.S. citizens not listed in UCMJ Article 2(a)(1) through 2(a)(12) are not subject to the code, and therefore are not subject to general court-martial under the first sentence of UCMJ Article 18.
Th e sec ond sen tence (clau se 2) of U C MJ A rticle 1 8, ho we ver, is n ot lim ited by UCMJ Article 2.
It extends general courts-martial jurisdiction to persons not subject to the code by stating: "General courts-martial also have jurisdiction to try any person who by the law of war is subject to trial by a military tribunal and may adjudge any punishment permitted by the law of war."
Id. art.
18.
As used throughout this article, "non-U.S. service members" refers to those persons not listed in UCMJ Article 2, and thus not in a Title 10 status.
2001]
AUTHORITY TO C-M NON-US PERSONNE L
81
resolution of this issue will ultimately depend upon a judicial determination of the jurisdiction of the court over the accused.
The authority to subject such an accused to a general court-martial is found in Article 18 of the UCMJ, which governs the jurisdiction of general courts-martial.
Article 18 provides in relevant part: "General courts-martial also have jurisdiction to try any person who by the law of war is subject to trial by a military tribunal and may adjudge any punishment permitted by the law of war."12 As evident from this language, the grant of jurisdiction is not limited by the nationality of the accused, the nationality of the vi cti m, th e mi lit ary s tat us of th e accu sed , th e part ies t o t he co nfl ict in which the offense was committed, or the time when the offense was committed.
The only requirements to trigger this grant of jurisdiction are that 11.
International humanitarian law is more commonly known as the law of war or law of armed conflict, applicable to both international and non-international or internal armed conflicts.
McCoubrey defines the concept as: That branch of the laws of armed conflict which is concerned with the protection of the victims of armed conflict, meaning those rendered hors de combat by injury, sickness or capture, and also civilians.
. .found primarily in the four 1949 Geneva Conventions, the two 1977 Additional Protocols and associated materials.
M CCOUBREY, INTERNATIONAL H UMANITARIAN LAW: THE REGULATION OF A RMED CON1 (1990).
"This body of law can be defined as the principles and rules which limit the use of violence in times of armed conflict."
THE UNITED NATIONS HIGH COMMISSIONER FOR HUMAN RIG HTS, FACT SHE ET N O. 13, INTE RN ATIO NAL HUM AN ITARIA N LAW AND H UM AN RIGHTS (July 1991), available at http://www.unhchr.
ch/html/menu6/2/fs13.htm .
ILAIRE FLICTS
H
The expression "violations of the laws or customs of war" [referring to Article 3 of the ICTY Statute] is a traditional term of art used in the past, w hen concepts of "war" and "laws of warfare" still prevailed, before they were largely replaced by two broader notions: (i) that of "armed conflict," essentially introduced by the 1949 Geneva Conventions; and (ii) the correlative notion of "international law of armed conflict," or the m ore recent and comprehensive notion of "international hum anitarian law," which has emerged as a result of influence of human rights doctrine on the law of arm ed conflict.
. . .
In other words, the [United Nations] Secretary-General concedes that the traditional laws of warfare are now, more correctly term ed "international humanitarian law."
Prosecutor v. Tadic (a/k/a Dule), No.
IT-94-1-AR72, para. 87 (O ct. 2, 1995) (Appeal on Jurisdiction) [hereinafter Tadic Appeal], reprinted in 35 I.L.M. 32 (1996).
Violations of international humanitarian law are by definition war crim es. FM 27-10, supra note 7, para. 499.
12.
UCMJ art.
18 (2000).
82
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
the act in question must be a violation of the law of war, and the law of war must provide for individual criminal responsibility for such a violation.
As will be illustrated, developments in the law of war during the past decade place into this categ ory the violation of certain fu ndamental law of war prohibitions applicable to internal armed conflict.
Such violations would satisfy the Article 18 jurisdictional prerequisites, and a jurisdictional basis therefore exists to court-martial the accused in the hypothetical above.
II.
Overview This article examines th e jurisdiction granted by UCMJ Article 18 and the law of war applicable to purely internal armed conflicts to determine whether Article 18 establishes jurisdiction to prosecute non-U.S. partic i p a n t s in suc h c o n f l i c t s f o r s e r i ou s v i ol a tio ns o f i n t e r n a tio na l humanitarian law.
It illustrates that the proscriptions of th e law of war, those which result in individual criminal responsibility when violated during an internal armed con fl ict, fall w ith in th e j urisd ictio nal pu rv iew o f Article 18.
Such violations constitute violations of paragraph 1 of Common Arti cle 3 of th e Genev a Con vent ion s of 1 949 13 (Comm on A rticl e 3(1)) and paragraphs 1 and 2 of Article 4 of Protocol II to the 1977 Protoco ls Addi tional to t he G eneva Conventio ns of 19 49 (Protocol II).14 By demonstrating that these law of war proscriptions are fundamental prohibitio ns that have attained customary intern ational law status, this article will show that they fall under the umbrella of universal jurisdiction.
It also examines the relationship between Article 18 and the War Crimes Act of 1996,15 concluding that--although Congress has provided for the federal criminal prose cution of certain war c rimes co m mitted during in tern al armed conflict--the War Crimes Act should not be regarded as preempting the jur isdic ti on gran te d by A rticle 18.
F ina lly, afte r e s ta blishing the authority granted by Article 18, and therefore the permissibility of relying on this source of jurisdiction to subject a n on-U.S. service memb er to a general court-martial, this article considers policy concerns related to any decision to exercise such jurisdiction, focusing on the potential advantages and disadvantages.
Any person who commits a serious violation of the la w of war, a violation resulting in individual criminal responsibility under existing international law, is subject to prosecution at a general court-martial.
Violations of Common Article 3(1) and Protocol II, Articles 4(1) and 4(2), qualify as serious violations of the law of war that subject the violator to prosecution at a general court-martial.
Pursuant to the plain meaning of Article 18 of
2001]
AUTHORITY TO C-M NON-US PERSONNE L
83
the UCMJ, the jurisdiction of a general court-martial to prosecute an individual charged with such a law of war violation is not dependent upon the violator 's or victim's citizenship or nationality, the location of the violation, or whether the United States was a party to the conflict.16 Instead, the 13.
Article 3 common to the four Geneva Conventions of 1949 states: Article 3 - Conflicts Not Of An International Character In the case of armed conflict not of an international character occurring in the territory of one of the High Contracting Parties, each Party to the conflict shall be bound to apply, as a m inimum, the following provisions: (1) Persons taking no active part in the hostilities, including members of armed forces who have laid down their arms and those placed "hors de combat" by sickness, wounds, detention, or any other cause, shall in all c ircu m stan ce s b e trea ted h um an ely, w ith out an y ad ve rse dis tin ctio n founded on race, colour, religion or faith, sex, birth or w ealth, or any other similar criteria.
To this end, the following acts are and shall remain prohibited at any time and in any place whatsoever with respect to the above-mentioned persons: (a) violence to life and person, in particular murder of all kinds, mutilation, cruel treatmentand torture; (b) taking of hostages; (c) outrages upon personal dignity, in particular humiliating and degrading treatment; (d) the passing of sentences and the carrying out of executions without previous judgment pronounced by a regularly constituted court, affording all the judicial guarantees which are recognized as indispensable by civilized peoples.
(2) The wounded and sick shall be collected and cared for.
An impartial h um a nita ria n bo dy, su ch as th e In tern at ion al C om m itte e of th e Re d Cross, may offer its services to the Parties to the conflict.
The Parties to the conflict should further endeavour to bring into force, by means of special agreements, all or part of the other provisions of the present Convention.
The application of the preceding provisions shall not affect the legal status of the Parties to the conflict.
Geneva Convention for the Amelioration of the C ondition of the Wounded and Sick in Arm ed Fo rces in the Field , art.
3, open ed for sig nature Au g 12 , 19 49, 6 U .S .T. 3114, T.I.A.S.
No. 3362, 75 U.N.T.S. 31 (Geneva Convention I); Convention for the Amelioration of the Condition of the Wounded, Sick, and Shipw recked Members of the Arm ed Forces at Sea , art .
3, ope ned for sign atu re A ug 12, 19 49, 6 U .S.T. 3 21 7, T.I.A .S. No .
33 63, 75 U.N.T.S. 85 (Geneva Convention No. II); Geneva Convention Relative to the Treatment of Prisoners of War, art.
3, opened for signature Aug 12, 1949, 6 U.S.T. 3316, T.I.A.S.
No. 3364, 75 U.N.T.S. 135 (Geneva Convention No.
III); Convention Relative to the Protection of Civilian Persons in Tim e of War, art.
3, opened for signature Aug 12, 1949, 6 U.S.T. 3516, T.I.A.S.
No. 3365, 75 U.N .T.S. 287 (Geneva Convention No.
IV), (art.
3 common in all four conventions) [hereinafter Geneva Conventions I-IV].
84
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
14.
Article 4 of Protocol II states: Article 4 - Fundamental guarantees 1.
All persons who do not take a direct part or who have ceased to take part in h ostilities, w hether or not their lib erty has been restricted, are entitled to respect for their person, honour and convictions and religious practices.
They shall in all circumstances be treated humanely, without any adverse distinction.
It is prohibited to order that there shall be no survivors.
2.
Without prejudice to the generality of the foregoing, the following acts against the persons referred to in paragraph 1 are and shall remain prohibited at any time and in any place whatsoever: (a) violence to the life, health and physical or mental well-being of persons, in particular murder as well as cruel treatment such as torture, mutilation or any form of corporal punishment; (b) collective punishments; (c) taking of hostages; (d) acts of terrorism; (e) outrages upon personal dignity, in particular humiliating and degradin g tr ea tm en t, rap e, e nfo rc ed p ro sti tut ion an d an y fo rm o f in de cen t assault; (f) slavery and the slave trade in all their forms; (g) pillage; (h) threats to comm it any of the foregoing acts.
3.
Children shall be provided with the care and aid they require, and in particular: (a) they shall receive an education, including religious and moral education, in keeping with the wishes of their parents, or in the absence of parents, of those responsible for their care; (b) all appropriate steps shall be taken to facilitate the reunion of families temporarily separated; (c) children who have not attained the age of fifteen years shall neither be recruited in the armed forces or groups nor allowed to take part in hostilities; (d) the special protection provided by this Article to children who have not attained the age of fifteen years shall rem ain applicable to them if they take a direct part in hostilities despite the provisions of sub-paragraph (c) and are captured; (e) measures shall be taken, if necessary, and whenever possible with the consent of their parents or persons who by law or custom are primarily responsible for their care, to rem ove children temporarily from the area in which hostilities are taking place to a safer area within the country and ensure that they are accompanied by persons responsible for their safety and well-being.
Protocol II Additional to the Geneva Conventions of 12 August 1949 and Relating to the Protection of Victims of N on-International Armed Conflicts, art.
4, opened for signature Dec. 12, 1977, reprinted in 16 I.L.M. 1442 (1977) [hereinafter Protocol II].
2001]
AUTHORITY TO C-M NON-US PERSONNE L
85 law of war, w ar violathere is no of the gen-
critical predicate fact is that international law, in the form of the imposes criminal responsibility on the offender for the law of tion.
If this fact can be estab lished by the prosecution, then legal impediment to subjecting the accused to the jurisdiction eral court-martial.17
Through recent examples, Part III of this article illustrates the types of misconduct, committed during internal armed conflicts, that violate fundamental l aw o f w ar pro hibi tions app licab le to su ch con fli cts .
A commander would be authorized to use a general court-martial to prosecute the offenders in these examples.
Part IV traces the history of Article 18, demonstrating that its application to individuals with no connection to the U.S. armed forces, in order to punish war criminals, is grounded in the history of military jurisprudence.
Having established that the scope of Article 18 extends to any individual who is subject to trial by a military tribunal for violating the law of war, this article next endeavors to establish that such offenses may occur during the course of an internal armed conflict.
This req uires a sh owi ng th at cert ai n law of war p ro visi ons are cus tomary in nature and include an individual criminal responsibility component.
Part V reviews the process by which a norm evolves into customary international law and the impact of such norms on the international community.
Part VI examines the applicability of Common Article 3 and Article 4 of Protocol II to internal armed conflicts.
Part VII concludes that these law of war pro visions have evolv ed into customary international law status.
15.
18 U.S.C.S  2441 (LEXIS 2000).
16.
If the person comm itting the serious violation or the victim is "a member of the Armed Forces of the United States or a national of the United States," he is also subject to criminal prosecution in federal district court under the War Crimes Act of 1996.
See id.
The Act does not affect general court-martial jurisdiction and is a separate and distinct basis for crim inal prose cution.
Se e H.R .
REP.
N O. 104-6 98, at 12 (1996 ), rep rinted in 1 996 U.S.C.C.A.N.
2166, 2177.
If the individual is in a Title 10 Status when prosecution commences, the individual is subject to prosecution under the first sentence of Article 18, for violations of the punitive articles of the UCMJ.
UCMJ art.
18 (2000); see also MCM, supra note 8, R.C.M. 307(c)(2) discussion (establishing a UCMJ preference for charging specific violations of the code rather than violations of the law of war); United States v. Calley, 46 C.M.R. 1131 (1973) (a pre War Crimes Act case in which 1LT William Calley was convicted at a general court-martial for three specifications of prem editated murder and one specification of assault with intent to co mmit murder, violations of UCMJ Articles 118 and 134, respectively, in connection with the m assacre of noncombatant civilians at My Lai, Vietnam ).
17.
Of course, there may be multiple policy considerations that counsel against using a court-martial in such a situation.
These considerations, however, are secondary considerations to the initial issue of whether the exercise of such jurisdiction is lawful, and should only be considered after this initial issue is resolved.
86
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[Vol. 167
Based on this conclusion, the article next analyzes whether violation o f these provisions constitutes a serious violation of international humanitarian law and, if so, whether such violations subject the actor to individual criminal responsibility.
Part VIII discusses the War Crimes Act of 1996, the ratio nale for its passage and amendment, and w heth er th is ratio nal e was valid.
It then assesses whether the Act, providing a federal forum for the prosecution of war crimes committed by aliens, preempts the jurisdiction of a general co urt-martial over the same o ffenses under Article 18, U CM J .
Fi n al ly, Pa rt IX ad d res s es t h e p o l icy co ns i d erat i o ns t h at m ay affect a decision to exercise UCMJ authority in these cases.
III.
The Relevance of Article 18 Authority in the 21st Century On 28 Ju ly 1997 , Representative L ofgren, addressing the atrocities visited upon innocent civilians during armed conflict, be it international or internal, stated the following: I think that ev er y Me mb er of this body ag ree s th at we m ust actively and aggressively support civility, that we must oppose oppression and war crimes and that we need to bring those to justice w ho co mmit crimes ag ains t hu mani ty. D urin g th e H ol ocaust, the killing fields of Cambodia, the civil war in Bosnia and the massacres in Rwanda, many perpetrators acted without fear of retribution, and we must do more to change this attitude.18 Although the statement was made in the context of expanding the offenses covered by the War Crimes Act of 1996,19 it highlights the need to change attitudes and aggressively prosecute war criminals.
Prosecuting suspected war criminals under Article 18 will change existing notions while bringing these criminals to justice.
Article 18 and the War Crimes Act of 1996 are 18.
143 CONG.
REC. H5865-66 (daily ed. July 28, 1997) (statement of Rep. Lofgren).
19.
18 U.S.C. S.  2441 (LEXIS 2000).
As initially passed, the War Crimes Act did not apply to crimes committed in internal armed conflicts and was limited in scope to grave breaches of the G eneva Conventions of 1949, which can occur only during an international armed conflict.
The 1997 am endments, the hearings from which Representative Lofgren's statem en t is take n, ex pan ded the sco pe o f th e A ct s olely from v iolatio ns of th e g rave breaches provisions of the Geneva Conventions of 1949 to: violations of Hague Regulation IV, Articles 23, 25, 27 and 28; violations of Com mon Article 3 applicable to internal armed conflicts; and willful killing or causing serious injury to persons "in relation to an armed conflict and contrary to the provisions on the Protocol on Prohibitions and Restrictions on the Use of Mines, Booby-Traps and Other Devices . . . when the United States is a party to such Protocol."
Id.
2001]
AUTHORITY TO C-M NON-US PERSONNE L
87
no t mu tu all y ex cl us iv e; rath er, t hey are s ep arate t oo l s av ail ab le t o t h e United States in dealing with war criminals.
Article 18 p ermits a commander to exercise authority initiating prosecution based on international law; the War Crimes Act allows federal prosecutors to address war crimes based on domestic law.
A review of recent atrocities committed during the conflicts in Bosnia-Herzegovina, Rwanda, Yugoslavia, and even Chechnya--conflicts all occurring within the last ten years with the latter still ongoing--highlights the need for a change in attitudes and aggressive prosecution of war crimin als.
In Bos ni a-Herzeg ov ina, b ot h cap tu red com batan ts and civi li an s were raped, tortured, mutilated, and killed, while their property was stolen or destroyed.
One need only review the indictments from the ICTY 20 to comprehend the h orrific nature of the war crimes committed during the Bosnian civil war.
For example, the Tadic indictment states, in part: About late June 1992, a group of Bosnian Serbs, from outside the cam p, in c luding Dusan [s ic] Tadic, en tered th e larg e gara ge building known as the "hangar" and called prisoners out of their rooms by name, including Emir Karabasic, Jasmin Hrnic, Enver Al ic, Fik ret Haramb asic and Em ir Begano vi c. T h e p riso ners were in different rooms and came out separately.
The group of Serbs, including Dusan Tadic, severely beat the prisoners with various objects and kicked them on their heads and bodies.
After Fik ret H aramb as ic w as bea ten , t wo o th er p ris o ners , "G " an d "H", were called out.
A member of the group ordered "G" and "H" to lick Fikret Harambasic's buttocks and genitals and then to sexuall y mu tilate Fi kret Haram ba sic.
"H " covered Fi kret Harambasic's mouth to silence his screams and "G" bit off one of Fikret Harambasic's testicles.
Emir Karabasic, Jasmin Hrnic, and Fikret Harambasic died from the attack.
E nver Alic, who 20.
The ICTY was created pursuant to United Nations Security Council Resolution 827 for the purpose of "prosecuting persons responsible for serious violations of international humanitarian law committed in the territory of the former Yugoslavia since 1 January 1991."
See S.C.
Res. 808, U.N. SCOR, 3175th mtg., U.N. Doc. S/RES/808 (1993) (recommending an international tribunal for the former Yugoslavia); UNITED N ATIONS, REPORT OF THE SECRETARY-GENERAL PURSUANT TO PARAGRAPH 2 OF SECURITY COUNCIL RESOLUTION 808 (1993), U.N. Doc. S/25704 and Annex (May 3, 1993), reprinted in 32 I.L.M. 1159 (1993) (includ ing a pro posed statute for a n Inte rnation al Tribu nal fo r the Prose cution of War Crimes in the Form er Yugoslavia); ICTY Statute, supra note 7 (establishing the International Criminal Tribunal for the Prosecution of War Crim es in the Former Yugoslavia and adopting the statute recommended in the Secretary-G eneral's report).
88
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
